COMMUNICATIONS  IN  A  DISASTER 

S.  HRG.  109–1108 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  22,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

64–137 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 22, 2005  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson  ............................................................
Statement of Senator Bill Nelson  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................
Article,  dated  September  9,  2005,  from  The  Wall  Street  Journal,  entitled 
‘‘Cut  Off:  At  Center  of  Crisis,  City  Officials  Faced  Struggle  to  Keep 
in  Touch;  Mayor’s  Inner-Circle  Spent  Two  Days  in  the  Dark;  Web 
Phone Became Lifeline; Police Chief Rips a Server Free’’ by Christopher 
Rhoads 
...........................................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Citron, Jeffrey A., Chairman/CEO, Vonage Holdings Corporation 

.....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Eslambolchi,  Hossein,  President,  AT&T  Global  Networking  Technology  Serv-
ices and AT&T Labs; AT&T Chief Technology Officer and Chief Information 
Officer  ....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Roth,  Paul,  Executive  Vice  President,  External  Affairs  and  Public  Relations, 
Cingular Wireless  .................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Smith, William L., Chief Technology Officer, BellSouth  ......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Martin, Hon. Kevin J., Chairman, Federal Communications Commission 

Page 
1 
3 
2 
2 
4 
9 
3 
1 
4 

5 
34 
35 

50 
52 

53 
55 
9 
13 

45 
47 
38 
39 

Smith, Hon. Gordon H., U.S. Senator from Oregon, prepared statement 

..........

69 

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

COMMUNICATIONS  IN  A  DISASTER 

THURSDAY,  SEPTEMBER  22,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SD– 
562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Chairman 
of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Good  morning.  According  to  the  FCC,  Hurricane 
Katrina  disrupted  service  to  approximately  three  million  phone- 
lines.  The  storm  surge  was  reported  in  excess  of  20  feet,  and  tens 
of  feet  of  flood  water  resulted  in  a  rarely  seen  area  of  devastation. 
Thousands  have  worked  around  the  clock  to  restore  phone  service, 
and we appreciate their extraordinary efforts. Today we have asked 
to  hear  from  the  FCC,  and  some  of  the  companies  involved,  about 
what  Hurricane  Katrina  did  to  the  communications  networks,  and 
about their efforts to restore service. In particular, we hope to hear 
about three common problems. 

Credentialing.  First,  repair  crews  were  ready  to  begin  restoring 
service, but couldn’t get permission from officials who were control-
ling  the  area  to  enter  the  area.  There  needs  to  be  a  plan  in  place 
for  important  people  who  are  associated  with  restoring  the  critical 
infrastructure and communications. 

As  far  as  security,  once  the  repair  crews  enter  the  affected  area 
there’s  no  reason  they  should  have  to  fear  for  their  lives.  Part  of 
any  disaster  recovery  plan  must  include  providing  for  safety  of  es-
sential communications personnel. 

And  also  the  issue  of  power,  of  energy.  Over-reliance  on  the 
power  grid  is  not  acceptable.  Companies  need  to  ensure  that  they 
have  sufficient  backup  generators  with  sufficient  fuel  in  place. 
Maybe natural gas pipelines could provide a backup fuel source for 
critical  infrastructure.  We  have  no  solution  to  offer,  we  want  to 
hear  what  solutions  are  being  explored  and  how  they  could  be  im-
plemented. But above all we intend to commend all of you for your 
efforts during the disaster. Apparently we have another one in the 
wings,  a  very  difficult  time  for  all  communications  people,  and  we 
look  forward  to  hearing  your  testimony.  I  do  hope  Members  will 
keep  their  opening  statements  to  not  more  than  two  minutes,  so 
that  we  can  proceed  with  the  second  bank  of  these  hearings  and 
finish by noon. Senator Inouye. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’d  like  to  join  you 
in  commending  Chairman  Martin  for  his  superb  leadership  during 
this  critical  time,  and  also  commend  the  leaders  of  the  industry 
who  did  the  impossible.  Yes,  we  have  work  to  do  but  considering 
what  we  had  in  place,  thank  God  you  were  there.  Now,  I  ask  that 
my full statement be made part of the record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
We have spent this week examining many of Hurricane Katrina’s painful lessons, 
and the possible solutions that this Committee can advance to mitigate future disas-
ters. 

We have examined Federal entities that did their job well, like the National Oce-
anic  and  Atmospheric  Administration’s  forecasting  and  warning  systems,  and  we 
have considered Federal entities that need to do better, like the Federal Trade Com-
mission and its work to protect consumers from price gouging. 

Today’s  hearing  is  on  entities  that  attempted  to  do  their  best  in  dangerous  and 
difficult situations, where, in many cases, the hard infrastructure limited their best 
efforts. 

Chairman Martin demonstrated strong leadership by swiftly marshalling the Fed-
eral  Communication  Commission’s  (FCC)  resources  and  working  with  the  affected 
communications  industries.  The  FCC’s  timely  attention  to  the  crisis,  waiving  rules 
and  granting  necessary  authorities,  helped  to  bring  critical  networks  back  online. 
Additionally, the proposals announced last week to dedicate the FCC resources to 
emergency  preparedness  functions  are  right  on  target.  I  have  long  supported  Com-
missioner Copps’ call for the creation of a Bureau that focuses specifically on emer-
gency  preparedness  and  elevates  this  work  among  the  FCC’s  priorities.  These  ac-
tions will do just that. 

The  communications  industry  also  must  be  thanked  for  its  tireless  efforts,  not 
only  to  restore  service  to  its  customers,  but  to  provide  life  saving  connectivity  to 
local and Federal first responders in the Gulf Coast region. Employees of these com-
panies forged ahead under the most trying circumstances for the common good. 

Despite  the  dedication  of  those  before  us,  there  are  still  significant  emergency 

communications problems that must be solved immediately. 

I cannot help but think that we are repeating history. We expected so much more 
4  years  after  the  September  11  tragedy.  Yet,  here  we  today,  asking  many  of  the 
same questions that we asked then: 

• Why is it that our first responders cannot communicate with each other? 
• How  dependent  are  our  communications  networks  on  the  availability  of  elec-

• Is security for critical infrastructure a necessary component for emergency pre-

trical power? 

paredness? 

• If  systems  fail,  what  backups  are  in  place,  and  how  quickly  is  the  response  in 

getting primary systems back online? 

• Are  there  baseline  critical  preparedness  standards  that  should  be  followed  by 

communications network providers? 

• What  will  it  take  to  ensure  that  the  equipment  and  facilities  are  hardened  to 

withstand a natural disaster? 

• Are we spending money on the wrong equipment? 
• With such focus on interoperability, have we neglected redundancy? 
In my view, the time for talk is over. The inability to effectively communicate dur-

ing the major disasters costs lives. We simply cannot repeat these failures. 

I look forward to the testimony of the witnesses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  One  of  the 
questions  that  I  want  to  ask  in  this  hearing  and  I  thank  you,  Mr. 
Chairman,  you’re  spot  on  that  we  examine  this,  is  how  can  we  as 
a  Nation  move  to  an  all  digital-based  communication  system  with 
an  integrated  and  resilient  9-1-1  emergency  system?  It  was  with 
this  thought  in  mind  that  Senator  Burns  and  I  introduced  a  bill  a 
couple  of  months  ago  that  would  ensure  that  the  people  who  use 
VoIP  phone  service  would  be  able  to  have  full  E–911  capabilities. 
Hurricane  Katrina  shows  that  it’s  time  for  the  Committee  to  con-
sider  this  bill.  We  had  a  personal  situation  several  months  ago,  in 
Florida,  where  someone  with  VoIP  had  an  emergency,  their  child 
was  desperately  ill  and,  of  course,  they  found  out,  unfortunately, 
that  they  did  not  have  9-1-1  service,  and  therefore  the  tragedy  en-
sued. 

Now,  with  regard  to  Hurricane  Katrina  we  saw  the  crippling  of 
the 9-1-1 system. Key centers were either knocked out by the water 
or  they  were  overloaded  with  calls  and  that  left  citizens  with  no 
way to call for help. But backup technology exists today to fix this 
problem. So I think it’s urgent that Congress act to make sure that 
9-1-1 calls go through in the case of future emergencies, and that’s 
what Senator Burns’ and my legislation addresses. Thank you, Mr. 
Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator Burns. 

STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator BURNS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for having this hear-
ing.  I  think  Senator  Nelson  makes  a  valid  point.  I  think  as  we 
move—now  calls  for  a  time  of  a  little  bit  of  wisdom  and  less  emo-
tion,  and  also  with  some  policy  that  has  been  sort  of  hanging  up 
and looking for a way to move forward. The transition to DTV and 
to  free  up  some  700  block  spectrum  is  necessary  at  this  time,  and 
I think as we move with that there comes into the question of Voice 
over  IP,  9-1-1,  enhanced  9-1-1.  I  would  hope  the  President  would 
see  fit  to  go  ahead  and  fund  these  communication  centers  so  that 
we can make those systems interoperable, and also 9-1-1 would be 
the—not  only  a  locator  service  but  also  the  emergency  number 
across  the  country.  And  you’re  right,  the  technology  is  there.  The 
policy  has  not  been  changed  so  that  we  can  move  that,  and  it  all 
hinges,  I  think,  on  how  we  transition  to  DTV  and  start  dealing 
with  that  700  block  spectrum.  We  need  to  move  on  that  and  come 
to some sort of a decision and policy to allow—when we talk about 
people  offering  video  services,  or  voice  services,  or  data,  we  don’t 
talk about that any more, we talk about bandwidth. Digital is ones 
and  zeros,  and  it  has  taken  all  kinds  of  identification  away  from 
anything  that  should  move  on  our  wires  or  wirelessly.  And  now 
we’ve got to understand that. More of us fall in the same rule book 
now than ever before, and I think with that transition we will talk 
about  that  policy  and  probably  come  to  some  sort  of  a,  I  would 
hope,  wise  decision,  set  the  policies,  that  knowing  all  of  the  stake-
holders  and  what’s  at  stake,  to  be  honest  with  you.  So  thank  you 
for this hearing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The CHAIRMAN. Senator McCain. 

4 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  thank  you  for 
holding this hearing, and as we discuss how Katrina impacted Lou-
isiana,  Alabama,  and  Mississippi  it’s  important  we  apply  the  les-
sons  we  learned  to  the  reconstruction  effort  in  New  Orleans,  and 
to  improve  the  telecommunication  infrastructure  of  other  cities. 
One lesson that we’re learning, and I hope our witnesses today will 
discuss  at  greater  length,  is  a  need  for  diversity  and  redundancy 
in  our  telecommunications  technologies.  One  sliver  of  good  that 
may  result  from  this  tragedy  is  that  cities  like  New  Orleans  may 
become proving grounds for new and diverse communications tech-
nologies.  Another  lesson  that  we  first  learned  four  years  ago  that 
was  highlighted  by  the  9/11  Commission  is  that  we  must  provide 
first  responders  with  the  spectrum  they  need  to  respond  to  cata-
strophic  events.  Recently,  Chairman  Keane  on  CNN  said  that, 
‘‘what’s  frustrating  is  it’s  the  same  thing  over  again.  I  mean,  how 
many  people  have  to  lose  their  lives?  It’s  lack  of  communication, 
our first responders not being able to talk to each other .
. Basi-
. if some of our recommenda-
cally, it’s many of the things that .
tions  had  been  passed  by  the  United  States  Congress  .
.  could 
have  been  avoided.’’  That’s  a  very  tough  indictment  from  the  Co- 
Chairmen of the 9/11 Commission. 

In  the  last  Congress,  I  introduced  legislation  to  implement  this 
recommendation, it was voted out of the Commerce Committee, and 
it  saw  no  further  action.  I  then  added  provisions  and  amendments 
to  the  intelligence  reform  bill  last  fall  to  provide  this  spectrum  to 
first  responders.  Unfortunately,  this  language  was  taken  out  in 
conference  and  replaced  with  a,  quote,  sense  of  the  Congress  that 
such  legislation  should  be  voted  out  during  the  first  session  of  the 
109th  Congress.  This  session  I  reintroduced  the  legislation  to  pro-
vide spectrum to first responders, still Congress has yet to act this 
year despite its stated intention to do so before the current session 
ends.  We’re  10  months  into  this  first  session,  and  it  has  almost 
been  a  month  since  Hurricane  Katrina,  but  the  Senate  has  yet  to 
take  up  any  legislating  providing  first  responders  their  spectrum. 
I  urge  us  to  take  up  the  Save  Lives  Act  as  soon  as  possible  so  we 
can  begin  the  process  of  giving  our  first  responders  the  essential 
tools  to  respond  to  national  catastrophes.  I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chair-
man,  for  holding  this  hearing—it’s  very  important—and  I  thank 
our witnesses including Chairman Martin. I thank you, Mr. Chair-
man. 

.

.

.

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Sununu. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  While  this  hearing 
is  going  to  cover  I  think  a  broad  swath  of  emergency-related  com-
munication  issues  like  spectrum,  I’m  particularly  interested  in  the 
current  issues  around  IP  voice.  Voice  over  IP  has  a  great  story  to 
tell.  I  think  coming  out  of  New  Orleans  we  see  that  the  story  is 
even stronger when it’s the only reliable source of connection avail-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

able  to  the  President  of  the  United  States,  people  ought  to  sit  up 
and  take  notice.  I  think  it’s  particularly  timely  because  we  have  a 
FCC  ruling  that  obviously  puts  down  a  hard  requirement  on  IP 
voice, and their compliance with emergency calling obligations. My 
concern  is  that,  given  all  the  talk  about  flexibility  and  innovation, 
if we start imposing hard requirements in a heavy-handed way we 
risk  either  discouraging  innovation  and  investment  in  this  par-
ticular area, or ending up without the diversity that everyone says 
they’re  so  interested  in.  There’s  no  question  that  IP  systems  gen-
erally are very robust, have unique features that allow them to re-
spond  to  certain  kinds  of  disruptions  in  networks  and  in  service, 
and that’s one of the reasons that communication was able to take 
place in New Orleans through an IP voice system. There was a rea-
sonably  well-written  article  in  The  Wall  Street  Journal  about  this 
very  point  and,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  unanimous  consent 
that we include that in the record. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

The Wall Street Journal, September 9, 2005 

CUT OFF:  AT CENTER OF CRISIS,  CITY OFFICIALS FACED STRUGGLE TO KEEP IN 
TOUCH;  MAYOR’S INNER-CIRCLE SPENT TWO DAYS IN THE DARK;  WEB PHONE BE-
CAME LIFELINE; POLICE CHIEF RIPS A SERVER FREE 

by Christopher Rhoads 

NEW  ORLEANS—For  days  after  Hurricane  Katrina’s  devastating  rampage 
through  this  city,  a  small  corps  of  city  leaders  holed  up  at  the  Hyatt  Hotel.  They 
had virtually no way to communicate with the outside world. 

A command center set up before the storm stopped working when the backup gen-
erator ran out of diesel fuel. Cellphone towers had been knocked out by high winds. 
Many land lines in the area were unusable. 

When  emergency  power  finally  returned  to  the  Hyatt,  Scott  Domke,  a  member  of 
the  city’s  technology  team,  remembered  that  he  had  recently  set  up  an  Internet 
phone  account  with  Vonage  Holdings  Corp.  He  was  able  to  find  a  working  socket 
in a conference room and linked his laptop to an Internet connection. 

At 12:27 a.m. on Wednesday, Aug. 31, the mayor’s inner circle made its first out-
side call in two days. Eventually, the team was able to get eight lines running from 
the single Vonage account. That evening, the phone rang and it was President Bush 
calling from Air Force One. 

During the first days of Katrina, the besieged mayor’s office struggled to stay con-
nected. It was forced to rely on ingenuity and extreme methods, including breaking 
in to an Office Depot—as the chief of police stood watch and chased away unofficial 
looters—to obtain necessary equipment. The Hyatt group would eventually be forced 
to  move  to  a  higher  floor  as  a  gang  intent  on  breaking  into  its  stockpile  of  food  as-
saulted the hotel. 

The tragedy has revealed many ways that the city was unprepared for the storm, 
flood  and  chaos  that  followed,  and  its  communications  system  was  no  exception. 
Greg  Meffert,  the  city’s  chief  technology  officer,  says  that  the  New  Orleans  emer-
gency  communication  plan  relied  heavily  on  basic  phone  service  remaining  intact. 
Cellphone backups also failed, and the few older model satellite phones lost battery 
power and couldn’t be recharged. But under duress, Mr. Meffert and his three-mem-
ber team also found creative ways to cope with the disaster. 

Hurricane  conditions  first  hit  the  city  on  Saturday,  Aug.  27.  Mr.  Meffert—whose 
hats  include  deputy  mayor,  the  mayor’s  right-hand  man  and  CTO—and  several  of 
his team and their families had decided the Hyatt, which is a couple of blocks from 
City Hall, was the best place to hunker down and establish communications for the 
storm.  The  hotel  was  better  served  with  power  and  food  than  the  city  command 
post.  With  the  mayor  and  some  other  officials,  including  the  chief  of  police,  they 
moved  into  some  conference  rooms  on  the  fourth  floor  and  figured  they’d  be  in  the 
hotel for a couple of nights at the most. 

Over the next two days, what remained of the city government that had not evac-
uated  before  the  storm—a  core  group  of  about  15  people—steadily  descended  into 
information darkness. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

By  the  time  the  eye  of  Katrina  made  landfall  that  Monday  morning,  the  group 
had  already  suffered  more  than  24  hours  of  hurricane-force  winds,  including  a  tor-
nado that ripped off part of one side of the hotel. 

‘‘When  the  tornado  rolled  over  us,  you  could  hear  a  weird  rumbling  sound,’’  re-
called  the  40-year-old  Mr.  Meffert  this  week,  sitting  unshaven  behind  his  desk  in 
City Hall in khaki shorts, a black T-shirt and white tennis sneakers. Army Rangers 
and  other  troops  ran  through  the  still  submerged  streets  below  his  window.  ‘‘You 
could hear the windows popping out like gunshots,’’ he said. 

Mr.  Meffert  says  phone  service  went  out  at  the  Hyatt  because  of  power  failures 
and  water  damage  to  the  hotel’s  main  switch.  After  that,  the  Hyatt  team’s  only 
available  means  of  communication  were  police  radios.  But  those  were  operating  at 
a  fraction  of  capacity  because  the  generator  serving  the  main  transmission  site 
broke down. Sometimes dozens of officers were trying to use one channel. 

For  the  most  part,  city  officials  relied  on  ‘‘human  chains  of  communication,’’  he 

says. ‘‘It was like: ‘Go tell so-and-so if you see them.’ ’’ 

The  team  slept  on  floors  and  tables  in  the  sweaty  conference  rooms.  Then  they 
figured  the  worst  was  over  and  that  communications—and  normality—would  soon 
return. 

Instead, the opposite happened. 
On Tuesday, the levee at the 17th Street Canal broke, and water poured into the 
city,  raising  the  water  level  by  a  foot  or  more  every  20  minutes,  Mr.  Meffert  esti-
mates. Within hours, nearby streets were submerged in more than 12 feet of water. 
Water  quickly  engulfed  the  Hyatt  and  surrounding  government  buildings.  Mr. 
Meffert and his team spent most of this day helping with rescue efforts, mostly from 
boats. ‘‘We were just pulling [people] from the water,’’ he says. 

Mr.  Meffert  evacuated  his  wife  and  two  young  boys  to  his  parents’  home  in  San 

Antonio. The evacuation party included the pregnant wife of the chief of police. 

That evening Mr. Meffert realized things would get worse unless communications 

were restored, immediately. 

That’s  when  Mr.  Domke  had  his  brainstorm.  For  the  next  five  days,  virtually  all 
communications  out  of  New  Orleans  by  the  city’s  top  officials  depended  on  Mr. 
Domke’s laptop and this single Internet phone account. 

Mr.  Meffert,  a  software  entrepreneur  before  he  joined  the  mayor’s  office  in  2002, 
realized he needed more lines and more phones to cope with a rapidly deteriorating 
situation.  Before  dawn  on  Wednesday,  Messrs.  Meffert  and  Domke  and  some  other 
aides drove a military Humvee into the darkness and devastation. They were accom-
panied by the chief of police, Eddie Compass. 

Their  destination  was  Office  Depot,  where  they  loaded  up  on  phones,  routers, 
printers  and  fax  machines—anything  that  was  needed  to  support  a  government 
under  siege  by  weather  and  crime.  The  store  had  already  been  looted  of  some  sup-
plies. While Mr. Meffert was looking for printer cartridges, several looters returned. 
Mr.  Compass,  the  police  chief,  roared  at  the  looters  and  chased  them  off,  says  Mr. 
Meffert. 

Mr.  Meffert  told  the  chief  he  needed  a  large  computer  server  for  e-mail.  They 

found the one used by Office Depot in its backroom. 

‘‘Do you really need this?’’ Mr. Meffert says the police chief asked him. 
‘‘Yes, we do,’’ Mr. Meffert says he replied. 
The server was screwed into an equipment rack in the backroom. Without the use 
of tools, the chief bent parts of the metal rack and ripped the server out of its hous-
ing with his hands, Mr. Meffert says, adding: ‘‘I have never seen that before.’’ 

The  team  was  sleeping  and  working  out  of  a  single  conference  room,  called  Bur-
gundy  D.  There  were  enough  cots  for  five  people.  Another  half-dozen  slept  on  the 
floor. In one corner, phones, routers, cables and other gear lay in a pile. Dirty blan-
kets and clothes were scattered about. 

On Wednesday evening, when Mr. Meffert was manning the phones, one rang. On 
the  other  end  was  President  Bush  in  Air  Force  One.  Mr.  Meffert,  now  wearing  the 
hat  of  secretary,  scribbled  down  the  number  and  sent  someone  to  find  Mayor  Ray 
Nagin. 

The  mayor  later  recounted  his  conversation  with  the  president  in  an  interview 
with  WWL–AM  on  Thursday.  ‘‘I  told  him  we  had  an  incredible  crisis  here  and  that 
his flying over in Air Force One does not do it justice,’’ the mayor said. 

Later  in  the  interview,  conducted  over  the  single  Hyatt  link,  the  mayor  blasted 
the response to date. ‘‘I need reinforcements, I need troops, man. I need 500 buses, 
man,’’ he said. 

On Thursday morning, Mr. Meffert’s team got word that 200 gang members were 
moving  on  the  Hyatt,  apparently  aware  that  it  still  had  food,  drink  and  power.  To 
signify that they were in the gang, members had made a distinguishing rip in their 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

shirts,  says  Mr.  Meffert.  An  elevated  walkway  from  the  Superdome  connects  to  a 
shopping arcade, which in turn connects to the Hyatt. 

Around 10 o’clock that morning, the team evacuated its fourth-floor command post 
for  the  27th  floor.  The  only  equipment  it  brought  along  was  a  handful  of  cordless 
phones, which had a range of 300 feet. On the 27th floor, where the mayor was stay-
ing,  the  phones  worked  only  if  the  user  hung  over  the  balcony  toward  the  atrium 
inside the building. 

‘‘This  was  when  the  last  parts  of  the  government  were  about  to  come  undone,’’ 
says  Mr.  Meffert.  ‘‘It  felt  like  the  Alamo—we  were  surrounded  and  had  only  short 
bursts of communication.’’ 

With  Police  Chief  Compass  and  other  officers  blocking  the  entrance,  looters  were 

not able to enter the Hyatt, Mr. Meffert says. 

At  the  same  time,  water  continued  to  rise  around  the  building.  Mr.  Domke  and 
Jimmy  Goodson,  an  aide  in  charge  of  security  for  the  team,  realized  that  the  elec-
tronics for the hotel—upon which the single communication link depended—were on 
the  ground  floor,  perilously  close  to  the  rising  water.  They  dispatched  members  of 
their group to throw sandbags around the electronics room. The water reached with-
in  three  inches  of  the  room  but  never  damaged  the  electronics,  Mr.  Meffert  says. 
New  Orleans  had  an  emergency  communications  plan,  but  it  had  serious  flaws. 
The  back-up  communications  of  the  city’s  Office  of  Emergency  Preparedness  con-
sisted  of  a  few  older-model  satellite  phones,  but  their  batteries  went  dead  and 
couldn’t be recharged, Mr. Meffert says. 

In  the  early  stages  of  the  storm,  the  city’s  emergency  command  office,  on  the 
ninth  floor  of  city  hall,  got  power  from  an  emergency  diesel  generator.  But  by  the 
time  the  hurricane  passed,  it  had  burned  up  about  one  third  of  its  fuel.  Fuel  soon 
ran out completely and couldn’t be replenished. 

Meantime, the commercial phone systems that the city relied on blinked out dur-
ing  the  storm  and  its  immediate  aftermath,  according  to  Mr.  Meffert.  Land  lines 
went  dead  in  part  because  of  switch  and  power  failures,  and  city-issued  cellphones 
stopped  working  after  towers  were  blown  down,  he  says.  BellSouth  Corp.  says  that 
its nearby telecom hub was operative throughout the crisis. 

Mr. Meffert says the satellite phones were used in the early stages, but their bat-
teries  soon  were  drained.  He  tried  to  recharge  one  phone,  but  it  wouldn’t  keep  the 
charge, he says. ‘‘It kept flashing ‘low bat,’ ’’ he recalls. 

Mr.  Meffert  says  that  the  city  was  unable  to  spend  more  on  emergency  commu-
nications because of a budget crisis and cuts in federal aid. But he doubts that addi-
tional  money  would  have  helped  much.  ‘‘Virtually  no  city  could  have  ever  prepared 
for something of this magnitude,’’ he says. 

When  Mr.  Meffert  arrived  at  the  mayor’s  office  in  2002,  budgets  were  calculated 
on  cheap  calculators,  he  says.  Out  of  70  major  cities  in  the  U.S.,  the  New  Orleans 
municipal website was ranked dead last that year in a quality survey. 

This  past  year,  Mr.  Meffert’s  team  constructed  an  innovative  surveillance  bubble 
over  the  city  consisting  of  cameras,  wireless  Internet  and  software  in  an  attempt 
to lower the city’s record murder rate. Though controversial with civil-rights groups, 
the system has nearly halved crime in the 20 percent of the city where it operates, 
says  Mr.  Meffert.  He  distributed  BlackBerrys  among  senior  ranks  in  the  govern-
ment, devices that proved invaluable in this crisis once e-mail resumed working late 
last week. 

In  the  middle  of  the  chaos  several  days  ago,  Mr.  Meffert  was  notified  that  the 
city’s  website  now  ranks  No.  1  of  those  70  major  U.S.  cities.  The  site  stayed  up 
throughout  the  storm  because  Mr.  Domke  was  able  to  shift  it  to  a  Dallas  server. 
Toward  the  end  of  last  week,  the  ‘‘cavalry’’  began  arriving,  says  Mr.  Meffert,  in 
the  form  of  several  thousand  walkie-talkie  phones  provided  by  Sprint  Nextel  Corp. 
The  phones  operate  directly  between  users  within  short  distances,  so  they  do  not 
require cell towers to transmit. 

At  the  same  time,  a  team  from  computer  supplier  Unisys  Corp.  arrived,  led  by 
an ex-Army Ranger named Ed Minyard. In addition to providing equipment to begin 
constructing  a  wireless  network  in  the  Hyatt  and  City  Hall,  Mr.  Minyard  brought 
some other supplies: bottles of Wild Turkey whiskey. 

‘‘We had the necessary provisions,’’ says Mr. Minyard. ‘‘These boys needed it.’’ 
Peter Grant in New York contributed to this article. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

Call Waiting 

• Sat., Aug. 27: City officials move into the Hyatt Hotel. 
• Aug.  28:  Cell  towers  go  down,  power  goes  out.  Many  land-lines  weren’t  usable. 

At 10 p.m., the Hyatt group loses all communications. 

• Aug. 29: Katrina makes landfall. 
• Aug.  30:  After  a  levee  breaks,  water  engulfs  the  Hyatt  and  some  government 

buildings. 

• Aug.  31:  City  officials  make  first  outside  call  in  more  than  two  days  at  12:27 

a.m. Top government communications depend on an Internet phone account. 
Source: Interviews with New Orleans city officials. 

Senator SUNUNU. As things sit right now we have an FCC order 
that  on  September  28,  IP  voice  customers  are  going  to  be  cut  off 
from  their  providers  if  they  don’t  fully  acknowledge  a  notification 
from  their  providers,  and  while  the  intent  of  this  is  naturally  to 
make  sure  that  customers  have  access  to  emergency  service,  I 
think  most  people  exercising  common  sense  would  agree  there  are 
also safety risks and personal risks associated with someone being 
cut  off  from  their  voice  or  any  other  communications  provider.  We 
all understand the way the world works and consumers work, they 
may  not  be  aware  of  the  issues  associated  with  this  ruling,  and 
their safety may be in much greater jeopardy having suddenly lost 
their  service  than  their  safety  would  ever  be  improved  by  having 
access  to  emergency  service.  We  all  want  people  to  have  access  to 
emergency  calling  service,  but  one  of  the  great  values  of  IP  tech-
nology  and  wireless  technology,  more  broadly,  is  that  it  can  com-
municate  with  people  when  they  are  on  the  move,  on  the  go,  and 
that  has  a  inherent  value  to  their  safety  and  security,  regardless 
of  whether  or  not  their  provider  knows  their  location  24  hours  a 
day.  The  fact  that  you  can  call  from  remote  locations,  in  and  of 
itself, provides a great enhancement to safety. These are the issues 
that  we  need  to  balance  in  making  any  new  rulings  about  E–911. 
I know the Chairman is fully aware of these concerns and I’m sure 
Chairman  Martin  is  fully  able  to  address  his  thinking  on  the  rul-
ing,  but  I  want  to  emphasize  that  we  need  to  be  very  cautious.  I 
think  we  need  to  consider  allowing  a  good  deal  more  flexibility  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
s
w

j

9 

implementing  emergency  services,  so  that  in  the  long  run  we  have 
the  kind  of  flexibility,  diversity,  and  innovation  the  industry  de-
serves. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Ben Nelson. 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I  want  to 
thank  all  the  witnesses  from  the  panels  who  are  going  to  be  here 
today.  I’m  going  to  be  brief.  Clearly  the  devastation  of  Hurricane 
Katrina  has  given  us  a  very  clear  picture  of  those  things  that  per-
haps  went  right,  and  those  things  that  didn’t  go  right,  and  those 
lessons  that  we  can  learn  are  going  to  be  critical  not  so  much  to 
deal  with  the  past  hurricanes,  or  even  the  current  hurricane,  be-
cause  of  the  time  factor,  but  for  the  future  and  for  the  future  of 
any  other  kind  of  disaster,  manmade  or  natural,  we  need  to  know 
the lessons that we’re learning and how to put them in place. 

I  hope  this  hearing,  for  example,  will  shed  some  light  on  what 
measures of what were taken to mitigate the damage from the dis-
aster  that  worked,  as  well  as  what  we  should  be  focusing  on  in 
preparation  for  future  disasters.  No  one  should  believe  that  every-
thing  went  wrong,  and  no  one  should  believe  that  there  aren’t 
changes that could be made, but what we must hear from the wit-
nesses today and others, is what we need to do to facilitate without 
frustrating  technology,  capability  as  well  as  the  willingness  of  the 
industry  to  be  able  to  take  care  of  its  own  needs  so  that  commu-
nication can occur before, during, and after any kind of natural dis-
aster. 

So  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  look  forward  to 

the testimony today. Thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  For  the  Committee’s  in-
formation our DTV bill will provide spectrum to first responders as 
soon  as  the  broadcasters  move.  It’s  intended  that  they  will  get  24 
MHz.  We’ll  mark  that  up  in  October  in  compliance  with  the  rec-
onciliation instructions the Committee has received from the Budg-
et  Committee,  and  the  budget  committee  will  mark  it  up  on  Octo-
ber  25.  It  is  our  intention  that  all  communications  will  provide  E– 
911,  including  VoIP,  and  we  will  provide  the  authority  that  the 
FCC needs to carry out, I believe, that desire. 

Chairman  Martin,  for  myself  I’ll  tell  you  we’re  very  proud  of 
what you’re doing. I think you’ve demonstrated tremendous leader-
ship during this disaster period with your emergency orders which 
we—I don’t think any of us have any criticism at all of what you’ve 
done.  We  urge  you  to  let  us  know  if  there’s  any  further  authority 
you  need.  We’d  be  pleased  to  provide  you  whatever  you  think  you 
need,  but  we  thank  you  also  for  coming  this  morning.  We’re 
pleased to hear your statement now. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  for  that  per-
sonal  note  of  support  for  the  Commission’s  efforts.  I  appreciate 
that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Good  morning,  Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and 
members of the Committee. I appreciate the opportunity to be with 
you  today.  As  we  all  know  Hurricane  Katrina  devastated  the  Gulf 
Coast.  People  lost  their  homes,  their  businesses,  and  even  their 
lives. Our hearts go out to all the survivors who are now struggling 
to put their lives back together. 

My  statement  focuses  on  the  effects  of  the  hurricane  on  the  Na-
tion’s  communications  infrastructure.  First,  I  will  briefly  discuss 
the  immediate  impact  on  communications  services  in  the  area  and 
provide  a  status  report.  Second,  I  will  describe  the  steps  the  Fed-
eral  Communications  Commission  has  taken  to  facilitate  the  res-
toration of service and to provide support for evacuees. And, finally, 
I  will  offer  some  initial  lessons  learned  from  this  terrible  tragedy. 
The destruction of the facilities of the communications companies 
in  the  region  and,  therefore,  the  services  upon  which  citizens  rely, 
was  extraordinary.  Almost  three  million  customer  telephone  lines 
were  knocked  down  in  the  Louisiana,  Mississippi,  and  Alabama 
areas. 

As  you  can  see  on  this  first  chart  the  most  significant  damage 
was in the region colored red. The next most hard-hit area, colored 
yellow,  reached  out  more  than  a  100  miles  from  where  this  storm 
first landed. And even the area in green above that sustained mod-
erate  damage.  As  you  can  see  from  this,  just  the  size  of  the  area 
demonstrates  how  far-reaching  Katrina’s  impact  was.  In  addition 
38 9-1-1 call centers also went down. 

As  you  can  see  in  this  chart  the  area  in  blue  reflects  the  exten-
sive  areas  and  locations  where  Hurricane  Katrina  knocked  out  9- 
1-1  call  centers,  and  the  area  in  red  indicates  where  the  call  cen-
ters remain out today, almost all of those in the New Orleans area. 
In  addition  to  the  wireline  issues,  facilities  with  damaged  local 
wireless  networks  also  sustained  considerable  damage,  with  more 
than 1,000 cell sites out of service. 

As you can see in this next chart, over 20 million telephone calls 
did  not  go  through  the  day  after  the  hurricane.  The  number  of 
failed  calls  peaked  that  day,  and  then  slowly  decreased  daily  as 
service  began  to  be  restored.  We  also  estimate  that  approximately 
100 broadcast stations were knocked off-the-air. 

This  chart  follows  the  outages  and  the  restoration  of  radio  sta-
tions.  You  can  see  that  the  percent  of  radio  stations  on-the-air  in 
the  Gulf  Coast  region  fell  to  just  over  20  percent  on  the  day  after 
the  hurricane,  and  since  then  stations  have  been  coming  back  on- 
the-air  each  day.  And,  finally,  hundreds  of  thousands  of  cable  cus-
tomers  also  lost  service.  Now,  as  a  result  of  these  service  outages 
it was extremely difficult for hundreds of thousands of people to re-
ceive news and emergency information and communicate with their 
loved  ones.  Emergency  workers  and  public  officials  had  difficulty 
coordinating,  and  it  is  at  times  like  these  that  we  are  reminded  of 
the importance of being able to communicate. 

Fortunately, the work to restore communication service began al-
most immediately, and while considerable work remains to be done, 
the  companies  in  the  region  have  made  meaningful  progress.  They 
have  overcome  significant  obstacles,  including  flooding,  lack  of 
power, and dwindling fuel resources for generators. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Now,  to  the  best  of  our  knowledge,  here  is  the  current  status. 
This chart demonstrates the spike in the number of customers who 
were  out  of  service  which,  again,  fell  precipitously  about  a  week 
after the hurricane. Approximately 2.5 million customer lines have 
been restored leaving a little over 300 thousand customers still out 
of service. 

The  35  9-1-1  centers  have  also  been  restored,  but  again  three  in 
Louisiana  remain  out  of  service.  And  as  you  can  see  in  this  chart 
the  sustained  damage  kept  many  call  centers  out  of  operation  for 
almost  nine  days.  All  wireless  switching  centers  in  the  affected 
area  are  now  operational,  and  over  1000  cell  sites  have  been  re-
stored. 

And  as  you  can  see  in  this  chart  where  out  of  service  sites  are 
marked in red, approximately 600 sites still out of service are con-
centrated  within  the  surrounding  New  Orleans  area.  The  size  of 
the graph indicates the size of each individual market, and the pur-
ple color slices indicate where cell sites were knocked out of service 
but have come back into operation. You can also see that cell sites 
were actually knocked out as far North as Hattiesburg. 

And,  finally,  as  this  next  chart  shows,  almost  70  percent  of  the 
TV  stations  in  the  affected  area  were  knocked  off-the-air  the  day 
after the hurricane. Since then, TV stations have been coming back 
on-the-air slowly and today only four remain off-the-air. 

Now,  fortunately,  satellite  service  providers  did  not  experience 
damage  to  their  infrastructure.  They  have  helped  bridge  some  of 
the  gaps  left  by  these  other  outages.  They  have  provided  satellite 
phones  and  video  links  to  law  enforcement  officials,  medical  per-
sonnel, emergency relief personnel, and news outlets. 

The  Commission  has  devoted  significant  time  and  resources  to 
enable first responders to communicate, and to help facilitate com-
panies’  ability  to  quickly  restore  services  in  the  region.  We  have 
granted  over  70  special  temporary  authority  requests  and  more 
than  a  100  temporary  frequency  authorizations.  For  example,  we 
allowed  law  enforcement  authorities  to  use  an  ultra-wideband  im-
aging  system  to  locate  hurricane  victims  underneath  the  rubble. 
The  Commission  waived  numerous  rules  to  enable  telephone  com-
panies to reroute traffic, disconnect and reconnect lines, and switch 
long-distance providers so the consumer’s phone calls could still get 
through.  And  from  the  beginning  the  Commission  has  reached  out 
to  impacted  industries,  often  numerous  times  a  day,  to  identify 
their  needs  to  pass  information  along  to  the  Federal  Emergency 
Management Agency and the National Communication System. 

And,  finally,  we  have  facilitated  disaster  relief  efforts  and  fund- 
raising efforts, for example, by temporarily reassigning the toll free 
800 number, 1–800–RED–CROSS, to the American Red Cross. And 
last  week  I  also  announced  my  intention  for  the  Commission  to 
take three additional actions, in an effort to continue to provide im-
mediate  relief  to  consumers  and  businesses  and  to  enhance  the 
Commission’s planning and response efforts. 

First,  I  proposed  to  provide  $211  million  in  Universal  Service 
funding  to  the  disaster  area.  For  all  people  eligible  for  FEMA  dis-
aster  assistance,  we’ll  provide  support  for  wireless  handsets  in  a 
package  of  300  free  minutes.  We  will  also  allow  public  and  non-
profit healthcare providers, including the American Red Cross shel-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

ters,  to  apply  for  support  of  their  telecommunications  needs.  We 
will use the E-Rate Program to help reconnect schools and libraries 
throughout  the  region,  and  we  will  allow  carriers  to  use  the  High 
Cost Program to prioritize rebuilding facilities damaged by the hur-
ricane. 

Second, I am also establishing an independent expert panel com-
posed of public safety and communications industry representatives 
that  will  be  charged  with  reviewing  the  impact  of  Hurricane 
Katrina on the communications infrastructure in the affected area. 
And,  third,  I  announced  my  intention  to  create  a  new  Public 
Safety/Homeland  Security  Bureau  that  will  develop  policies  and 
rules  to  promote  effective  and  reliable  communications  for  public 
safety, national security, and disaster management. 

While there is still much work for the Commission to do to facili-
tate  the  restoration  of  services  in  the  Gulf  Coast,  I  think  it  is  im-
portant that we take the time to learn from this tragedy. We need 
to  assess  what  worked,  what  did  not,  and  what  the  Commission 
should do now to make our communications networks more robust. 
And I have three initial suggestions. First, we should ensure that 
the  public  has  the  tools  necessary  to  know  when  an  emergency  is 
coming  and  to  contact  first  responders.  This  should  involve  three 
steps. We should have a comprehensive alert system that allows of-
ficials at the national, State, and local levels to reach affected citi-
zens  in  the  most  effective  and  efficient  manner  possible.  It  should 
incorporate the Internet, which was designed by the military for its 
robust  network  redundancy  functionalities  and  other  advances  in 
technology,  so  that  officials  can  reach  large  numbers  of  people  si-
multaneously through different communications media. 

We  also  need  to  ensure  that  providers  comply  with  our  9-1-1 
rules. The 9-1-1 system is critical to our Nation’s ability to respond 
to  a  host  of  crises.  The  obligation  to  provide  access  to  emergency 
operators should not be optional for any service provider regardless 
of whether that provider is wireless, wireline, cable, or VoIP. 

We  also  should  ensure  that  Public  Safety  Answering  Points  are 
redundant. Hurricane Katrina severed communication links to mul-
tiple  PSAPs,  the  key  facilities  that  handle  those  local  emergency 
and  first  responder  calls.  Going  forward,  we  need  to  establish  re-
dundant  routing  that  will  help  create  a  more  resilient  network  to 
aid public safety. 

Second,  I  suggest  we  enable  first  responders  to  communicate 
seamlessly. First responders need an interoperable mobile wireless 
communication  system  that  can  be  rapidly  deployed  anywhere  in 
the country. Such a system must have two essential features. 

First,  the  system  must  be  interoperable.  It  must  allow  different 
organizations from different jurisdictions to communicate with each 
other immediately through both voice and data transmissions. This 
requires  that  there  be  sufficient  spectrum  devoted  to  these  pur-
poses.  It  also  requires  that  first  responders  have  equipment  capa-
ble of operating on multiple frequencies in multiple formats so that 
different  systems  can  connect  with  each  other.  Properly  imple-
mented, a system with adequate spectrum and smart radios would 
help  to  ensure  that  both  data  and  voice  are  transmitted  between 
agencies  instantly,  replacing  multiple  lengthy  phone  calls  to  mul-
tiple agencies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Second, the system must be capable of rapid deployment and res-
toration. This requires the use of multiple flexible technologies and 
a  truly  mobile  infrastructure.  If  we  learned  anything  from  Hurri-
cane Katrina it is that we cannot rely solely on terrestrial commu-
nications.  When  radio  towers  are  knocked  down,  satellite  commu-
nications may be the most effective means of communicating. Addi-
tionally,  mobile  antennas  should  be  used  to  establish  communica-
tions  quickly.  Smart  radios  can  enable  first  responders  to  find 
available  towers  or  infrastructure  on  multiple  frequencies.  WiFi  or 
spread  spectrum  technologies  and  other  frequency  hopping  tech-
niques  can  enable  them  to  use  limited  spectrum  quickly  and  effi-
ciently.  A  system  taking  advantage  of  such  measures  would  be  ca-
pable of truly rapid deployment. 

My third suggestion is to enhance network resiliency. We should 
ensure that all communication providers develop and adhere to the 
best  practices  to  ensure  reliability  in  the  event  of  a  disaster  and 
quick  restoration  of  services  and  facilities  in  the  event  of  a  service 
disruption.  We  also  should  take  full  advantage  of  IP-based  tech-
nologies  to  enhance  the  resiliency  of  traditional  communications 
networks. IP technology provides the dynamic capability to change 
and  reroute  telecommunications  traffic  within  the  network.  In  the 
event  of  a  systems  failure  within  the  traditional  network,  greater 
use  of  these  technologies  will  enable  service  providers  to  restore 
service more quickly and to provide the flexibility to initiate service 
and new locations chosen by the customer. 

In conclusion, I look forward to working cooperatively with Mem-
bers  of  this  Committee,  other  Senators,  the  House  of  Representa-
tives,  and  my  colleagues  at  the  Commission  to  achieve  the  goals 
outlined  above.  We  would  appreciate  any  guidance  you  may  have 
on  these  issues.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify,  and  I 
would be happy to answer any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Chairman Martin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Introduction 

Good  morning,  Chairman  Stevens,  Chairman  Inouye,  and  members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  with  you  today.  As  we  all  know,  Hurri-
cane  Katrina  devastated  the  Gulf  Coast.  People  lost  their  homes,  their  businesses, 
and  even  their  lives.  Our  hearts  go  out  to  all  of  the  survivors  who  are  now  strug-
gling with putting their lives back together. 

My  statement  focuses  on  the  effects  of  the  hurricane  on  the  nation’s  communica-
tions  infrastructure.  First,  I  will  briefly  discuss  the  immediate  impact  on  commu-
nications  services  in  the  area  and  provide  a  status  report  on  the  extent  to  which 
services  have  been  restored.  Second,  I  will  describe  the  steps  the  Federal  Commu-
nications  Commission  has  taken  both  to  facilitate  the  restoration  of  service  and  to 
provide  support  for  evacuees.  Finally,  I  will  offer  some  initial  lessons  learned  from 
this terrible tragedy. 
Impact on Communications Infrastructure 

The  destruction  to  the  facilities  of  the  communications  companies  in  the  region, 
and  therefore  the  services  upon  which  citizens  rely,  was  extraordinary.  More  than 
three  million  customer  telephone  lines  were  knocked  down  in  the  Louisiana,  Mis-
sissippi,  and  Alabama  areas.  Significant  damage  was  inflicted  both  on  the  wireline 
switching  centers  that  route  calls  and  on  the  lines  used  to  connect  buildings  and 
customers to the network. Thirty-eight 9-1-1 call centers went down. Local wireless 
networks  also  sustained  considerable  damage,  with  more  than  one  thousand  cell 
sites out of service. Over 20 million telephone calls did not go through the day after 
the  hurricane.  While  we  were  not  able  to  contact  every  station  in  the  immediate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

aftermath, we estimate that approximately 100 broadcast stations were knocked off- 
the-air.  Hundreds  of  thousands  of  cable  customers  lost  service.  As  a  result,  it  was 
extremely  difficult  for  hundreds  of  thousands  of  people  to  receive  news  and  emer-
gency  information  and  to  communicate  with  their  loved  ones.  Emergency  workers 
and public safety officials had difficulty coordinating. 

It was at times like these that we were reminded of the importance of being able 
to  communicate.  While  no  communications  network  could  be  expected  to  remain 
fully  operational  in  the  face  of  a  direct  hit  from  a  Category  4  or  5  hurricane,  that 
fact was little consolation to the people on the ground. 

Fortunately,  the  work  to  restore  communications  services  began  almost  imme-
diately.  While  considerable  problems  remain,  the  companies  in  the  region  have 
made  meaningful  progress.  They  have  overcome  significant  obstacles—including 
flooding, lack of power, dwindling fuel resources for generators, and security—to re-
build,  reconnect,  and  broadcast.  Three  radio  stations  in  New  Orleans  continued  to 
operate throughout the storm, and a fourth resumed operations within several hours 
of losing power. Wireline carriers were able to begin restoring service within 5 days, 
with  significant  improvement  accomplished  within  a  week.  Wireless  carriers  began 
to  restore  service  within  2  days  and  achieved  substantial  improvement  by  the  first 
weekend. These extraordinary efforts are being performed by the employees of these 
companies, many of whom have suffered their own personal losses, yet still continue 
to work to restore services to all. 

To the best of our knowledge, the current status is as follows: 
Wireline.  Approximately  2,500,000  customer  lines  have  been  restored,  leaving 
301,000 customer lines still out of service (268,000 in Louisiana and 33,000 in Mis-
sissippi). Thirty-five 9-1-1 call centers have been restored; three in Louisiana remain 
out of service. 

Wireless. All wireless switching centers in the affected areas are operational. Over 
one thousand cell sites have been restored. Approximately 600 cell sites continue to 
be  out  of  service,  the  majority  within  New  Orleans  and  other  areas  of  Louisiana. 
BellSouth has committed its facilities in New Orleans to wireless providers to make 
restoration of wireless service a priority. 

Broadcast.  Three  television  stations  have  come  back  on-the-air;  four  remain  off- 
the-air.  Although  we  cannot  determine  exactly  how  many  radio  stations  have  been 
restored, we do know that only 36 stations remain off-the-air. 

Cable.  We  cannot  estimate  how  many  customers  have  had  their  cable  service  re-
stored since the hurricane. We do know that approximately 143,000 customers have 
had  their  service  restored  in  the  last  2  weeks,  and  that  approximately  280,000  re-
main without service. 

Satellite.  Fortunately,  satellite  service  providers  did  not  experience  damage  to 
their infrastructure. They have helped to bridge some of the gaps left by the outages 
by  providing  satellite  phones  and  video  links  to  law  enforcement  officials,  medical 
personnel,  emergency  relief  personnel,  and  news  outlets.  Additionally,  direct  broad-
cast satellite providers provided equipment to over 100 shelters so that evacuees can 
receive critical information—as well as entertainment—from television. 
Commission Actions to Support Restoration 

The  Commission  has  devoted  significant  time  and  resources  to  enable  first  re-
sponders to communicate and to facilitate companies’ ability to quickly restore serv-
ices  in  the  region.  On  August  30,  the  Commission  established  an  internal  Task 
Force  to  coordinate  hurricane  response  efforts.  The  Task  Force’s  activities  centered 
around three major goals: (1) Regulatory Relief for Industries; (2) Industry Outreach 
and Coordination with Other Federal Agencies; and (3) Assistance to consumers and 
evacuees.  Hundreds  of  FCC  employees  have  been  directly  involved  in  these  efforts. 
The  Commission  stayed  open  late  every  day,  7  days  a  week,  for  3  weeks  following 
the  hurricane  in  order  to  assist  consumers,  the  industries,  and  other  Federal  agen-
cies.  I  am  extremely  proud  of  the  efforts  and  dedication  of  the  FCC  staff  that  have 
helped us in this endeavor. 
Summary of Commission Actions 

The  Commission  has  taken  a  number  of  steps  to  cut  bureaucratic  ‘‘red  tape.’’  Al-
though  a  thorough  discussion  of  the  Commission’s  actions  can  be  found  in  the  ap-
pendix, I will discuss a few here. Almost immediately after the hurricane subsided, 
the Commission notified all communications providers of expedited treatment for re-
quests of special temporary authority (STA). We have granted over 70 STA requests 
and  more  than  100  temporary  frequency  authorizations  for  emergency  workers,  or-
ganizations, and companies to provide wireless and broadcast service in the affected 
areas  and  shelters  around  the  country.  In  most  cases  these  requests  were  granted 
within  4  hours,  with  all  requests  approved  within  24  hours.  The  Commission  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

leased several public notices and quickly adopted orders to provide temporary relief, 
and  we  waived  numerous  rules  to  enable  telephone  companies  to  re-route  traffic, 
disconnect  and  reconnect  lines,  and  switch  long-distance  providers  so  that  con-
sumers’  phone  calls  can  get  through.  We  have  extended  filing  deadlines,  construc-
tion  requirements,  and  discontinuance  of  service  rules  for  wireless  licensees  in  the 
affected areas. 

From the beginning, the Commission has reached out to the impacted industries— 
often  numerous  times  a  day—to  identify  their  needs  to  pass  along  to  the  Federal 
Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) and the National Communications System 
(NCS).  The  Commission  provides  the  critical  information  about  the  necessary  re-
sources to FEMA and NCS, who are responsible for ensuring that priority needs are 
met, and we update FEMA and NCS daily on these evolving needs. 

In  addition,  critical  information  on  operational  status  of  communications  compa-
nies  is  transmitted  on  a  daily  basis  to  the  National  Coordinating  Center  (NCC)  for 
its  Situation  Reports.  The  Commission  also  has  been  coordinating  with  the  Inter-
agency  Coordinating  Council  on  Individuals  with  Disabilities,  organized  by  the  De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security,  to  ensure  that  the  needs  of  the  disability  commu-
nity are addressed in the coordinated Federal relief efforts. 

Finally, the Commission has worked closely with the communications industry to 
help  identify  resources  for  use  by  disaster  response  personnel.  The  Agency  both 
transmits  this  information  to  NCC  and  facilitates  industry’s  communication  with 
other  Federal  officials.  For  example,  we  granted  an  STA  to  Time  Domain  for  an 
ultra-wideband  through-the-wall  imaging  system  to  help  law  enforcement  authori-
ties  locate  hurricane  victims,  and  special  temporary  authority  was  granted  to  Intel 
to  set  up  WiMax  broadband  communications  systems  to  provide  Internet  service  at 
Red Cross relief centers. 

Consumers in the Gulf Coast, and evacuees to other areas, also need information 
and  assistance,  and  the  Commission  has  worked  to  provide  that  support.  We  have 
manned  our  toll-free  consumer  line  7  days  a  week  to  help  individuals  get  access  to 
critical information about telecommunications and broadcast services in the affected 
area.  Consumers,  industry,  and  other  agencies  also  can  access  the  Commission’s 
special  webpage  that  provides  information  on  all  of  the  Commission’s  actions,  and 
provide other valuable information. Finally, we have facilitated disaster relief efforts 
and fundraising efforts by temporarily reassigning the toll free 800–number ‘‘1–800– 
RED–CROSS’’  to  the  National  Chapter  of  the  American  Red  Cross,  as  well  as  pro-
viding temporary waivers to non-commercial radio and TV stations that wish to air 
Hurricane Katrina fundraising programming. 
Proposal for Next Steps 

Last week, I announced my intention for the Commission to take three major ac-
tions  in  an  effort  to  continue  to  provide  immediate  relief  to  consumers  and  busi-
nesses, and to enhance the Commission’s planning and response efforts. 
(1) Provide Over $200 Million of Immediate Relief to the Affected Areas 

First,  I  proposed  to  provide  $211  million  in  universal  service  funding  to  the  dis-
aster area. We will work through four existing programs to provide this support. We 
will use the Low Income Program to help those who have been cutoff to reestablish 
their  lines  of  communication.  For  all  people  eligible  for  FEMA  disaster  assistance, 
we  will  provide  support  for  wireless  handsets  and  a  package  of  300  free  minutes 
for  evacuees  and  people  still  in  the  affected  area  without  telephone  service.  For  all 
people eligible for FEMA disaster assistance, we also will provide support to pay the 
costs  of  reconnecting  consumers  to  the  network  as  the  disaster-struck  area  is  re-
built. 

Through  the  Rural  Health  Care  Program,  we  will  support  those  individuals  pro-
viding  emergency  healthcare  services  in  the  region.  We  will  allow  public  and  non-
profit healthcare providers, including American Red Cross shelters, to apply for sup-
port  of  their  telecommunications  needs.  We  will  increase  discounts  from  25  percent 
to  50  percent  for  qualified  providers  in  the  area.  To  speed  the  delivery  of  support, 
we will modify the filing window for this Funding Year to allow healthcare providers 
to submit new or revised applications. 

We  will  use  the  E-Rate  Program  to  help  reconnect  schools  and  libraries  through-
out  the  region.  We  will  open  a  new  Funding  Year  2005  filing  window  for  schools 
and  libraries  affected  by  the  hurricane.  We  will  treat  schools  and  libraries  struck 
by the hurricane at the highest level of priority (90 percent) for Funding Years 2005 
and  2006.  The  Commission  can  authorize  $96  million  in  E-rate  funds  for  the  ap-
proximately 600 schools and libraries in Louisiana, Mississippi, and Alabama hit by 
the  hurricane.  We  will  also  allow  schools  and  libraries  serving  evacuees  to  amend 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

their Funding Year 2005 applications to account for the unexpected increase in pop-
ulation. 

Finally, we will allow carriers to use the High Cost Program to prioritize rebuild-
ing facilities damaged by the hurricane. We will allow telephone companies greater 
flexibility to use USF support to prioritizing rebuilding wire-centers affected by the 
hurricane. 
(2)  Examine  Ways  To  Improve  Network  Reliability  and  Public  Safety  Communica-

tions in Times of Crisis 

Second,  I  am  establishing  an  independent  expert  panel  composed  of  public  safety 
and  communications  industry  representatives  that  will  be  charged  with  reviewing 
the  impact  of  Hurricane  Katrina  on  the  communications  infrastructure  in  the  af-
fected  area.  The  panel  will  make  recommendations  to  the  Commission  regarding 
ways  to  improve  disaster  preparedness,  network  reliability,  and  communication 
among  first  responders  such  as  police,  fire  fighters,  and  emergency  medical  per-
sonnel. 
(3)  Create  a  New  FCC  Bureau  To  Better  Coordinate  Our  Planning  and  Response 

Efforts When Disaster Strikes 

Third, I announced my intention to create a new Public Safety/Homeland Security 
Bureau.  The  Bureau  will  coordinate  public  safety,  national  security,  and  disaster 
management  activities  within  the  FCC.  The  Bureau  will  develop  policies  and  rules 
to promote effective and reliable communications for public safety, national security, 
and disaster management. It will have responsibility for issues including: 

• Public Safety Communications, including 911 centers and first responders 
• Priority Emergency Communications 
• Alert and Warning of U.S. Citizens 
• Continuity of Government Operations 
• Disaster  Management  Coordination  (i.e.,  infrastructure  reporting  and  analysis 
• Disaster Management Outreach 
• Communications Infrastructure Protection 
• Network Reliability and Interoperability 
• Network Security 

in times of disaster) 

Lessons Learned 

While  there  is  still  much  work  for  the  Commission  to  do  to  facilitate  the  restora-
tion  of  services  in  the  Gulf  Coast,  I  think  it  is  important  that  we  take  the  time  to 
learn  from  this  tragedy  in  order  to  improve  our  ability  to  serve  the  public  in  the 
event  of  another  disaster.  We  need  to  assess  what  worked,  what  did  not,  and  what 
the  Commission  should  do  now  to  make  our  communications  networks  more  robust 
in the future. The planned expert panel will be tasked with answering some of these 
questions, but for now, I have three suggestions. 
(1) Ensure That the Public Has the Tools Necessary To Know When an Emergency 

Is Coming and To Contact First Responders 

We  should  take  three  steps  to  help  ensure  that  the  public  has  these  critical  and 
life-saving tools. First, we should have a comprehensive alert system that allows of-
ficials  at  the  national,  State  and  local  levels  to  reach  affected  citizens  in  the  most 
effective  and  efficient  manner  possible.  It  should  incorporate  the  Internet,  which 
was designed by the military for its robust network redundancy functionalities, and 
other  advances  in  technology  so  that  officials  can  reach  large  numbers  of  people  si-
multaneously through different communications media. 

Second, we need to ensure that all providers comply with our 9-1-1 rules. The 911 
system  is  quite  literally  one  of  life  or  death.  It  is  critical  to  our  nation’s  ability  to 
respond to a host of crises. The Commission has been working hard to minimize the 
likelihood of situations where users are unable to access it. The obligation to provide 
access to emergency operators should be not optional for any telephone service pro-
vider—regardless of whether that provider is wireless, wireline, cable, or VoIP. 

Third, we should ensure that Public Safety Answering Points (PSAPs) are redun-
dant.  Hurricane  Katrina  severed  communications  links  to  multiple  Public  Safety 
Answering  Points  (PSAPs),  the  key  facilities  that  handle  local  emergency  and  first 
responder  calls.  Going  forward,  we  need  to  establish  a  process  to  work  with  states 
and municipalities to improve the redundancy of critical communications links that 
serve PSAPs. As part of this effort, the Federal Government should take a lead role 
to  facilitate  and  encourage  cooperation  among  local  jurisdictions  to  address  mutual 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

restoration and redundant routing that will help create a more resilient network to 
aid public safety first responders. 
(2) Enable First Responders To Communicate Seamlessly 

First  responders  need  an  interoperable,  mobile  wireless  communications  system 
that  can  be  rapidly  deployed  anywhere  in  the  country.  Such  a  system  must  have 
two  essential  features.  First,  the  system  must  be  interoperable—it  must  allow  dif-
ferent organizations from different jurisdictions to communicate with each other im-
mediately,  through  both  voice  and  data  transmissions.  This  requires  that  there  be 
sufficient spectrum devoted to these purposes. And, equally importantly, it requires 
that  first  responders  have  equipment  capable  of  operating  on  multiple  frequencies 
in multiple formats, so that different systems can connect with each other. So-called 
‘‘smart  radios’’  are  ideally  suited  to  this  purpose,  as  they  can  intelligently  jump  to 
different  frequencies  and  formats  as  needed  to  establish  communications.  Properly 
implemented, a system with adequate spectrum and smart radios would help to en-
sure that both data and voice are transmitted between agencies instantly, replacing 
multiple, lengthy phone calls to multiple agencies. 

Second,  the  system  must  be  capable  of  rapid  deployment  and/or  restoration.  This 
requires  the  use  of  multiple,  flexible  technologies  and  truly  mobile  infrastructure. 
If  we  learned  anything  from  Hurricane  Katrina,  it  is  that  we  cannot  rely  solely  on 
terrestrial communications. When radio towers are knocked down, satellite commu-
nications are, in some instances, the most effective means of communicating. At the 
same time, we should use new technologies so that first responders can take advan-
tage  of  whatever  terrestrial  network  is  available.  Smart  radios  would  enable  first 
responders  to  find  any  available  towers  or  infrastructure  on  multiple  frequencies, 
and  WiFi,  spread  spectrum  and  other  frequency  hopping  techniques  would  enable 
them  to  use  limited  spectrum  quickly  and  efficiently.  Additionally,  mobile  anten-
nas—for  both  satellite  and  terrestrial  technology—should  be  used  to  establish  com-
munications  as  quickly  as  possible.  This  could  include  inflatable  antennas,  anten-
nas-on-wheels,  or  other  mobile  facilities.  A  system  taking  advantage  of  such  meas-
ures would be capable of truly rapid deployment. 
(3) Enhance Network Resiliency 

We  should  ensure  that  all  communications  providers  develop  and  adhere  to  best 
practices  to  ensure  reliability  in  the  event  of  a  disaster  and  quick  restoration  of 
service  and  facilities  in  the  event  service  is  disrupted.  These  best  practices  should 
address,  among  other  things,  maintaining  service  during  extended  commercial 
power outages through the use of back-up generators and equipment. 

We also should take full advantage of IP-based technologies to enhance the resil-
iency  of  traditional  communications  networks.  IP  technology  provides  the  dynamic 
capability  to  change  and  reroute  telecommunications  traffic  within  the  network.  In 
the  event  of  systems  failure  within  the  traditional  network,  greater  use  of  these 
technologies will enable service providers to restore service more quickly and to pro-
vide the flexibility to initiate service at new locations chosen by consumers. 
Conclusion 

I  look  forward  to  working  cooperatively  with  Members  of  this  Committee,  other 
Senators,  the  House  of  Representatives,  and  my  colleagues  at  the  Commission  to 
achieve  the  goals  outlined  above.  We  would  appreciate  any  guidance  you  may  have 
on  these  issues.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify,  and  I  would  be  happy  to 
answer any questions you may have. 

APPENDIX A—FCC HURRICANE KATRINA RELIEF EFFORTS (AS OF SEPTEMBER 21, 

2005) 

The Commission continues its work to assist consumers, industries and other Fed-
eral  agencies  with  Hurricane  Katrina  relief  efforts.  Below  is  a  list  of  FCC  actions 
taken since the start of the disaster. The list is arranged by service with state-spe-
cific  actions  noted  separately.  Public  Notices  and  other  decisions  can  be  viewed  on 
the FCC-established Hurricane Katrina webpage (http://www.fcc.gov/cgb/katrina/ 
). The webpage was created on August 31, 2005, in order to centralize and dissemi-
nate hurricane related information. 
Wireline 
General FCC Actions 

FCC  granted  a  temporary  waiver  of  a  variety  of  procedural  rules  relating  to  the 
Universal  Service  Fund  to  carriers,  state  commissions,  and  other  program  bene-
ficiaries,  such  as  schools  and  libraries.  Accordingly,  affected  entities  in  the  hurri-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

cane-affected  areas  may  postpone  filing  numerous  USF  forms,  payments,  and  data, 
allowing affected parties adequate time to file appropriately (9/21/05). 

FCC granted a temporary waiver of Commission rules that require BellSouth and 
other incumbent LECs to provide advance notice and waiting periods before certain 
network changes may be implemented to help speed restoration of network services 
(9/21/05). 

FCC granted an STA giving BellSouth temporary authority to provide interLATA 
(long-distance)  services  using  its  internal  corporate  network  in  order  to  relieve  its 
over-burdened separate affiliate, BellSouth Long Distance (9/13/05). 

FCC granted a temporary waiver for certain carrier change requirements to allow 
customers  whose  long-distance  service  has  been  disrupted  by  Hurricane  Katrina  to 
be connected to an operational long-distance provider (9/5/05). 

FCC granted a temporary waiver of the FCC’s rule for aging residential numbers 
for customers in the affected areas. Waiver of this rule will allow carriers, upon re-
quest, to disconnect temporarily customers’ telephone service to avoid billing issues, 
and  reinstate  the  same  number  when  the  service  is  reconnected  for  customers  in 
the affected areas (9/4/05). 

FCC assisted LaFourche Telephone Company’s restoration of long-distance service 

(9/4–9/5/05). 

FCC  provided  BellSouth  with  information  necessary  to  port  the  Mississippi  De-
partment  of  Wildlife’s  800  number  from  Sprint  to  BellSouth  because  Sprint’s  facili-
ties used to provide that number are down (9/4/05). 

FCC granted an STA for Verizon to use 4 microwave POPs in Baton Rouge to re-

store damage due to the hurricane (9/3/05). 

FCC granted the emergency request of the American Red Cross for reassignment 
of the toll free number 1–800–RED–CROSS to help in the disaster relief and coordi-
nation effort for the multi-state area affected by the hurricane (9/2/05). 

FCC  provided  authority  to  NeuStar  (the  North  American  Telephone  Number  Ad-
ministrator)  and  other  service  providers  to  use  local  number  portability  technology 
to reroute telephone traffic to switches unaffected by the hurricane (9/1/05). 

FCC  granted  a  60-day  extension  to  carriers  operating  in  Louisiana,  Mississippi, 
or  Alabama  for  the  filing  of  Form  477  local  competition  and  broadband  data.  This 
extension also applied to carriers that rely on personnel, facilities, or records located 
in these states (9/1/05). 

FCC  reached  out  to  VoIP  service  providers  in  Alabama,  Louisiana,  and  Mis-
sissippi  to  determine  whether  adjustments  were  needed  in  the  filing  deadline  for 
VoIP E–911 status report due September 2, 2005 (8/31/05). 
Wireless 
General FCC Actions 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Chevron  USA,  Inc.  to  use  frequency  in  the  Gov/Non-Gov 
M941–M944  shared  band  for  the  purpose  of  restoring  communications  capabilities 
damaged by Hurricane Katrina (9/15/05). 

FCC modified the STA previously granted on 9/2/05 to Verizon for Rivada to allow 

leasing of spectrum to Ericsson on behalf of Northcom (9/9/05). 

FCC granted an STA to the North Carolina Forestry Commission to operate VHF 

mobile units in the disaster area (9/8/05). 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  to  list  the  names  and  contact  information  of  the 
FCC-certified  frequency  coordinators  for  land  mobile  radio  operations  and  coordi-
nating bodies for microwave radio operations (9/7/05). 

FCC released a Public Notice to ensure that wireless service providers do not im-
properly  disconnect  consumers  displaced  by  the  hurricane  because  they  are  unable 
to pay their bills (9/7/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Florida  Power  and  Light  to  use  900  MHz  frequencies  in 
Louisiana, Mississippi, and Alabama for electric power maintenance and restoration 
(9/7/05). 

FCC granted an STA to Detroit Edison to use VHF and UHF frequencies in hurri-

cane-affected areas (9/7/05). 

FCC  informed  amateur  radio  operators  that  they  have  the  authority  to  make 
transmissions necessary to meet essential communication needs and facilitate relief 
actions, and that prior FCC approval is not required (9/1/05). 

FCC issued a Public Notice that provides information to wireless licensees in the 
affected areas about STAs, FCC points of contact for various radio services, rule sec-
tions addressing ‘‘emergency communications,’’ and the temporary waiver of applica-
tion  filing  deadlines  (e.g.,  renewals,  construction  notifications,  discontinuance  no-
tices,  etc.),  construction  requirements,  and  discontinuance  of  service  requirements 
(9/1/05). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

FCC granted STA to BellSouth to use GMRS radios (commercially available walk-
ie  talkie-type  radios  that  require  licenses)  in  support  of  restoration  of  communica-
tions facilities in Florida, Alabama, Louisiana, and Mississippi (8/31/05). 

FCC granted an STA to Detroit Edison Company to operate on eleven VHF mobile 
frequencies in Florida in support of restoration of electrical service to areas affected 
by Hurricane Katrina (8/31/05). 

FCC granted an STA to Ameren, a utility services company licensed in the Indus-
trial Radio Service, to operate outside its licensed area of operation due to hurricane 
relief (8/31/05). 
Louisiana-Specific Actions 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Verizon  to  use  6  microwave  paths  (18  and  10  GHz)  in 
the New Orleans, LA area to restore communications due to damage from Hurricane 
Katrina (9/16/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Chevron  USA,  Inc.  to  use  frequency  pair  451/456.3125 
MHz in Plaquemines County, LA, to replace communications lost in Chevron’s Ven-
ice offshore loading facilities when Nextel’s facilities sustained damage (9/16/05). 

FCC granted an STA to the State of Louisiana to use twenty 700 MHz frequency 
pairs  in  New  Orleans,  LA,  to  replace  all  first  responder’s  public  safety  communica-
tions  (9/16/05).  These  channels  are  in  addition  to  those  700  MHz  channels  author-
ized under their state license. 

FCC modified the STA previously granted on 9/3/05 to Verizon to use 4 microwave 

POPs in Baton Rouge to restore damage due to the hurricane (9/15/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Cingular  Wireless  LLC  to  operate  on  PCS  spectrum  at 
two sites located in Columbia and Monroe, LA, to provide critically needed commu-
nications  services  in  support  of  the  relief  effort  from  Hurricane  Katrina  (9/14/05). 
FCC  granted  an  STA  to  BellSouth  to  operate  two  microwave  paths  on  18  GHz 
microwave and fixed satellite service frequencies as part of emergency radio systems 
that  helped  restore  BellSouth’s  telecommunications  to  the  New  Orleans  area  (9/14/ 
05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Chevron  USA,  Inc.  to  use  a  single  base  frequency 
451.1125  MHz  and  five  mobile  frequencies  in  Plaquemines  County,  LA,  to  replace 
communications  lost  in  Chevron’s  storage  facility  when  Nextel’s  facilities  sustained 
damage (9/14/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Amoco  Production  Company  to  use  frequency  153.335 
MHz  within  40  KM  of  the  Mandelville,  LA,  area  for  restoration  of  petroleum  facili-
ties (9/12/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  the  State  of  New  Jersey  to  operate  a  repeater  and  200 
mobiles on 806/851.3375 MHz in New Orleans for law enforcement assistance (9/12/ 
05). 

FCC granted an STA to Texas Utilities to operate station WPFM603 in Louisiana 

(currently operation is limited to Texas only) for restoration of utilities (9/12/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Chevron  to  operate  900  MHz  microwave  links  from  the 
coast  at  Leeville,  LA,  and  Coden,  AL,  to  offshore  platforms  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico 
(9/9/05). 

FCC granted an STA to Motorola to use channels licensed to Saint John the Bap-
tist Parish and Jefferson Parish in New Orleans for public safety; the Parishes’ sys-
tems are not operational due to storm damage, and the Parishes have consented to 
Motorola’s request (9/9/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Chemtura  Corp.  for  one  base  frequency  and  ten  mobile 
frequencies  in  the  460–470  MHz  band  in  the  Saint  Charles  County,  LA  area  (9/9/ 
05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  the  California  Highway  Patrol  to  operate  portable  and 
mobile  radios  in  support  of  other  law  enforcement  and  relief  agencies  in  Louisiana 
(9/6/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Duke  Energy  to  operate  an  800  MHz  system  near 

Tangipahoa Parish in Louisiana (9/6/05). 

FCC granted an STA to LifeCom/Air Methods to set up a control center with mo-
bile  radio  communications  in  the  460  MHz  band  in  the  New  Orleans  area  for  dis-
aster relief (9/6/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Alltel  to  operate  a  17-watt  short  range  cellular  system 
in direct support of the FEMA Director. The system will operate initially from Baton 
Rouge and will later be moved to the New Orleans Superdome (9/3/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Cingular  wireless  to  operate  on  microwave  frequencies 

on 6 GHZ microwave frequencies at 21 sites in Louisiana (9/2/05). 

As part of a Public Notice in the 800 MHz proceeding initiating ‘‘Wave 2’’ negotia-
tions in the 800 MHz rebanding process, FCC granted a request from the 800 MHz 
Transition  Administrator  to  move  Louisiana  from  Wave  2,  which  begins  in  October 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

2005, to Wave 3, which begins in January 2006. This will enable public safety enti-
ties in Louisiana to focus on immediate public safety needs (9/2/05). 

FCC  granted  Alcatel  an  equipment  authorization  for  a  new  digital  microwave 
radio  system  that  will  be  deployed  by  Verizon  Wireless  in  Baton  Rouge  and  the 
southern Louisiana area for transport facilities to replace equipment lost in the hur-
ricane (9/1/05). 
Mississippi-Specific Actions 

FCC granted an STA to Clearwire to allow operation in BTA 042 (Biloxi-Gulfport- 
Pascagoula,  MS)  to  permit  service  in  and  around  Biloxi,  MS,  and  to  the  Hancock 
Medical Center in Bay Saint Louis, MS, to provide Internet services and computers 
for access by victims (9/16/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Sea  Tow  International  to  use  Marine  VHF  channel  7  in 
Harrison  County,  MS,  and  Marine  channel  8  in  Hancock  County,  MS,  to  provide 
marine rescue and recovery services (9/14/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  an  amateur  radio  operator  providing  communications 
services  to  the  American  Red  Cross  in  Ocean  Springs,  Mississippi,  to  operate  on 
High Frequency bands that he could not otherwise use (9/11/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  the  California  Highway  Patrol  to  operate  portable  and 
mobile radios in support of other law enforcement and relief agencies in Mississippi 
(9/6/05). 
Alabama-Specific Actions 

FCC granted an STA to the Marengo County Commission in Demopolis, Alabama, 
to operate on two VHF public safety frequencies (156.12 and 159.12) for mobiles and 
base stations within the county (9/8/05). 
Tennessee-Specific Actions: 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  a  Red  Cross  office  to  use  GMRS  frequencies  to  provide 

security and support in Knoxville, TN (9/7/05). 
Broadcast and Cable 
FCC Actions 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  silent  authority  to  WLVV–AM,  WLVV,  Inc.,  Mobile,  AL 

(9/15/05). 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  to  extend  retransmission  consent/must  carry  elec-
tions in areas affected by Hurricane Katrina (extension from October 1, 2005 to No-
vember 15, 2005) (9/14/05). 

FCC granted an STA for silent authority to two LPTV stations: W30ID, New Orle-

ans, and W36CU, Gulfport (9/12/05). 

FCC granted an emergency authorization to the Houston Independent Media Cen-
ter for use of a low power FM system on 95.3 MHz, to broadcast emergency informa-
tion  to  evacuees  housed  in  the  vicinity  of  the  Astrodome,  from  an  area  adjacent  to 
the Astrodome (9/11/05). 

FCC  granted  an  application  from  Austin  Airwaves  to  operate  stations  on  94.9, 
95.3,  and  99.5  MHz  to  broadcast  emergency  information  to  evacuees  inside  the  As-
trodome  (9/5/05).  As  of  9/8/05,  Harris  County  officials  have  suspended  use  of  these 
stations within the Astrodome. 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  to  remind  video  program  distributors  of  the  need 
to  make  emergency  information  regarding  Hurricane  Katrina  evacuation  and  relief 
effort accessible to persons with hearing and vision disabilities (9/9/05). 

FCC  granted  an  extension  for  the  FCC  Cable  Horizontal  and  Vertical  Ownership 

Limits Proceeding Reply Period (9/8/05). 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  to  extend  the  Auction  No.  84  settlement  period  for 
certain  mutually  exclusive  AM  auction  applications  and  for  the  submission  of  Sec-
tion 307(b) showings; extension given from September 16, 2005 to October 31, 2005 
(9/7/05). 

FCC  created  database  to  capture  information  about  AM/FM/TV  broadcasters  im-

pacted by the hurricane (9/4/05). 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  waiving  certain  non-commercial  educational  (NCE) 
rules to permit NCE television and radio stations in the New Orleans area to simul-
cast and rebroadcast commercial station programming (9/2/05). 

FCC compiled information regarding the radio and television broadcast operations 
in Louisiana, Mississippi, and Alabama through direct calls and e-mails to over 150 
AM/FM/TV broadcasters in the area; continually updating information and referring 
needs to other Federal agencies (9/1/05–Present). 

FCC granted waivers to the following non-commercial FM and TV stations to per-
mit them to air fundraising programming to aid disaster relief efforts (9/1–present): 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

• Association  of  Public  Television  Stations,  for  all  its  member  public  television 

stations to permit interruptions in regular programming for fundraising. 

• National Public Radio, on behalf of its affiliates, to permit interruptions in reg-
ular programming for fundraising for victims and for NPR affiliates directed af-
fected by the hurricane. 

• National  Federation  of  Community  Broadcasters,  on  behalf  of  its  183  member 

stations, to permit interruptions in regular programming for fundraising. 

• KXPW–LP, Georgetown, TX—two week fundraising effort. 
• WITF–FM,  Harrisburg,  PA,  for  one-minute  fundraising  spots,  from  9/9/05  to  9/ 

• WBGO,  Newark,  NJ,  for  four-hour  benefit  concert  from  Lincoln  Center,  on  9/ 

• Arkansas  Educational  Television  Commission  on  behalf  of  its  five-station  net-

• Greater Cincinnati Television Educational Foundation to permit fundraising by 

30/05. 

17/05. 

work. 

WCET–TV. 

cert on 9/3/05. 

• KRFC(FM),  Fort  Collins,  CO  to  permit  the  broadcast  of  an  8-hour  benefit  con-

• Grand  Valley  State  University,  Michigan  Association  of  Public  Broadcasters, 
and Michigan Public Radio Network, on behalf of Michigan NCE radio and tele-
vision  stations  to  permit  interruptions  in  regular  programming  for  fundraising. 
• KATB(FM), Anchorage, Alaska, to permit interruptions in regular programming 
to air pre-produced 30- and 60-second segments supporting the North American 
Mission Board’s Disaster Relief efforts, running from 9/2–9/9/05. 

• WACC–LP,  Enfield,  Connecticut,  to  promote  and  air  coverage  of  a  fundraising 
car wash to be held on 9/10; proceeds to be donated to the American Red Cross. 
• WRNK–LP, Lanett, Alabama, to make announcements requesting that listeners 
drop off certain items (bottled water, personal hygiene items, etc., but not cash 
or  other  money)  from  9/6–9/8/05;  donated  items  will  be  taken  to  the  New  Life 
Family Church in Biloxi, Mississippi. 

• WHCF–FM,  Bangor,  Maine,  to  conduct  an  on-air  fundraiser  soliciting  pledges 
for  Operation  Blessing  International,  a  relief  agency  based  in  Virginia  Beach, 
Virginia. 

• KTIS–FM,  Minneapolis,  Minnesota,  to  participate  in  a  fundraising  campaign 
with  at  least  24  other  stations  in  the  market  on  9/9/05;  funds  raised  will  be 
given to the Red Cross. 

• KULA–LP,  Ili’ili,  American  Samoa,  to  permit  KULA–LP  to  broadcast  a  fund-

raising program to benefit disaster relief efforts on 9/8/05. 

• WVUA–FM,  Tuscaloosa,  Alabama,  to  permit  the  station  to  promote  a  fund-
raising  concert  to  be  held  on  9/9/05;  this  is  a  periodic  fundraiser  for  the  sta-
tion—in  this  instance,  25  percent  of  the  proceeds  will  be  donated  to  the  Red 
Cross. 

• KBCS–FM,  Bellevue,  Washington,  to  permit  the  station  to  air  fundraising  re-

quests to help rebuild NCE station WWOZ, New Orleans. 

• WETD,  Alfred,  New  York,  to  permit  the  station  to  air  a  live  broadcast  of  a 

‘‘Coins for Katrina Benefit Concert’’ on 9/11/05. 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  to  help  radio  and  television  stations  resume  and 
maintain broadcast operations to residents of the affected areas by outlining stream-
lined  instructions  to  apply  for  STAs  and  by  waiving  requirements  that  stations  no-
tify the FCC within 24 hours of using emergency antennas (8/31/05). 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  to  assist  cable  television  and  other  multi-channel 
video  programming  distributors  in  the  affected  areas  by  outlining  streamlined  in-
structions  to  apply  for  STAs  to  install  temporary  facilities  or  modify  existing  facili-
ties and by waiving certain technical requirements (8/31/05). 
Louisiana-Specific Actions 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  silent  authority  to  WBOK–AM,  Christian  Broadcasting 

Corporation, New Orleans, LA (9/15/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  silent  authority  to  WDSU–TV  and  WDSU–DT,  Hearst- 

Argyle Television, New Orleans, LA (9/15/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  silent  authority  to  KMRL–FM,  White  Dove  Fellowship, 

Buras, LA (9/14/05). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  silent  authority  to  WTUL–FM,  Tulane  Educational 

Fund, New Orleans, LA (9/14/05). 

FCC granted tolling pursuant to Section 73.3598(b)(1) via letter to American Fam-
ily  Association,  extending  the  period  to  construct  KSUL–FM,  Port  Sulphur,  LA,  by 
at least 6 months (9/14/05). 

FCC  granted  90  additional  construction  days  via  letter  to  Star  Over  Orlovista, 

permittee of WEUS(AM), Orlovista, FL (9/14/05). 

FCC granted an STA for silent authority to WHNO–TV, CH 20, New Orleans, LA 

(9/13/05). 

FCC sent a letter to Equity Offices, in Louisiana, to expedite entrance by station 

staff to WUPL–TV facility located in Jefferson Parish, LA (9/13/05). 

FCC granted an emergency authorization pursuant to the Salvation Army to oper-
ate  an  emergency  FM  station  on  107.9  MHz  to  broadcast  to  residents  and  recovery 
workers in New Orleans, LA (9/12/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  WWOZ(FM),  Friends  of  WWOZ,  Inc.,  New  Orleans,  LA, 

to remain silent; station has been silent since August 27, 2005 (9/9/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  WVUE  and  WVUE–DT,  LA,  licensed  to  Emmis  Tele-

vision, to remain silent (9/8/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  WWL–DT  (WWL’s  digital  station),  New  Orleans,  LA,  li-

censed to Belo Corporation, to remain silent (9/8/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  WTIX–AM,  WTIX,  Inc.,  New  Orleans,  LA,  that  ceased 

operations on August 29, 2005, to remain silent (9/7/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  WTNO–LP,  New  Orleans,  LA,  licensed  to  Tiger  Eye  Fi-

nance, Inc., to remain silent (9/7/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  WWNO(FM),  New  Orleans,  LA,  to  operate  from  its  li-

censed site with an emergency antenna and reduced power (9/7/05). 

FCC granted an STA for stations licensed to American Family Association in Lou-

isiana that ceased operations on August 28, 2005, to remain silent (9/6/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  WUPL(TV)  of  Slidell,  LA,  to  remain  silent  for  60  days 

(9/1/05). 
Mississippi-Specific Actions 

FCC  expedited  grant  of  program  test  authority  and  covering  license  for  major  fa-
cilities  upgrade  to  WBBN,  Taylorsville,  MS,  providing  greatly  increased  coverage 
area (9/13/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  permit  Mississippi  Public  Broadcasting,  licensee  of  NCE 
station WMAH–TV, Biloxi, MS, to rebroadcast September 11 NFL games of the New 
Orleans Saints and Green Bay Packers (9/8/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Hancock  County  Emergency  Management  to  operate  an 
emergency FM station on 103.5 MHz to broadcast to the Bay City-Wavelend-Shore-
line  Park,  Mississippi  area;  we  understand  this  to  be  the  only  station  operating  in 
the area (9/8/05). 

FCC granted an STA for stations licensed to American Family Association in Mis-

sissippi that ceased operations on August 28, 2005, to remain silent (9/6/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  for  WFMM(FM),  Telesouth  Communications,  Inc.,  Sumrall, 

Mississippi, to remain silent after it went silent on 8/29/05 (9/6/05). 
Satellite 
General FCC Actions 

FCC  granted  Harris  the  authority  to  operate  twelve  temporary-fixed  earth  sta-
tions  to  transmit  voice  and  data  communications  between  points  in  the  Gulf  Coast 
Region and various agencies in Florida in their disaster relief efforts (9/21/05). 

FCC granted an STA to BBC News to use 1.2 Meter temporary-fixed Ku-Band an-

tenna to provide news coverage of the Hurricane Katrina aftermath (9/19/05). 

FCC granted an STA to PetroCom for use of a C-Band antenna to restore its dig-

ital backhaul operations from the Gulf of Mexico (9/13/05). 

FCC granted an STA for Maritime Telecommunications Network to use 5 conven-
tional Ku-Band Earth stations for communications in the area affected by the hurri-
cane (9/10/05). 

FCC granted an STA to Viasat to operate conventional Ku-Band VSAT to provide 

Internet access service to FEMA (9/7/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  BJ  Services  to  operate  conventional  Ku-Band  VSAT 

remotes to reinitiate Internet access services lost by Katrina (9/7/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  ARD  German  Television  to  use  a  suitcase  antenna  on  a 

German satellite news-gathering truck to provide news coverage (9/5/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Maritime  Telecommunications  Network  to  operate  5  sat-

ellite dishes providing transportable Internet access (9/4/05). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  MTN  to  offer  satellite  Internet  access  on  3  government- 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Canada  TV  to  use  a  transportable  satellite  news  gath-

run cruise ships (9/4/05). 

ering truck (9/3/05). 

FCC granted an STA to Iridium to use spectrum owned by Globalstar to increase 
Iridium’s  capacity  (9/2/05).  Iridium  has  turned  on  its  equipment  on  this  frequency 
and no interference problems have been reported. 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Loral  Skynet  for  authority  to  use  a  satellite  dish  trans-
portable  on  a  Humvee  to  provide  free  VoIP  and  Internet  access  at  the  site  of  the 
relief efforts (9/2/05). 

FCC  released  a  Public  Notice  to  help  satellite  and  submarine  cable  providers 
maintain operations to emergency communications services in the affected areas by 
outlining streamlined instructions to apply for STAs (9/1/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Independent  Television  News  to  use  satellite  spectrum 
to serve a transportable news gathering truck from London in support of hurricane 
relief (9/1/05). 
Louisiana-Specific Actions 

FCC granted an STA to VSL Networks to use a Ku-Band antenna to provide serv-

ice to Motorola in support of the Louisiana state police (9/7/05). 
Mississippi-Specific Actions 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Telenor  Satellite  Services  to  operate  one  1.8  meter  tem-
porary fixed C-Band antenna to communicate with NSS–7 @ 2.2 W.L. at Camp Bar-
ron Point, MS (9/16/05). 

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  permit  Telenor  Satellite  Services  to  operate  a  2.4  meter 
temporary  fixed  C-Band  antenna  on  a  hospital  ship  at  Bay  St.  Louis,  MS  (9/9/05). 
Coordination With NTIA 

FCC  assisted  with  NTIA’s  grant  of  STAs  for  the  U.S.  military  to  use  75  fre-

FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Intel  Corporation  for  operation  in  the  frequency  band 
3650–3700  MHz  to  provide  wireless  services  for  relief  center  located  at  Kelly  Air 
Force Base, Texas (9/8/05). 

In  coordination  with  NTIA,  FCC  granted  an  STA  to  Intel  Corporation  for  oper-
ation  in  the  frequency  band  3485.5–3585.5  MHz  to  provide  wireless  services  for  re-
lief center located at Kelly Air Force Base, Texas (9/8/05). 

In coordination with NTIA, FCC granted an STA for Intel to set up a WiMax sys-
tem in the area from Biloxi and New Orleans to provide Internet connectivity to 225 
Red Cross Disaster Centers (9/3/05). 

In coordination with NTIA, FCC granted an STA request from Time Dominion for 
authorization to use high-power ultra-wide band equipment for through-the-wall im-
aging system operations (9/2/05). 

In  coordination  with  NTIA,  FCC  granted  an  STA  to  France  Telecom  to  provide 
Inmarsat  services  and  to  operate  Inmarsat  terminals  in  support  of  hurricane  relief 
(9/1/05). FCC extended STA on 9/8/05. 

Appendix B will be retained in Committee files. 

quencies. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much  and  I  would  propose  we 
have  a  five  minute  limitation.  We  still  have  four  witnesses  on  an-
other panel. 

Mr.  Chairman,  would  it  make  any  sense  for  us  to  authorize  you 
to  issue  the  credentials  that  repair  crews  need  in  advance  so  they 
can move immediately in the event of a disaster of this type? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  certainly  try  to  coordinate 
with FEMA in getting them to issue those credentials, and I think 
the  Commission  being  able  to  play  an  increased  role  in  that  is  im-
portant, but in the end I think that the FEMA and the emergency 
personnel that are on the ground are probably going to be the ones 
that  need  to  issue  the  credentials.  Sir,  the  Commission  could  be 
more  involved  in  that  process  and  try  to  play  a  more  responsive 
role,  but  I  do  think  that  emergency  management  personnel  on  the 
ground ultimately have to be the ones that can actually issue those 
credentials. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Almost  every  one  of  these  areas  has  a  disaster 
plan.  Some  of  them  use  them,  some  don’t.  But  the  disaster  plan 
itself  could  provide  that  you  could  authorize  persons  in  advance  to 
have  such  credentials  so  they  can  move  before  FEMA.  FEMA  will 
be  very  busy.  I’m  not  sure  we  can  rely  upon  them  taking  the  time 
to issue the credentials to communications crews so we would urge 
you  to  talk  to  FEMA  and  see  if  it  can’t  be  worked  out  in  advance. 
Mr.  MARTIN.  We  certainly  may  end  up  considering  that.  Maybe 
there’s  a  way  to  authorize  a  certain  number  of  personnel  in  ad-
vance to do that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  certainly  applaud  and  I  think  the  Committee 
would applaud your action using the universal service funds in the 
way  you’ve  just  outlined.  We  want  to  make  certain,  of  course,  that 
those networks are set up as quickly as possible. What is the time-
frame?  Did  you  put  a  limit  on  the  amount  of  time  they  can  use 
these monies for universal service for the things you outlined? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  we,  for  example,  allowed  some  of  the  schools 
and libraries to apply for money from the schools and libraries pro-
gram.  They  could  do  that  for  2005  and  2006  funding  cycles,  so  we 
have  established  some  limits  but  we  have  recognized  it’s  going  to 
take some time for them to be able utilize those resources. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Is  that  Fund  robust  enough  to  withstand  this 

disaster and the next one coming? 

Mr. MARTIN. We certainly hope so and will do everything we can. 
I think that the Universal Service Fund has certainly been critical 
to  making  sure  that  everyone  in  the  country  is  connected.  I  think 
that  it’s  traditionally  done  a  very  good  job  of  making  sure  that  we 
can  utilize  those  resources  so  that  everyone  can  stay  connected.  I 
think it will be able to take care of this as well, I hope. 

The CHAIRMAN. We’ve scheduled a hearing on interoperability in 
disaster areas for next Thursday morning. I wonder, you mentioned 
a  blue  ribbon  panel  commission  to  examine  into  the  disaster  that 
has taken place already, would you intend to ask that panel to look 
into  the  question  of  legislation  in  those  items  that  you  believe  you 
should have authority for that you don’t have now. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Yes,  sir,  we’ll  make  sure  that  will  be  one  of  the 

things they would look into. 

The CHAIRMAN. What’s the time frame for that report? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  we  actually  have  a  report  that  is  due  on  the 
interoperability issue and some of the other spectrum needs of pub-
lic  safety  that  is  actually  due  in  December,  but  I  would  imagine 
that  we  will  have  this  other  report  which  will  be  due  sometime  in 
the early part of next year. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, is our hearing next Thursday premature as 
far  as  you’re  concerned?  This  legislation  is  forthcoming  now  about 
interoperability. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  wouldn’t  comment  on  whether  the  Senate  would 
want to do hearings or not, whether that would be premature, but 
I’m sure that you all would continue to gather the information you 
need to make the judgments about legislation. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. Again, I congratulate you 
for the way you and your colleagues at the Commission have acted 
during this disaster. We hope you have similar preparation for the 
one that is coming. Senator Inouye. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you  very  much.  Chairman  Stevens 
brought  up  this  blue  ribbon  panel  that  you  intend  to  have  ap-
pointed.  Will  this  panel  differ  from  the  present  two  panels  you 
have,  the  Network  Reliability  Interoperability  Council  and  Media 
Security and Reliability Council? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  it  will  in  that  those  were  looking  at 
more longer-term issues as they relate to making sure the network 
was  more  resilient.  I  think  I  would  want  this  particular  group  to 
look  at  expressly  what  happened  with  Hurricane  Katrina.  What 
were  some  of  the  deficiencies  that  occurred,  for  example,  with 
emergency  responders  being  able  to  communicate?  What  are  the 
immediate  recommendations  as  opposed  to  just  longer-term  net-
work  resiliencies?  I’d  want  them  to  be  examining  the  flaws  that 
may  have  occurred  down  in  the  Gulf  area,  and  focus  particularly 
on that. I also think it might be important to make sure that public 
safety  were  even  more  involved  than  they  have  been  in  the  Net-
work Reliability and Interoperability Council. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Now  these  two  councils  adopted  so-called  vol-

untary best practices? 

Mr. MARTIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator INOUYE. Were they effective? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  some  of  the  voluntary  best  practices  about 
having,  for  example,  backup  power  from  the  wireline  networks,  I 
think,  were  effective,  but  certainly  the  hurricane  demonstrated 
that,  even  if  you  have  backup  power  you  still  need  to  have  access 
to fuel and adequate security to be able to get in and establish and 
service  that  backup  power.  And  in  some  instances,  for  example,  in 
New Orleans they needed to have adequate water to be able to con-
tinue to cool the generators that were working. While we did estab-
lish  best  practices  for  what  the  backup  power  requirements  might 
be, I think those are the kind of issues that we need to thoroughly 
explore. So I think they were effective in setting up some of the pa-
rameters, but I think it needs to go further and we need to explore 
it in more depth. 

Senator  INOUYE.  So  this  new  panel  will  also  be  looking  at  best 

practices. 

Mr. MARTIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  INOUYE.  Now,  will  you  make  them  voluntary  or  would 

you put some muscle in back of it? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  we  can  see  what  recommendations 
come  out  of  the  panel  for  the  best  practices  and  whether  they 
would  recommend  that  they  become  more  specific  requirements  or 
whether they continue to be voluntary. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Were  these  best  practices  implemented  during 

Mr. MARTIN. Well, I think that they were. As I said, I think that, 
for  example,  on  the  wireline  network  I  think  that  they,  many  of 
BellSouth’s  facilities  I  think  did  comply  with  the  their  best  prac-
tices, but I don’t think that those best practices had always antici-
pated  some  of  the  problems  with  security,  getting  access  to  fuel, 
that actually occurred in this instance. 

Senator INOUYE. Well, both of us here commend you for your ex-
traordinary  leadership  during  Katrina.  Do  you  believe  that  the 

Katrina? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Commission  should  have  a  more  prominent  role,  maybe  as  a 
facilitator? 

Mr. MARTIN. I certainly think we did everything we could during 
Hurricane Katrina to act as a facilitator, and I think that the Com-
mission  does  have  both  an  expertise  in  the  communication  infra-
structure  and  extensive  contacts  with  the  various  companies,  and 
I think that the government should be trying to take full advantage 
of  that.  So  certainly  if  we  are  given  the  opportunity  to  have  even 
more of a prominent role as a facilitator we would certainly be able 
to do that. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Burns. 
Senator BURNS. I guess I’m just kind of interested in that report 
that’ll come out in December. I congratulate you on setting up and 
taking  some  action  and  changing  some  policies  with  regard  to  a 
disaster area. I have no questions other than that. I’m pretty inter-
ested  in  that  report  though  and  when  it  comes  out  and  what  your 
recommendations might be. As we move forward on this—you said 
that  there  were  23  call  centers  that  were  knocked  completely  out 
down there, and how many are back in operation now? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  There  were  38  call  centers  that  were  actually 

knocked down and all but three are back in service now. 

Senator  BURNS.  Now,  in  those  call  centers  did  they  have  mobile 
units?  Did  they  have  a  unit  that  they  could  move  out  of  their 
present  location  to  be  moved  to  a  place  where  there’s  shelter,  or 
was  there  shelter  to  be  moved  to  that  would  be  an  alternative  to 
usual operating areas? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  don’t  think  they  had  anything  that  was  mobile.  I 
don’t  think  there—in  some  instances  there  might  not  have  been 
anything in the immediate area that would have been able to with-
stand  the  storm  either.  But  I  think  that  when  I  talk  about  redun-
dancy  for  the  9-1-1  call  centers,  what  we  need  to  do  is  make  sure 
that  the  emergency  call  centers  and  the  Public  Safety  Answering 
Points  have  redundant  capabilities  so  that  when  the  call  center 
goes  down  they  automatically  identify  what’s  the  closest  local  9-1- 
1  call  center  so  they  can  automatically  reroute  that  traffic  of  any 
that comes in to the call center to whatever local community or the 
next  nearest  town  that  has  a  call  center.  And,  unfortunately,  we 
didn’t  have  that  as  a  standard  protocol  for  the  Public  Safety  An-
swering  Points,  so  when  the  call  center  went  out  the  calls  didn’t 
go  anywhere  they  just  dropped  right  there.  Rather  than  focus  on 
the  mobility  of  the  infrastructure,  we  should  make  sure  that  the 
calls  automatically  get  routed  to  a  different  call  center  going  for-
ward. 

Senator BURNS. Well, that is probably what concerns most coun-
ty  executives.  If  you’ve  got  an  integrated  system  where  that’s  the 
call  center  for  fire,  police,  and  first  responders  the  ability  for  that 
thing to survive or to be mobile or redirected is very important and 
we must take that under consideration whenever we pass this bill. 
Thank you. 

Mr. MARTIN. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Bill Nelson. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Chairman 
Martin, you’ve certainly gotten into this issue and I appreciate your 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

involvement very much. The FCC has stated a few months ago that 
the  Agency  lacks  the  authority  to  grant  9-1-1  liability  protections 
to  the  answering  centers  and  the  VoIP  providers  in  the  same  way 
that  you  do  with  regard  to  wireless  and  wireline  providers.  You 
suggested  that  Congress  would  need  to  take  that  step,  and  I  cer-
tainly  agree,  and  that’s  why  a  number  of  members  on  this  com-
mittee have co-sponsored this bill, S. 1063. In addition, I mentioned 
Senator  Burns,  it’s  also  Senator  Snowe,  Senator  Kerry,  and  others 
not  on  this  Committee.  Would  that  help  the  situation  from  your 
perspective as the FCC Chairman? 

Mr. MARTIN. Well, the Commission certainly has done everything 
it can within its authority today to require that all technologies in-
cluding  Voice  over  IP  comply  with  the  9-1-1  rule.  We  did  at  the 
time,  though,  state  that  the  issues  related  to  liability,  Congress 
would  need  to  end  up  addressing.  As  I  understand  it,  the  bill  that 
both you and Senator Burns have introduced also does address the 
IP  technologies  access  as  a  mandated  access  to  some  of  the  under-
lying  telecommunications  infrastructure  which  the  Commission 
doesn’t  have  the  authority  to  do  today.  So  I  think  that  great 
progress  is  being  made  in  trying  to  make  sure  that  Voice  over  IP 
technologies  are  going  to  be  meeting  that  kind  of  a  9-1-1  deadline, 
but  I  think  that  everyone  should  do  all  we  can  to  make  sure  of 
that,  so  I  think  any  additional  help  to  facilitate  that  is  obviously 
welcome. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  One  of  the  things  we’re  hearing  from  the 
industry is that they’re having trouble without the liability protec-
tion  of  getting  insurance,  various  contracts,  and  getting  capital  in-
vestment that they need. Now, Congress gave this protection to the 
wireless  and  the  wireline  providers  and  so  we’ll  see  if  that  is  the 
pleasure  of  this  committee  and  I  certainly  hope  it  will  be.  Again, 
I  say  that,  unfortunately,  we  had  a  personal  experience  of  this  in 
Deltona,  which  is  north  of  Orlando,  with  a  family  and  they  got 
caught because they didn’t have E–911 service. 

Let me ask you, the FCC has acted in requiring the VoIP E–911 
capability,  but  you  directed  the  VoIP  companies  to  shut  off  phone 
service  to  any  customers  who  haven’t  acknowledged  limitations  in 
their  VoIP  9-1-1  service.  Well,  there  have  been  a  bunch  of  us  who 
have written you about this asking you not to cut off people’s VoIP 
service.  This,  of  course,  could  affect  an  awful  lot  of  people  nation-
wide. Can’t your agency rethink this requirement especially in light 
of Hurricane Katrina? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  Senator,  we  actually  have  tried  to  provide 
some additional flexibility on that in that we’ve continued to extend 
that deadline as we’ve seen the carriers make progress in trying to 
make  sure  that  all  of  their  customers  are  notified.  And  the  family 
that  you  mentioned  from  Florida  actually  was  one  of  the  families 
that  came  before  the  Commission  and  petitioned  us  and  asked  us 
to put in both the requirement that the voice-over IP key providers 
provide  access  to  9-1-1  capability  and  that  they  inform  all  their 
customers  about  any  of  the  limitations  until  they  meet  that  re-
quirement. And I think that in some companies we’ve seen extraor-
dinary  progress  in  making  those  customer  notifications  so  that 
we’ve  got  some  companies  that  have  100  percent  compliance  and 
numerous  companies  that  have  gotten  over  90  percent  compliance, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

but  there  are  some  that  are  still  straggling  in.  We  actually  have 
a report that’s due to the Commission today from all the voice-over 
IP  key  providers  to  give  us  a  status  update  about  where  they  are 
on  obtaining  those  requisite  notifications  from  their  customers.  So 
we’re  going  to  be  anxious  to  take  a  look  and  see  just  how  much 
progress  has  been  made.  Like  I  said,  several  have  made  extraor-
dinary progress and I think some are still straggling in. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Well, to make my point, has the FCC ever 
ordered  on  a  wide  scale  that  residential  phone  service  be  cut  off? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Not  that  I’m  aware  of  but  I  don’t  think  that  there 
has  ever  been  someone  marketing  to  residential  customers  service 
as  a  replacement  service  for  wireline  landline  service  that  didn’t 
provide  9-1-1  either,  so  while  we  haven’t  ever  ordered  the  cutting 
off of retail customer service in the mass market, there also hasn’t 
been  an  instance  in  which  someone  was  marketing  a  replacement 
service  for  traditional  telephone  that  was  also  not  capable  of  pro-
viding that 9-1-1 service. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Well,  obviously,  the  problems  have  been 
brought  to  the  fore,  and  we’ll  do  our  part  in  trying  to  solve  it. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator McCain. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And,  again,  con-
gratulations, Chairman Martin, on the fine job that you have done. 
Do you support providing additional spectrum to first responders as 
recommended by the 9/11 Commission? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Yes,  sir.  I  think  that  it’s  critical  that  first  respond-
ers  have  all  the  access  to  the  spectrum  that  they’re  going  to  need, 
and  they’re  going  to  need  some  additional  spectrum  to  have  the 
interoperability capability they need. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  And  don’t  you  think  that  the  entire  spectrum 
should be turned over rather penalize some broadcasters who hap-
pen to be on that spectrum, as opposed to others who are not? 

Mr. MARTIN. I think that it’s, I think that it is important for the 
government to figure out a way to get to the end of the digital tran-
sition,  and  I  think  it’ll  be  easier  on  consumers  in  many  ways  if 
more of the broadcasters are involved all at the same time, but my 
focus has been on what’s going to be the—— 

Senator  MCCAIN.  If  you  can  turn  over  some  why  shouldn’t  you 
be able to turn over all? I mean, why penalize one group of broad-
casters  who  happen  to  reside  on  that  first  responder  spectrum  as 
opposed  to  others?  It  seems  to  me  that  there’s  a  date  certain,  al-
though that was emasculated by a provision in the Balanced Budg-
et  Act,  but  all  spectrum  should  be  turned  over  rather  than  having 
some  turned  over  and  some  not.  That  it  would  be  patently  unfair 
to me. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Maybe  I  misspoke.  I  was  saying  I  think  that  it 
would also be more cumbersome or more burdensome on consumers 
if you didn’t have all of the broadcasters trying to make the transi-
tion at the same time, so I wasn’t in disagreement with you. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  OK.  You  mentioned  that  satellite  communica-
tions  and  I  read  satellite  communications  didn’t  break  down,  is 
that correct? 

Mr. MARTIN. That’s correct. Satellite communications—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

Senator MCCAIN. What’s the lesson there? And I only have a few 

minutes. What’s the lesson? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  the  lesson  is  that  the  satellite  capabilities, 
while  they  can  be  more  expensive  and  difficult  to  establish,  they 
certainly  have  some  additional  resiliency  because  they’re  not  rely-
ing on a terrestrial network, so we need to integrate satellite capa-
bility into emergency responders. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  So  we  should  certainly  consider  inclusion  of 
satellite communications as part of the overall solution to our abil-
ity to respond to disasters, is that right? 

Mr. MARTIN. That’s correct. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Tell  us  about  smart  radios,  Chairman  Martin. 
You’ve  mentioned  in  your  written  statement  that  smart  radios  en-
abled  people  to  jump  from  one  spectrum  to  another,  or  one  fre-
quency to another. Talk to us a little bit about that. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  smart  radios  have  the  ability  to  re-tune  or  to 
tune  just  like  you  do  a  regular  radio  from  different  frequencies,  so 
what that would allow is during a time of emergency is, if the fire 
or the police from other surrounding areas, or even from places far 
away,  might  have  radios  that  in  their  hometown  communicate  on 
a  certain  frequency  could  come  into  New  Orleans  and  use  any 
available frequency to continue to communicate. And so if everyone 
has  radios  that  are  smart  enough  to  re-tune  themselves  then  you 
could say, well, in New Orleans, here’s all the spectrum that would 
be  available  even  if  that  was  a  different  area  of  spectrum  or  dif-
ferent  frequencies  than  what  might  be  available  in  New  York 
where they—— 

Senator  MCCAIN.  So  we  should  definitely  encourage  that  kind  of 

equipment? 

Mr. MARTIN. Yes, I think so. And it will allow for both more effi-

cient and more resilient communications for first responders. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Mr.  Citron  is  going  to  testify  here  in  a  minute 
that if he could offer this committee any advice on rebuilding com-
munication  infrastructure  in  the  Gulf  Coast  it  would  be  not  to 
favor one facility or provider over another, instead he suggests that 
we  create  a  climate  that  fosters  deployment  of  all  those  tech-
nologies. Do you agree with that statement? 

Mr. MARTIN. Yes, I do. 
Senator MCCAIN. How do we do it? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  that  the  Commission  has  been  at-
tempting to move forward in not favoring any particular technology 
or  any  particular  service  provider,  but  I  think  that  the—I  think 
that we should continue on with the policy that we’ve adopted that 
does that, but I don’t think there’s any particular—— 

Senator MCCAIN. How are you progressing so far? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  that  we  are  making  progress  in  mak-
ing sure that other technologies can provide voice communications, 
not  only  wireline  and  traditional  telephones  but  wireless  and,  for 
example,  the  cable  companies  are  being  able  to  take  advantage  of 
their  infrastructure  to  provide  voice-over  IP  for  voice  communica-
tions.  So  I  think  that  we’re  seeing  new  technologies  all  the  time 
that are able to take advantage of that, and I think that’s what Mr. 
Citron  is  probably  meaning  although  I  haven’t  seen  his  testimony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

Senator  MCCAIN.  I  think  he  may  also  mean  that  one  entity  or 
another  should  not  dominate.  In  other  words,  there  should  be  a 
number  of  corporations  allowed  to  compete  for  these  facilities.  I 
think he means that as well, or these capabilities. 

Mr. MARTIN. Sure. And I think that that’s—I think that is impor-

tant as well. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  If  you  had  one  major  lesson  that  we  should 
learn  from  this  disaster  as  far  as  communications  are  concerned, 
what would that be, Mr. Martin? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  that  the—I  think  certainly  the  public 
safety interoperability and the importance of being able to re-estab-
lish that emergency responder network is the first. I would also say 
a  more  comprehensive  emergency  alert  system  is  the  second.  And 
I think you’ve got to make sure that—— 

Senator MCCAIN. And whose job is that? 
Mr. MARTIN. What’s that? 
Senator MCCAIN. And whose job is that? 
Mr. MARTIN. The emergency alert system? 
Senator MCCAIN. Yes. 
Mr.  MARTIN.  The  emergency  alert  system  currently,  we’ve  got 
one  that  applies  to  broadcast.  We  also  are  extending  that  to  other 
digital mass media, but I think it needs to be more integrated into 
other new technologies as well. The Commission is asking whether 
we  have  the  authority  to  but  that’s  not  clear.  Other  government 
agencies are looking at it as well, NOAA, for example, and I think 
that several bills in Congress are asking who should be responsible 
for that. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Well,  it  seems  to  me,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  they 
should  at  least—the  FCC  should  at  least  play  a  role  in  developing 
that  capability,  and  I  hope  we  could  perhaps  address  that  to  give 
them  that  authority  if  they  don’t  have  it.  I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chair-
man. I thank you for holding this very important hearing. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  That  is  our  intent.  We’ll  have  that  hearing  next 

Thursday. Senator Sununu. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  certainly  agree 
with  Senator  McCain  about  the  value  and  robustness,  the  resil-
ience  created  and  offered  by  satellite  phone  systems.  I  think  resil-
ient  was  the  word  that  you  used,  Chairman  Martin.  Has  the  FCC 
issued an order to require satellite phone providers to comply with 
9-1-1 service? 

Mr. MARTIN. Well, we have issued an order that requires satellite 
phone  providers  to  provide  a  9-1-1  service.  They  do  it  in  a  slightly 
different  way,  trying  to  recognize  they  have  a  different  technology 
and  different  technical  benefits  and  limitations,  but  yes  we  have. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  Why  not  issue  an  order  similarly  recognizing 

the technological difference then with IP voice providers? 

Mr. MARTIN. I think we did, and I think in our order that we did 
recognize  some  of  those  similar  limitations  with  IP  technologies 
and  tried  to  give  them  some  additional  advantages.  For  example, 
on  the  wireless  side  we  require  that  the  technology  automatically 
provide  location  information  and  we  haven’t  put  on  those  require-
ments  on  voice-over  IP  providers,  so  I  think  that  our  orders  thus 
far  have  recognized  the  limitations  of  those  different  technologies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Senator SUNUNU. Do you feel that you’ve worked effectively with 
providers  and  the  emergency  response  community  in  structuring 
these  orders  to  take  into  consideration  the  concerns  of  the  pro-
viders with regard to technology in formulating the rule? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  do.  And  I  think  we’ve  worked  very  closely  with 
both  the  providers  that  are  utilizing  this  technology  but  also  the 
public safety community, and both of them have come in and obvi-
ously not always agreed, but we’ve worked with both of them. 

Senator SUNUNU. You suggest that this kind of a requirement is 
typical,  I  guess,  that  no  new  system  has  been  rolled  out  without 
this  requirement,  although  to  the  best  of  my  knowledge  cell  phone 
wireless providers when their service was first rolled out, were not 
subjected to this kind of a requirement. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  think  there  are  two  different  issues.  I  mean,  I 
think  that  one  is  the  difference  between  basic  9-1-1  connections 
and enhanced or so-called enhanced 9-1-1 connections. The basic 9- 
1-1  is  just  the  ability  to  deliver  the  call  to  a  public  safety  official, 
the  Public  Safety  Answering  Point.  And  the  cellular  technologies 
have  been  required  to  provide  that  basic  9-1-1  service  since  1996, 
and all of them have been in compliance since then. 

Senator SUNUNU. Since 1996? I appreciate that, although I think 
the pace with which they’ve been able to comply with the enhanced 
services has been slower than many people would like, slower than 
the providers themselves would like, but even so, 1996, that wasn’t 
when cell phone service, wireless service, was introduced. 

Mr. MARTIN. No, it wasn’t. It was introduced earlier, and actually 
it  created  a  problem  for  the  Commission  at  the  time  in  1996  that 
the technology had become so widespread and many of the carriers 
complained  that  it  made  it  more  difficult  to  then  implement  a  9- 
1-1  service.  And  the  fact  that  we  delayed  that  requirement  made 
it more difficult to implement later. And in addition to that, at the 
time, cellular service was not being marketed as a replacement for 
landline or wireline service, unlike what’s occurring with voice-over 
IP  today,  where  they’re  telling  people  to  turn  off  their  other 
phones.  At  the  time  cellular  technology  until  the  mid-1990s  was 
only  being  used  as  a  complementary  service,  and  I  think  that’s  an 
important  distinction  between  what’s  going  on  with  voice-over  IP 
today. 

Senator SUNUNU. Technology changes, times change, and I think 
that’s the broad point here. You’ve got different services, each with 
different strengths and weaknesses, different qualities of resilience, 
cell  phone  service,  satellite  service,  IP  service,  and  I  think  the  les-
son is in each case, certainly in previous cases, the Commission has 
worked  to  identify  or  recognize  technological  capabilities,  techno-
logical limitations, and to make sure that the orders it puts out do 
not inhibit, distort, the pace of innovation. We have liability issues 
that  could  dissuade  a  lot  of  people  from  making  investments  in 
emergency services if they’re not addressed, and I just want to un-
derscore  the  importance  of  the  Commission  recognizing  that.  If  we 
put out too many arbitrary dates, or if we try to force everyone into 
the  exact  same  position  or  the  exact  same  approach  to  emergency 
services,  customers  and  security  and  safety  is  ultimately  going  to 
suffer.  You  said  there  were  38  9-1-1  centers  that  went  down.  Why 
did those 38 centers go down? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

why. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Many  of  them  were  actually  destroyed  along  the 
Gulf  Coast.  Even  in  the  Mississippi  and  Alabama  area  I  saw  sev-
eral—I  saw  one  Public  Safety  Answering  Point  that  was  actually 
physically  destroyed,  so  they  went  down  because  they  were  phys-
ically destroyed. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  I  imagine,  of  course,  the  ones  near  the  coast 
but 38, it’s a very long geographical pattern, you showed the charts 
there. I don’t imagine that any more than half of those were phys-
ically destroyed—— 

Mr. MARTIN. Oh, no, no, no. There was a wide variety of reasons 

Chairman  SUNUNU.—inoperable.  Were  they  able  to  switch  and 
transfer  calls  to  senders  that  were  online  in  order  to  meet  the 
emergency needs? 

Mr. MARTIN. They have the technology available to do that. They 
didn’t have a protocol in place on who to switch it to, and that was 
what  I  was  talking  about  in  my  testimony,  when  I  said  that  we 
need to make sure that the PSAPs put in place when their call cen-
ters go down where the traffic is supposed to go. Many of the local 
Public  Safety  Answering  Points  hadn’t  actually  told  anyone  where 
that traffic would go so it just got dropped. So it’s not that the tech-
nology  wasn’t  capable,  it  was  actually  that  they  hadn’t  told  it 
where to be redirected. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Well,  and  we  can  argue  about  what’s  tech-
nology-related and what isn’t. There were obviously inadequacies in 
the existing system, things we’d like to change and improve in the 
existing system, which brings us back to the point of different tech-
nologies, different approaches. We want to make sure we’re encour-
aging  innovation  and  new  ideas  to  make  that  overall  system  more 
robust and more resilient rather than just say everyone participate 
in  the  system  as  it  is  and  subject  everyone’s  system  to  the  same 
shortcomings.  So  there’s  a  value  to  redundancy,  there’s  a  value  to 
different  systems,  whether  it’s  the  satellite  systems  spoken  about 
by Senator McCain, the IP voice systems, the wireless systems, and 
the work that the wireless carriers did in being able to put mobile 
facilities on the site, and we want to make sure that we don’t bur-
den everyone with the same weaknesses because if we do so, we’re 
going  to  create  a  lot  less  incentive  for  innovation.  Thank  you  very 
much, Mr. Chairman. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  do  believe  there’s  a  ca-
pacity  problem  in  some  of  these  automatic  adjustments  as  far  as 
these systems are concerned. The weather bureau has a pilot’s cell 
phone that you can get that’s interoperable anywhere in the United 
States,  so  I  would  urge  you  to  take  a  look  at  what  the  weather 
service  has  already  done.  I  also  want  you  to  know  I’ve  just  been 
informed  there’s  a  $2.5  billion  dollar  procurement  going  on  at 
FEMA for emergency communications equipment, but for some rea-
son or other satellite communications is ineligible for that. I would 
urge you to talk to FEMA and ask them why. Senator Vitter. 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I have an open-

ing statement that I’d like to submit for the record. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, but I—— 
Senator VITTER. Sure. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The  CHAIRMAN.—failed  to  recognize  the  Senator  Ben  Nelson  sit-

ting over there. 

33 

Senator. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I might be eas-

ily missed but I appreciate it very much. 

The CHAIRMAN. I think you must not have been there for a while, 

Senator BEN NELSON. I stepped out for a moment. 
Chairman  Martin,  we’re  looking  at  another  hurricane  advancing 
toward  the  coast  of  Texas  we  believe.  Perhaps  the  latest  update 
will  tell  us  closer  in  proximity  where  it’s  going  to  hit.  Given  what 
you know from the Katrina experience, do you have any knowledge 
or  any  ideas  or  any  guesses  about  what  might  happen  with  9-1-1 
centers  in  that  area  with  all  kinds  of  wireless  and  landline  center 
or  capability  or  service?  Any  idea  about  what  might  happen  with 
interoperability  to  give  us  some  idea  of  what  we’re  facing  this 
weekend? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  many  of  the  issues  as  it  related  to  interoper-
ability and the emergency personnel to be actually able to commu-
nicate  when  infrastructure  has  been  damaged  are  hard  to  predict 
and I don’t think there are any short-term fixes. I think the issues 
as they relate to making sure local PSAPs, the local 9-1-1 call cen-
ters,  have  identified  who  they  want  the  traffic  to  go  to  if  they’re 
down.  That’s  probably  something  that  can  be  done  even  before  the 
hurricane strikes. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  So  they  are  in  a  position  to  be  able  to 
make  decisions  like  that,  and  perhaps  they’ve  learned  from  the 
Katrina  experience  what  steps  they  might  take  to  protect  against 
being down? 

Mr. MARTIN. Yes, and so here at the Commission we’ll make sure 
we  try  to  reach  out  to  those  public  safety  communities  along  the 
coastline  of  the  potential  area.  We’ve  already  started  reaching  out 
today to some of the communications infrastructure companies, the 
communication service providers, to try to help them with a contact 
point, identify what services they have in the area, and make sure 
that we’re trying to get in touch with them before, whereas in Hur-
ricane  Katrina,  we  were  actually  trying  to  do  that  afterwards.  So 
we  were  trying  to  reach  out  to  radio  stations,  TV  stations,  after-
wards.  In  this  case  we’re  trying  to  reach  out  to  them  before  to  es-
tablish lines of communication so it’s easier to get an update. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  What  might  we  expect  in  other  commu-

nication service, whether it’s wireless or otherwise? 

Mr. MARTIN. Well, like I said, it’s hard to end up predicting what 
will  end  up  being  the  destruction  to  outside  infrastructure.  I  cer-
tainly think that one of the things that was unique about New Or-
leans  was  the  fact  that  when  the—because  of  the  way  it  was  situ-
ated  below  sea  level  that  even  the  flooding  that  occurred,  in  most 
instances  when  a  hurricane  comes  through,  while  there  could  be 
extensive  damage,  the  water  retreats,  and  then  you  can  get  com-
munications  workers  in  more  easily.  During  my  discussions  with 
both  wireless  and  wireline  companies,  they  talked  extensively 
about the unique aspect of New Orleans in which the water surged 
in  and  then  stayed,  and  that  really  complicated  their  efforts  to  re-
store  communications  in  a  way  that  I  don’t  anticipate  it  would  be 
exactly the same along the coast of Texas where Hurricane Rita is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

supposed  to  strike.  So  I  think  that—I  think  some  of  the  problems, 
as  it  related  to  Hurricane  Katrina  and  exactly  what  happened  in 
New  Orleans,  are  somewhat  unique.  At  least  that’s  what  I’ve  been 
told  by  many  of  the  companies  that  have  been  involved  in  numer-
ous  restorations,  particularly  in  Florida  last  year,  for  example, 
where  there  were  several  hurricanes  that  hit,  and  Andrew  pre-
viously  in  South  Florida.  So  they  said  along  the  Gulf  Coast,  while 
there  was  significant  destruction,  that  was  a  relatively  normal  op-
eration  to  try  to  re-establish  infrastructure,  but  New  Orleans  pre-
sented  unbelievable  problems  because  they  couldn’t  even  get  their 
crews in because of the water and because of the security problems. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  Now,  the  CEO  of  AT&T  has  called  on  the 
FCC to require every communications provider to adopt crisis man-
agement plans. Apparently, AT&T has taken on a fairly significant 
and  extensive  plan  involving  emergency  vehicles.  What  are  your 
thoughts  about  your  authority  to  require  that,  as  well  as  whether 
you think that that’s a good suggestion or not? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  certainly  think  that  the  Commission  would 
have the authority to require at this time that they have some kind 
of emergency response plans. I think that one of the things that the 
Commission should be evaluating is whether the best practices that 
were  voluntary  were  sufficient  in  this  case  or  whether  we  need  to 
have some additional requirements or at least some minimum level 
of  expectation  of  what  the  emergency  response  plan  should  be.  So 
I  think  that’s  actually  one  of  the  things  that  the  Commission 
should  address  first,  is  whether  or  not  we  need  to  be  having  some 
additional requirements. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Well, as things stand at the moment, obvi-
ously  there  are  some  questions  about  reliability,  redundancy,  with 
respect  to  communication  systems.  Do  you  have  any  particular 
thoughts  that  you  would  like  to  share  or  that  you  might  put  to-
gether  in  the  form  of  a  rule,  regulation,  that  might  cure  the  ques-
tions that exist right now? Answer the questions and cure the con-
cerns that exist right now about redundancy and resiliency, as well 
as reliability? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  don’t  have  anything  specific  at  this  time,  but  we 
certainly are looking at it and I’ll try to get back to you as quickly 
as we can with it. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Thank  you.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman. 

Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Now, Senator Vitter. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have  an  opening 

statement that I’d like to submit for the record. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Yes, It will be. 
Senator  VITTER.  I  guess  if  I  could  underscore  just  a  few  points 
from  it  as  a  person  who  was  on  the  ground,  first,  in  Baton  Rouge 
and  then  after  the  storm  in  the  stricken  area,  just  want  to  under-
score  how  just  complete  and  total  the  implosion  of  communication 
seemed  to  be.  And  when  you’re  right  there  trying  to  communicate 
with  people  it’s  very  dramatic  and  I  really  can’t—there’s  no  way  I 
can  overstate  it  because  it  was  pretty  stunning  to  everybody  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

volved  how  just  completely  dark  the  communication  side  was,  not 
only  initially  but  for  some  time  after  that.  And  I  also  want  to  un-
derscore  what  complications  that  creates.  Obviously,  that’s  a  prob-
lem coordinating relief and other activity, but it also gives folks in 
the stricken area an unbelievable sense of isolation, and the feeling 
that  nobody  in  the  outside  world  is  doing  anything,  even  when 
we’re  trying,  and  that  is  a  very  real  negative  impact.  And  the  sec-
ond  thing  it  does  is  it  puts  the  sort  of  normal  process  of  rumors 
floating  around,  it  puts  it  through  the  stratosphere,  because  all  of 
a  sudden  there’s  no  ability  to  get  real  and  accurate  information 
from the ground and so the rumors that begin go through the strat-
osphere and often make situations worse in terms of inflating con-
cerns  and  not  allowing  folks  to  address  the  reality.  So  I  just  want 
to underscore that. 

I  also  want  to  underscore  from  my  opening  comments  how  first 
responders  on  the  ground  just  performed  heroically  in  the  face  of 
all  this,  including  folks  having  to  physically  travel  to  Baton  Rouge 
and elsewhere to communicate and get pleas for supplies and other 
things. So I certainly want to salute all of the first responders and 
local leaders who did that. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Vitter follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 
Mr. Chairman: 
I want to thank you for this hearing. Also, I want to thank Chairman Martin and 

the rest of our witnesses for being here today. 

One  of  the  major  problems  experienced  in  almost  every  community  after  Hurri-
cane Katrina was that they and their leaders were isolated. Communication in most 
communities was nonexistent because telephone, cellular phones, and other commu-
nication systems were so badly damaged. 

This lack of communication caused isolation that led to a number of the problems 
we experienced after the storm, including lawlessness, a lack of basics such as food 
and  water,  a  slower-paced  rescue  effort  than  would  have  otherwise  been  possible, 
and a slow-paced evacuation of medical facilities. 

Because  of  the  lack  of  communication,  officials  had  to  physically  travel  to  Baton 

Rouge just to make their needs known and request assistance. 

Hurricane Katrina destroyed the communications infrastructure. More than 1,000 
cell  towers  were  knocked  over.  More  than  three  million  people  on  the  Gulf  Coast 
lost landline service. Bellsouth reported unprecedented losses of central offices from 
the storm, with many completely destroyed as never before in a storm. It’s still hard 
to get calls through to Louisiana area codes. 

This  lack  of  communication  made  real  recovery  extremely  difficult.  But  we  had 

true leaders and heroes who managed to get the job done anyway. 

I want to thank the first responders here today for going the extra mile. We saw 
numerous examples after the storm of police, firemen, and others performing admi-
rably and heroically in terrible conditions. 

Sheriff’s  deputies  in  St.  Bernard  were  living  on  a  small  riverboat  so  they  could 
continue  their  vital  work.  Eight  days  after  the  storm  most  still  hadn’t  seen  their 
homes  or  talked  to  their  families,  but  they  were  committed  to  keeping  St.  Bernard 
safe and putting their duty above their families and property. 

We  need  to  learn  from  this  experience  and  improve  the  communications  infra-

structure our first responders rely on. 

Also,  some  broadcasters  were  great  examples  of  how  to  work  together  in  a  crisis. 
WWL  Radio  and  other  radio  stations  in  New  Orleans,  including  stations  that  were 
previously  competitors,  all  banded  together  to  form  ‘‘The  United  Broadcasters  of 
New Orleans,’’ pooling resources to stay on-the-air during the crisis. On the TV side, 
WWL  TV  moved  in  with  Louisiana  Public  Broadcasting  and  continued  to  stay  on- 
the-air, and WGNO moved in temporarily with WBRZ in Baton Rouge. These broad-
casters  on  their  own  decided  to  work  together  and  do  what  would  provide  the  best 
information possible, especially important since so many other forms of communica-
tions were down. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

I’m  proposing  several  solutions  to  help  us  recover  from  this  storm  and  overcome 
these challenges so we don’t have the same problems in future storms. Senator Lan-
drieu  and  I  will  be  introducing  a  comprehensive  package  that  includes  many  ideas 
to  help  spur  our  economy,  including  investment  incentives  to  help  our  communica-
tions providers reinvest and restore their infrastructure. 

I  am  proposing  a  Major  Disaster  Restoration  Investment  Tax  Credit  that  would 
give 3 years of additional tax incentives for investment in the impacted areas. This 
proposal  will  provide  a  credit  of  20  percent  of  investment  for  the  first  year,  15  per-
cent  for  the  second  year,  and  10  for  the  third  year.  This  tax  incentive  would  apply 
to  all  restoration  investments  in  the  area,  but  is  it  is  especially  important  to  tele-
communications  providers  whose  critical  infrastructure  was  ravaged  by  Hurricane 
Katrina. 

Also,  our  Louisiana  Recovery  Package  includes  a  change  in  law  that  will  make 
telecommunications  providers  eligible  for  Federal  resources  to  help  them  in  main-
taining and restoring communications during a disaster. We all heard horror stories 
of the lawlessness and unsafe conditions in many areas after the storm. I also heard 
accounts from Bellsouth about the threatening conditions their repair works had to 
work  in—so  threatening  that  they  almost  had  to  pull  out  of  the  city  in  the  midst 
of vital repairs. To help ensure these workers can repair critical infrastructure, this 
proposal would ensure they can have access to protection, fuel, and other resources 
that  FEMA  can  provide  to  government  agencies  and  other  forms  of  critical  infra-
structure during an emergency. 

To  build  on  the  plan  I  will  introduce,  I  look  forward  to  working  with  this  Com-
mittee  to  address  a  few  other  concerns.  First,  we  need  to  look  at  FCC  rules,  and 
find where we can streamline and cut red tape. I know Chairman Martin has been 
extremely helpful in what he’s done so far, under the Commission’s current author-
ity,  to  waive  many  requirements,  and  I  am  thankful  for  his  actions.  But,  because 
of the large scale of the rebuild in Southeast Louisiana and the Gulf Coast, we need 
to  take  a  comprehensive  look  at  where  we  can  streamline  to  hasten  the  rebuild  of 
our  communications  infrastructure.  I  expect  we  will  need  some  expedited  consider-
ations  for  siting  of  cell  towers,  for  example,  and  I  sure  we  can  find  plenty  of  other 
regulations  that  need  to  be  examined  and  modernized  so  we  can  facilitate  a  quick 
rebuild. 

Again, I want to thank you, Mr. Chairman, for having this important hearing, and 
I  want  to  thank  our  witnesses.  I  wish  you  all  the  best  in  the  recovery,  and  I  look 
forward to hearing your views on what we need to do to aid quick recovery and long- 
term prosperity. 

Senator VITTER. A couple of very brief questions. You mentioned 
satellite  communication  as  pretty  reliable  through  all  of  this  com-
pared  to  cell  and  other  things.  My  personal  experience  with  sat-
ellite phones was that it was extremely spotty. Was that a function 
just of those systems not being very developed or robust in that ge-
ographic area do you think, or what do you think explains that? 

Mr. MARTIN. Well, one of the challenges for satellite communica-
tions  is  that  it’s  very  difficult  for  individual  communications  de-
vices  to  communicate  all  the  way  back  up  to  a  satellite  which  is 
one of the reasons why it’s oftentimes more expensive and less effi-
cient. One of the things that I think we need to try to end up doing 
is integrating in satellite capability with the regular terrestrial cel-
lular network. In other words, being able to potentially roll in tow-
ers that could put out a wide area of service for regular cell phones 
to  work,  but  then—as  opposed  to  trying  to  connect  back  into  the 
landline infrastructure, which is the way they do it today—use that 
as  a  kind  of  a  back-haul  through  the  satellite,  just  like,  for  exam-
ple,  many  cellular  companies  do  so  that  your  cell  phone  may  still 
work on a cruise ship, and take advantage of satellite capability in-
tegrated in with the cellular infrastructure. And I think that might 
be a more effective way of making sure that everyone can still have 
coverage  and  take  care  of  some  of  that  spotty  problem.  I  think 
that’s  one  of  the  things  that  the  Commission  and  the  industry  are 
looking  at,  is  how  that  could  be  done  more,  so  that  satellite  capa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

bility could be integrated as opposed to just being a stand-alone al-
ternative. 

Senator VITTER. Right. Well, that’s a good segue to my next ques-
tion, which is just looking at the cell phone universe and capability, 
what  sorts  of  things  are  you  thinking  of  there  to  make  that  a  lot 
more robust and get it back operating a lot more quickly? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  one  of—I  think  that’s  probably  the  primary 

ones. I mean, one of the benefits of—— 

Senator VITTER. You mentioned mobile towers coming in. 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Yes.  Yes,  having—and  they  did  that.  Many  of  the 
companies brought those in. Many times they were still connecting 
back  into  a  landline  infrastructure  which  still  had  lots  of  damage 
to  it.  And  there  were  several  of  those  mobile  towers  that  were 
rolled in that actually had satellite capability, and so what we real-
ly need to do is make sure that some of the mobile equipment that 
can be rolled in after there has been destruction has the capability 
to  communicate  with  satellite  and  other  technology  that  will  be 
more resilient, so that they’re not just plugging back into an infra-
structure  that’s  already  damaged.  And  I  think  that’s  one  of  the 
things that I know that several of the companies have talked to me 
about  something  they  can  really  do.  Cingular,  for  example,  talked 
to  me  extensively  about  that,  and  they  had  one  satellite  antenna 
that  they  used  in  that  way  in  the  Gulf  region.  I  think  the  impor-
tance of having more of that capability to be easily deployed is crit-
ical. 

Senator VITTER. Okay. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr. 
Chairman.  Again  we  commend  you  very  highly  for  what  you’ve 
done  and  we’ll  do  our  best  to  get  you  the  additional  authority  you 
need in some of these areas we’ve discussed. 

Mr. MARTIN. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. As a matter of fact, we sent one of the bills over 
to  the  leadership  clearance  right  now.  We’ll  do  our  best  to  get  it 
to you. 

Mr. MARTIN. All right. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Now, if I may, I’d like to call the next panel, Mr. 
Bill  Smith,  the  Chief  Technology  Officer  for  BellSouth  from  At-
lanta, Georgia; Mr. Paul Roth, the Executive Vice-President for Ex-
ternal  Affairs  and  Public  Relations  for  Cingular  Wireless  of  At-
lanta, Georgia; Jeffrey Citron, Chairman and Chief Executive Offi-
cer  of  Vonage  of  Edison,  New  Jersey;  and  Hossein  Eslambolchi, 
President of AT&T Global Network Technology Services and AT&T 
Labs from Bedminster, New Jersey. 

Gentlemen, we know you’re very busy people. We’re sorry to keep 
you  waiting.  We  had  some  votes  at  the  beginning  of  the  day  and 
had to start our hearing late, but we’re very pleased that you have 
come to give us your points-of-view on the issues that we’re consid-
ering today. I hate to put limitations on you, but I do hope we can 
make your statements as short as possible. We intend to put all of 
your  statements  in  the  record  completely,  but  we  are  very  inter-
ested in what you have to say so I don’t want to cut you off in any 
way.  Let  me  start  with  Mr.  Smith,  if  I  may,  just  in  the  way  they 
appear  on  our  program  here  today,  witness  list.  Again,  Mr.  Smith, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

you’re the Chief Technology Officer for BellSouth in Atlanta, Geor-
gia. We thank you for coming. 

STATEMENT OF WILLIAM L. SMITH, 

CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER, BELLSOUTH 

Mr.  SMITH.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  My  name  is  Bill 
Smith,  I’m  Chief  Technology  Officer  of  BellSouth,  and  the  purpose 
of  my  testimony  today  is  to  describe  the  impact  of  Hurricane 
Katrina on our employees, our network, and our customers. 

First  of  all,  I’m  delighted  to  say  that  we’ve  located  all  of  our 
6,500  employees  in  the  impacted  area.  In  the  days  and  weeks  fol-
lowing  Katrina’s  landfall,  we  actually  set  up  six  tent  cities  where 
our  employees  and  families  could  get  food,  shelter,  medical  care, 
and  financial  assistance,  and  we  served  over  8,000  meals  daily  in 
those facilities. 

Now,  I’d  like  to  summarize  the  preparation  and  the  impact  on 
our  network.  Given  the  area  that  we  serve,  BellSouth  has  a  great 
deal of experience with hurricanes and we’re proud of the resiliency 
of  our  network.  Based  in  large  part  on  the  experience  that  we’ve 
gained  from  past  hurricanes,  we  had  located  most  of  our  critical 
switching  equipment  on  upper  floors  of  buildings  in  the  New  Orle-
ans  area,  and  this  planning  helped  us  reduce  our  restoration  time 
from  months  to  weeks.  As  of  this  morning,  we  have  approximately 
200,000  of  the  original  almost  2.5  million  lines  that  remain  im-
pacted. Much of that original impact was due to loss of commercial 
power. Many of our 578 central offices in those areas were running 
on  batteries  supported  by  generators,  and  as  Chairman  Martin 
mentioned,  the  prolonged  flooding  and  unprecedented  security 
issues resulted in our generator power being lost at several central 
offices due to our inability to get fuel into them. We are in the proc-
ess of restoring service to all of those offices at this time. 

We’ve  also  been  very  focused  on  the  wireless  industry  and  its 
network  restoration  efforts.  These  carriers  have  actually  provided 
input  to  us  on  priorities  for  restoration,  and  I  think  it’s  important 
to  note  that  in  this  new  and  dynamic  age  of  alternative  tech-
nologies such as wireless and voice-over IP, those also use the tra-
ditional  wireline  network.  So  when  you  hear  stories  about  the  use 
of voice-over IP during this hurricane, keep in mind that there was 
some  underlying  network  that  that  service  was  actually  riding  on. 
The  significant  progress  that  we’ve  made  to  date  is  oftentimes 
the  result  of  tireless  and  heroic  efforts  of  our  employees  who’ve 
been  working  around  the  clock  to  restore  service.  I  wish  I  could 
share  more  and  more  details  with  you,  but  I  think  the  building  at 
840 Poydras Street in New Orleans which houses our main central 
office and is a major telecommunications hub is a great example of 
what they faced. Our employees there had an ordeal that was more 
like  what  you  would  expect  a  combat  soldier  to  face  than  that  of 
a  telecommunications  professional.  Nevertheless,  with  the  assist-
ance  of  the  Louisiana  State  Police,  U.S.  Marshals,  and  the  FBI, 
they made sure that this key facility remained operational through-
out and is today. Furthermore, many of the people that are assist-
ing in this restoration have lost everything, including their homes, 
and  some  of  them  and  their  families  have  been  living  in  our  tent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

cities  yet  they  continue  to  spend  their  days  and  their  priorities  on 
restoring service to their fellow-citizens. 

So  what  has  happened  and  what  could  we  do?  I  think  the  co-
operation and assistance from local and State authorities and Fed-
eral  agencies  has  been  great.  The  FCC  has  been  extraordinarily 
helpful  in  what  they’ve  done.  As  we  continue  to  restore  service  to 
the area, we think several things are critical. 

First, is safe access to our facilities for our technicians. 
Second,  flexibility  and  patience  as  we  assess  these  areas  and 

work with local communities to rebuild. 

And, finally, we believe the recognition that the cost for us to re-
store this infrastructure will be significant. We estimate it to be be-
tween $400 and $600 million, and we believe that legislative incen-
tives such as tax credits would be very helpful. 

Finally,  I’d  like  to  close  with  some  lessons  learned  so  far.  First, 
we  believe  that  both  network  providers  and  their  customers  are 
more  and  more  dependent  on  commercial  power.  This  ranges  from 
fiberoptic  systems  and  networks  to  phone  systems  in  hotel  rooms 
to cordless phones in consumer’s homes. 

Second,  the  communications  industry  and  government  bodies 
need to plan together to establish in advance, as Chairman Martin 
mentioned, alternate plans for routing E–911 traffic in the event of 
a catastrophe. We also believe that Katrina highlighted the critical 
need for E–911 support in all forms of communications. We believe 
that  emergency  personnel  need  radio  equipment  that  accesses  a 
common frequency. 

Third,  we  believe  that  critical  telecommunications  infrastructure 
owners  and  operators  should  be  designated  as  first  responders  in 
the  event  of  a  major  disaster  and  should  be  included  in  prepara-
tions for such events. 

Let me close by thanking you for your interest and thanking my 
colleagues  at  BellSouth.  We’ve  mobilized  our  company  from  top  to 
bottom. We’ll rebuild as we always do. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Smith follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM L. SMITH, 

CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER, BELLSOUTH 

I. Introduction 

My  name  is  Bill  Smith,  and  I  am  the  Chief  Technology  Officer  for  BellSouth. 
BellSouth  is  a  full-service  communications  company  providing  service  to  customers 
in  the  nine  southeastern  states  of  Alabama,  Florida,  Georgia,  Kentucky,  Louisiana, 
Mississippi,  North  Carolina,  South  Carolina,  and  Tennessee.  I  have  worked  for 
BellSouth  for  26  years,  and  in  my  current  position  I  am  responsible  for  overseeing 
the  planning  of  our  overall  network,  integrating  new  technology  into  our  network, 
and ensuring the interoperability between our networks and those of other carriers. 
The purpose of my testimony today is to address the impact of Hurricane Katrina 
on  BellSouth’s  network,  the  status  of  the  network  based  on  restoration  completed 
to date, where we expect to go from here as we continue to restore communications 
to the hard hit Gulf Coast area, and what the Federal Government can do to assist 
in  those  efforts.  What  I  will  give  you  today  is  a  snapshot—the  situation  is  still 
changing  rapidly,  as  power  is  restored,  flood  waters  are  pumped  out,  field  surveys 
occur,  and  repairs  are  made.  Furthermore,  because  we  are  still  assessing  the  full 
impact  of  the  storm  on  our  network  and  our  customers,  damage  estimates  are  pre-
liminary.  It  will  take  some  time  for  us  to  know  with  certainty  the  total  magnitude 
of  the  destruction  caused  by  Hurricane  Katrina.  Given  the  force  of  the  hurricane, 
however,  we  are  very  pleased  with  the  resiliency  of  our  network,  and  with  the  sig-
nificant  progress  that  our  employees,  working  with  the  larger  communications  in-
dustry, have made to restore service to date. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

BellSouth’s  efforts  in  regard  to  hurricanes  can  be  placed  into  three  general  cat-
egories:  preparation,  monitoring,  and  restoration.  As  is  standard  operating  proce-
dure for us during hurricane season, on August 23, 2005, BellSouth’s network oper-
ations  team  began  tracking  Tropical  Depression  12,  then  located  over  the  south-
eastern Bahamas with thirty-five mile per hour winds and moving northwest at ten 
miles  per  hour.  We  continued  monitoring  the  storm  as  the  days  progressed  and 
began  extensive  preparations  prior  to  Katrina  making  landfall  in  Florida.  This  is 
business  as  usual  for  us,  but  none  could  have  imagined  what  was  to  follow.  As 
Katrina  worked  its  way  across  Florida  toward  the  Gulf  Coast,  two  integral  pieces 
to  this  incredible  story  developed:  the  people,  and  the  network.  I  plan  to  first  walk 
you  through  the  people  side  of  this  story,  because  without  our  people,  we  would 
have  no  company  and  no  network.  It  is  our  employees  who  make  BellSouth  what 
it is. 
II. Katrina’s Impact on People 

BellSouth has about 13,000 employees in the States of Alabama, Mississippi, and 
Louisiana,  approximately  6,500  of  whom  were  in  the  hardest  hit  areas  affected  by 
the storm. I am delighted to report that we have made contact with all our employ-
ees,  and  all  are  alive  and  safe.  This  is  in  no  small  part  due  to  the  preparations 
BellSouth  instituted  well  in  advance  of  Katrina  making  landfall.  For  example, 
BellSouth  already  had  in  place  an  800-number  for  BellSouth  employees  to  call  to 
report  their  status  in  the  event  of  an  emergency  and  a  separate  telephone  number 
employees  could  call  to  get  emergency  information.  Immediately  prior  to  Katrina 
making  landfall,  we  also  took  steps  to  ensure  adequate  supplies  and  services  were 
on  hand,  sending  non-perishable  food  to  strategic  areas  where  employees  could  be 
stationed,  setting  up  structural  materials  including  tents,  showers,  toilets,  tables 
and  chairs,  and  engaging  janitorial  and  guard  services.  Our  experience  with  prior 
hurricanes  taught  us  that  our  employees  will  be  called  upon  to  work  round  the 
clock,  and  they  can  best  perform  the  extraordinary  tasks  expected  of  them  if  their 
basic needs for food, shelter, and the safety of their family are addressed. 

As  Katrina  hit  the  Gulf  Coast  on  August  29,  we  assessed  potential  locations  for 
what  we  call  BellSouth  tent  cities—stations  where  employees,  and  their  immediate 
families, in affected areas could seek shelter, receive food, ice, water, showers, laun-
dry  services,  air  mattresses,  linens  and  clothing,  medical  care,  and  financial  loans. 
In  addition,  we  had  on  hand  access  to  our  employee  assistance  program  to  provide 
counseling services as needed. The first tent city was set up in Gulfport, Mississippi 
on  August  30,  a  second  opened  in  Baton  Rouge,  Louisiana  on  September  1,  and  a 
third  on  September  2,  in  Covington,  Louisiana.  With  the  addition  of  tent  cities  in 
Hattiesburg  and  Jackson,  Mississippi,  and  Marrero,  Louisiana  on  September  10th, 
BellSouth  was,  at  the  height  of  its  restoration  efforts,  operating  six  tent  cities  that 
provided  assistance  for  our  employees  and  their  families,  including  medical  care, 
and serving over eight thousand meals daily. 
III. Impact on Network Operations 

Given  where  our  network  is  located,  BellSouth  has  dealt  with  hurricanes  for 
years,  and  is  proud  of  the  resiliency  our  network  has  consistently  demonstrated. 
Based  in  large  part  on  experiences  gained  from  past  hurricanes,  as  a  part  of  our 
prior  overall  network  planning  and  preparation  in  the  low-lying  areas  of  the  New 
Orleans  bowl,  BellSouth  had  located  most  of  its  switches  on  the  second  floor  (or 
above) in the buildings in that area. This planning helped to avoid any major dam-
age  to  BellSouth’s  switches  and  reduced  restoration  time  from  months  to  weeks.  In 
the  coastal  areas  of  Louisiana  and  Mississippi,  BellSouth  built  certain  flood-prone 
buildings on pilings in order to elevate those buildings approximately ten feet above 
ground  level.  Even  these  precautions,  however,  were  not  enough  to  withstand 
Katrina’s  sustained  winds  in  excess  of  145  miles  per  hour  and  storm  surges  of  25– 
40 feet. 

Prior  to  Katrina  making  landfall  in  Florida,  we  activated  our  standard  hurricane 
procedures.  These  include  ensuring  that  our  1,000+  mobile  generators  are  in  work-
ing  order  and  staged  at  the  sites  needed,  fuel  tanks  are  filled  for  our  central  office 
and  key  administrative  office  generators  and  vehicles,  network  supplies  are  relo-
cated  (including  tents  in  the  event  tent  cities  need  to  be  established  for  the  safety 
and shelter of our employees), and support personnel are staged in nearby locations. 
The  tropical  depression  became  Hurricane  Katrina  and  first  made  landfall  in 
South Florida as a Category 1 hurricane on Thursday evening, August 25th, causing 
considerable  damage  to  the  area.  After  passing  over  Florida  and  reaching  the  Gulf 
of  Mexico,  Katrina  developed  into  a  Category  5  hurricane  and  then  dropped  to  a 
Category  4  just  before  making  her  second  landfall  in  our  operating  area  at  about 
2 p.m. on Monday, August 29th, east of New Orleans. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Operations  in  Florida,  Alabama,  Mississippi  and  Louisiana,  all  have  been  im-
pacted  by  Katrina.  Nevertheless,  we  have  made  significant  strides  toward  restora-
tion of communications capabilities. As I will describe in more detail below, we have 
three different types of restoration efforts underway. In places like Gulfport and Bi-
loxi, Mississippi and New Orleans, Louisiana, the impact on our customers, our em-
ployees  and  our  network  have  been  catastrophic,  and  basic  restoration  is  still  en-
cumbered  by  flooding,  debris,  and  security  issues.  In  other  parts  of  Louisiana,  Mis-
sissippi, and Alabama, we are well into our restoration efforts and progressing rap-
idly.  In  Florida,  we  are  wrapping  up  our  restoration  efforts,  and  freeing  up  re-
sources  like  generators  and  technicians  to  move  to  the  other  areas  where  they  are 
needed. 
IV. Network Status 

In the Gulf region of Mississippi, Alabama, and Louisiana, BellSouth has 4.9 mil-
lion access lines. A snapshot on August 30, after the second landfall, estimated that 
2.475  million  lines,  a  little  more  than  half  of  those  in  the  area,  were  actually  af-
fected  by  the  storm.  As  of  the  morning  of  Tuesday,  September  20,  approximately 
210,000 (8.5 percent) of the original 2.475 million lines remained impacted. 

BellSouth has 1,591 central office buildings across its region. 578 of those central 
office buildings are located in Alabama, Louisiana, and Mississippi. Throughout the 
storm,  545  of  the  578  central  offices  in  Alabama,  Louisiana,  and  Mississippi  never 
lost service. As the loss of commercial power was widespread, many of these offices 
were  running  on  batteries,  supported  by  generators.  Today,  six  central  offices  are 
still  running  on  generators.  Generators  require  fuel,  and  in  the  past,  our  network 
personnel  have  had  access  to  the  central  offices  where  the  generators  are  housed 
in  order  to  ensure  their  proper  fueling  and  operations.  This  was  not  true  with 
Katrina. 

Katrina  was  different  from  any  hurricane  BellSouth  has  faced  previously.  It  had 
three distinct phases—the Florida hurricane, the Gulf Coast hurricane, and the New 
Orleans  flooding.  Severe  damage  was  associated  with  the  storm’s  landfall,  but  the 
flooding  that  followed  when  the  levees  broke  created  significant  additional  disrup-
tion.  Generally,  hurricanes  have  an  initial  surge,  the  water  recedes,  power  restora-
tion begins, and then we follow the power company with telecom restoration forces. 
When  the  levees  broke  in  New  Orleans,  the  water  did  not  recede.  Because  of  the 
continued flooding, and the unprecedented security issues, generator power was lost 
at  several  central  offices  due  to  our  inability  to  refuel.  The  flooding  also  caused  ex-
tensive damage to buildings and other structures in the flooded areas. 

Since  August  29th,  BellSouth  lost  service  at  various  times  in  a  total  of  thirty- 
three  of  BellSouth’s  central  offices  in  the  impacted  area.  Today,  there  are  fifteen 
central  offices  that  have  not  been  restored  to  service.  Of  the  fifteen,  ten  are  small 
offices  along  the  coastal  area  with  severe  devastation.  We  have  already  begun  re-
storing  service  in  some  of  those  areas  using  digital  loop  carrier  systems.  The  re-
maining  five  offices  are  in  the  New  Orleans  flooded  area.  Four  of  these  offices  are 
currently  being  restored,  and  we  started  pumping  the  flood  waters  out  of  the  fifth 
one on Tuesday, September 20. 

We continue to work around the clock to restore service. As a part of our restora-
tion  efforts,  we  conduct  damage  surveys  throughout  the  area.  We  have  completed 
27,666  surveys  to  date,  and  are  finished  with  surveys  in  all  but  the  hardest  hit 
areas where accessibility is still an issue. We are between 30 percent and 70 percent 
complete  with  surveys  in  those  hardest  hit  areas.  Initially,  we  concentrate  on  res-
toration of highest priority circuits, specifically those which support public safety in-
cluding hospitals, E–911 centers, and law enforcement. Then we focus on supporting 
other  carriers,  including  the  wireless  industry.  I  have  listed  these  sequentially,  but 
they are often worked simultaneously. 

Following  the  storm,  in  Florida  and  Alabama,  there  were  no  E–911  centers  that 
incurred outages. For Mississippi, service was impacted to forty-three out of 138 E– 
911 centers, and service to all forty-three centers has been restored onsite or by re- 
routing  the  calls  to  other  centers.  Many  E–911  centers  required  the  re-routing  of 
traffic,  and  in  most  instances  the  re-routing  was  accomplished  within  hours  after 
contact with the E–911 center officials. All of these centers were back in service by 
September 4th. 

In Louisiana, thirty-five of ninety-one E–911 centers were impacted, and thirty of 
these  are  partially  or  totally  back  in  service,  either  onsite  or  through  re-routing  of 
calls  to  other  centers.  Of  the  five  E–911  centers  that  remain  out  of  service,  all  are 
in  the  New  Orleans  area.  Three  of  the  centers  are  located  in  Plaquemine  and  St. 
Bernard  parishes,  low-lying  parishes  along  the  Mississippi  River.  The  remaining 
two  are  located  in  New  Orleans.  BellSouth  is  in  contact  with  the  E–911  officials  in 
the  five  Louisiana  E–911  centers  that  remain  out  of  service,  and  we  are  working 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

with  them  to  implement  plans  to  re-route  traffic  to  alternate  sites  and  restore  E– 
911 service to these areas. 

BellSouth has also been extremely focused on the wireless industry in its network 
restoration  efforts.  Prior  to  the  storm’s  landfall,  we  invited  several  key  carriers  to 
collocate  at  our  emergency  command  center,  recognizing  the  critical  role  that  wire-
less plays in today’s communications and also knowing the key role we play in ena-
bling  wireless  service.  Together  with  members  of  the  wireless  industry,  we  devel-
oped  a  joint  wireless  restoration  plan,  focused  on  inter-office  rings,  prioritizing  cell 
site  restoration,  and  the  placement  of  microwave  facilities.  These  carriers  provided 
input  for  restoration  priorities  together  with  our  team.  We  also  conduct  two  daily 
calls—one with wireless carriers and one with wireline carriers. These collaborative 
efforts  have  been  very  important  in  the  restoration  effort.  I  am  also  proud  of  our 
efforts to re-route traffic from New Orleans to Texas, Florida, and/or to switches and 
locations  requested  by  the  carriers  in  order  to  create  communications  capacity  and 
restore  service  for  wireless  and  wireline  customers.  In  this  new  and  dynamic  age 
of  communications,  alternative  technologies,  such  as  wireless  and  VoIP,  utilize  and 
interconnect with the traditional wireline network. Thus, as BellSouth restores and 
rebuilds  our  network,  we  are  in  fact  enabling  providers  of  such  alternative  tech-
nologies to re-institute their services as well. 

BellSouth  will  continue  to  work  collaboratively  with  the  industry  on  the  ongoing 
restoration  efforts  in  the  New  Orleans  and  Gulf  Coast  areas.  However,  there  are 
challenges.  As  the  New  Orleans  and  Gulf  Coast  areas  are  restored,  there  has  been 
a  substantial  amount  of  construction  activity  by  utilities  and  their  contractors,  as 
well  as  other  businesses  and  homeowners.  This  activity  has  caused  damage  to 
BellSouth’s  network  that  must  also  be  repaired.  Indeed,  several  major  routes  have 
already  been  cut  multiple  times.  For  example,  on  Monday,  September  12,  a  major 
fiber  route  from  Hammond,  Louisiana  to  Covington,  Louisiana  was  cut  by  a  tree 
trimming company. This had an impact on both wireline and wireless carriers. Even 
though we are deploying damage prevention crews, it will not be possible to prevent 
these  types  of  occurrences  for  some  time  in  the  future,  given  the  level  of  construc-
tion activity in the area. 

Efforts  are  ongoing  as  we  search  collectively  to  overcome  the  unique  problems 
caused  by  flood  waters  that  blocked  access  to  switches  and  cellular  sites  in  need  of 
restoration. Escorted teams traveled by boat to several of the sites to survey accessi-
bility and status to determine what equipment was needed to restore service. Micro-
wave antennas have already been placed in New Orleans to enable communications 
from two of these sites. The first one, at Florida Boulevard, serves T-Mobile, AllTel, 
and Sprint/Nextel; the second, at Franklin Road near Lake Airport, serves Verizon, 
Sprint/Nextel and Cingular. A third microwave antenna has now been placed in Bi-
loxi, Mississippi. 

The significant progress toward restoration is due to the tireless and often heroic 
efforts  of  our  employees  who  are  working  around  the  clock  with  a  single  minded 
mission  of  restoring  communications  to  these  hard  hit  areas,  and  to  the  efforts  of 
our  wireless  and  wireline  industry  colleagues  who  have  partnered  with  us  with  an 
unwavering commitment to enable communications. 

Our  experience  in  the  New  Orleans  Main  Central  Office  at  840  Poydras  Street 
gives a sense of the situation on the ground. BellSouth employees began staffing an 
Emergency  Operations  Center  (EOC)  on  the  12th  Floor  of  the  building  on  Sunday, 
August  28.  The  office  lost  power  and  engaged  generators  when  the  storm  hit  on 
Monday,  but  occupants  breathed  a  sigh  of  relief  that  there  was  no  flooding.  Then, 
the levee broke and conditions rapidly deteriorated on Tuesday. Technicians and en-
gineers in the office were trying to re-establish service and maintain power by keep-
ing the generators fueled and running. As the situation in New Orleans deteriorated 
with  violence  and  looting,  the  New  Orleans  Police  and  the  Louisiana  State  Police 
told  us  to  evacuate  the  building.  There  was  gunfire  in  the  area  and  we  were  told 
it  was  unsafe  for  our  employees  to  remain.  At  3  p.m.  CST,  the  Louisiana  State  Po-
lice  arrived  and  provided  us  with  an  armed  escort  so  we  could  leave  the  building. 
We  moved  to  Baton  Rouge  and,  concerned  for  the  security  of  the  building,  we  ar-
ranged  for  FBI  agents  to  take  occupancy  of  the  building  at  approximately  9  that 
evening.  By  Friday  morning,  the  Louisiana  State  Police  and  the  FBI  occupied  the 
building.  At  that  time,  we  began  armed  and  escorted  caravans  to  the  building  to 
bring  fuel  for  the  generator,  water  for  the  chillers,  BellSouth  personnel,  as  well  as 
personnel  from  other  carriers  (at  BellSouth’s  open  invitation).  In  spite  of  these 
harrowing  facts,  this  key  switch,  which  serves  as  a  regional  hub  for  multiple  car-
riers,  remained  in  operation.  And,  of  course,  some  of  the  Poydras  Street  personnel, 
as  well  as  personnel  assisting  in  restoration  efforts  across  the  impacted  area,  are 
putting forth Herculean efforts in trying circumstances. Many of them have lost ev-
erything. Some of them are now residents, with their families, of the BellSouth tent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

cities. Yet they continue to demonstrate commitment and resolve to rebuild the com-
munications network expected by their fellow citizens. 

Another heroic story rises out of the coastal town of Gulfport, Mississippi. On Sep-
tember 3, a brick wall protecting the main generator keeping the central office alive 
started  to  give  way.  Nine  workers  from  that  central  office  ran  from  the  basement, 
where  they  had  been  working  while  riding  out  the  storm,  to  the  rooftop  room  and 
fortified  the  walls  with  whatever  they  could  find—plastic  tarps,  plywood  and  even 
the cardboard from a science project of one worker’s son. The main wall in the office 
collapsed, yet their efforts to protect the switch were successful. 
V. Government Cooperation and Needs 

The cooperation and assistance from local, State, and Federal agencies overall has 
been good. The FCC, along with its Staff members, has been extraordinarily helpful. 
The FCC reached out to offer assistance in many areas: waiving rules that will help 
customers  who  are  without  service;  taking  actions  that  have  and  will  allow  for  the 
quick  restoration  of  network  facilities  (including  the  emergency  routing  of  traffic 
over  whatever  facilities  are  available  for  use);  and  helping  with  the  publication  of 
‘‘find  me’’  numbers  to  help  locate  BellSouth  employees.  Because  of  this,  BellSouth 
has  been  able  to  make  its  interLATA  corporate  communications  network  available 
to  companies  like  Sprint  and  Telapex,  a  Mississippi  wireless  carrier,  for  use  in 
emergency  routing  of  their  traffic  impacted  by  Katrina.  BellSouth  has  also  been  in 
constant  communication  with  other  Federal  agencies  and  has  received  strong  sup-
port from the White House Executive Office of the President. 

We  will  continue  to  need  this  type  of  help,  particularly  related  to  the  efforts  to 
restore  communications  in  Louisiana  and  the  Mississippi  Gulf  Coast  areas.  The 
magnitude  of  the  damage  will  present  unique  issues  that  will  need  to  be  resolved 
quickly  and  efficiently  in  order  to  restore  service.  The  Louisiana  and  Mississippi 
Public Service Commissions have also stepped up to provide assistance to the indus-
try  in  efforts  to  assess  damage,  maintain  the  operation  of  the  remaining  network, 
and restore service to impacted areas. 

As we continue to restore service to the area, several things are critical. First, we 
need  safe  access  to  our  network  facilities.  This  will  require  the  abatement  of  the 
flooding in New Orleans, which is underway. Now, and when the flood waters have 
receded, we need adequate security measures to ensure the safety of our technicians 
trying to assess and conduct repairs. 

Second,  we  will  need  flexibility  and  patience.  It  will  take  many  months  for 
BellSouth to permanently repair the damage caused by Katrina and restore service 
to residents in all areas. We will continue to work around the clock to restore serv-
ice to our customers as they re-build and become ready to be served. BellSouth has 
experienced  twenty-two  hurricanes  since  1992,  storms  such  as  Andrew,  Hugo,  and 
now Katrina. Congress and the private sector alike should be cautious about build-
ing  unrealistic  expectations  about  how  long  it  takes  to  fully  recover  from  a  storm 
packing  the  furor  of  a  Katrina.  Also  a  key  difference  in  this  storm  is  the  amount 
of social dislocation experienced by the fact that nearly one million people have been 
moved  because  of  the  storm.  Many  of  the  population  patterns  may  never  return  as 
they  were.  Cities  like  Baton  Rouge,  Memphis,  and  LaFayette  have  experienced  sig-
nificant  population  growth  with  the  attendant  stress  on  all  infrastructures,  includ-
ing the communications. Building capacity will take time. 

Third, the government needs to recognize that the cost to BellSouth to restore the 
communications infrastructure will be significant. BellSouth has estimated that the 
cost  to  restore  our  network  as  a  result  of  Hurricane  Katrina  will  be  between  $400 
and $600 million. By comparison, the cost to BellSouth of the damage caused by the 
four  hurricanes  that  hit  Florida  last  year  was  approximately  $200  million.  And,  of 
course, we’re still in the middle of the hurricane season, and the long-term impacts 
of the flooding in New Orleans are hard to estimate. Legislative incentives, such as 
tax  credits,  would  be  tremendously  helpful  as  companies  rebuild  areas  devastated 
by Katrina. 

Restoration of our near-ubiquitous infrastructure will demand that we deploy cap-
ital,  not  as  a  cost-plus  utility,  but  as  a  company  re-building  its  network  in  a  very 
competitive industry. We will be expected to rebuild without knowing what our ulti-
mate  demand  will  be.  And,  we  will  rebuild  this  network  in  an  environment  where 
many  companies  depend  on  our  network  for  providing  service  to  their  customers, 
but where policy doesn’t equally distribute the burden of restoration among all play-
ers.  The  FCC  has  been  very  helpful  in  waiving  rules  that  hamper  restoration.  We 
will, however, need continued focus from the policy community on rules and regula-
tions  that  hamper  access  to  capital.  Timely  restoration  requires  that  we  spend  this 
money  now,  well  in  advance  of  knowing  what  people  and  businesses  will  actually 
return  to  affected  areas,  and  when,  and  that  we  add  capacity  in  areas  like  Baton 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Rouge, or even state parks where tent cities have emerged, without having any ex-
pectation of long-term continued service revenues out of that installed capacity. 
VI. Path Forward and Lessons Learned 

So  what  are  the  lessons  learned  thus  far?  Because  we  are  still  in  the  midst  of 
restoration,  it  is  difficult  to  create  an  exhaustive  list  of  lessons  learned  as  a  result 
of  the  unique  circumstance  that  has  been  presented  by  Hurricane  Katrina  and  the 
consequent flooding in New Orleans, but the following are some of our more signifi-
cant experiences to date. 

First,  both  network  providers,  as  well  as  customer/consumers,  have  become  more 
and more dependent on commercial power. As networks deploy more advanced tech-
nology  in  the  more  remote  parts  of  the  network  (remote  terminals,  DLC  systems), 
these  systems  require  power  to  operate,  and  thus  introduce  more  potential  points 
of  failure  in  the  event  of  an  extended  power  outage.  Consumers  are  using  more 
cordless phones, which also require commercial power to operate. And the vast pro-
liferation of cellular phones, which could potentially use automobile batteries for re-
charging,  also  becomes  an  issue  when  your  automobile  is  six  feet  under  water.  As 
a  result,  many  ‘‘communications’’  failures  flow  from  the  loss  of  power  to  customer 
premises  equipment  (CPE)  and  other  power  driven  applications,  not  from  a  funda-
mental loss of connectivity in the telecommunications network. 

Second,  the  communications  industry  and  government  bodies  need  to  work  more 
closely  together  to  establish,  well  in  advance,  multiple  alternate  retreat  points  and 
paths  for  the  routing  of  E–911  traffic  in  the  case  of  a  catastrophe.  BellSouth  has 
a proud history of service to E–911 centers and will continue its commitment to find 
new and better ways to ensure that emergency traffic can be successfully routed and 
handled during emergencies. BellSouth is concerned that some communications pro-
viders  are  using  Katrina  as  a  means  to  delay  implementation  of  E–911  obligations. 
BellSouth  believes  that  Katrina  has  highlighted  the  converse;  which  is  a  need  for 
ubiquitous E–911 by all communications providers. 

Third,  emergency  personnel  need  radio  equipment  that  can  access  a  common  fre-
quency.  Many  of  the  first  responder  issues  in  Katrina  arise  from  the  use  of  dedi-
cated  radio  emergency  communications  equipment.  As  we  saw  in  9/11,  oftentimes 
different  departments  (i.e.,  police  and  fire),  or  different  jurisdictions  (i.e.,  state  and 
city or Louisiana and Arkansas), have equipment based on different frequencies and 
thus  can  not  communicate  with  each  other.  This  needs  to  be  resolved,  probably  by 
the promulgation of national standards. 

Fourth,  carriers  should  be  mindful  of,  and  plan  for,  flooding  when  locating  their 
switch  equipment  in  flood-prone  areas,  locating  them,  where  practical,  above  flood 
lines.  As  I  previously  mentioned,  BellSouth  has  taken  this  step  in  the  vast  bulk  of 
its offices, locating both switches and generators on upper floors of buildings. In ad-
dition,  the  location  and  availability  of  fuel  needs  to  be  addressed  in  a  way  that  en-
sures  that  fuel  can  be  available  for  emergency  generators  no  matter  the  cir-
cumstance. This likely will have some environmental questions attendant to it that 
will require flexibility and engagement to resolve. 

Fifth,  critical  telecommunications  infrastructure  owners  and  operators  should  be 
designated  as  first  responders  in  the  event  of  a  major  disaster  and  should  be  in-
cluded  in  preparations  or  responses  to  such  events.  Unfortunately,  that  is  not  the 
case today, which has impeded response capabilities and undermined restoration ef-
forts.  The  importance  of  restoring  telecommunications  networks  during  a  disaster 
cannot be underestimated. When you hear stories about customers being able to use 
Vonage’s  service  during  the  hurricane,  keep  in  mind  that  they  need  an  underlying 
network to ride in order for Vonage’s service to work. 

Finally,  industry  cooperation  throughout  the  recovery  from  Katrina  has  been  ex-
traordinary.  This  should  be  used  as  a  template  to  build  industry-wide  emergency 
response and restoration plans for future catastrophes of this kind. 

I  would  like  to  close  by  thanking  you  for  your  interest  and  help  and  by  thanking 
my colleagues at BellSouth. As FCC Commissioner Copps noted after seeing our re-
sponse  efforts,  we  have  mobilized  this  company  from  top  to  bottom.  In  conjunction 
with  that  mobilization,  our  BellSouth  family  of  employees  and  retirees  has  stepped 
forward with over $838,000 in contributions to aid the impacted families. Our com-
pany continues to match these contributions on a 2-to-1 basis. In addition, we have 
started  an  adopt-a-family  program,  which  matches  employees  willing  to  help  those 
needing  help.  And,  we  have  announced  a  $5  million  grant  to  the  Departments  of 
Education in Louisiana, and Mississippi, to facilitate e-learning, and to ensure that 
those  high  school  students  displaced  by  the  storm  can  continue  with  their  studies, 
through  the  use  of  technology,  and  graduate  on  time.  We  will  restore  and  rebuild 
as we always do. That’s what we expect of ourselves. That’s what we do. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Roth,  who  is  the  Ex-
ecutive  Vice  President  of  External  Affairs  and  Public  Relations 
with  Cingular.  Thank  you.  I  must  commend  you.  I  had  a  Cingular 
system  I  took  over  to  Kuwait,  Iraq,  Turkey,  and  Italy.  It  was  an 
international  chip  and  I  never  missed  a  lick  anywhere  along  the 
line so, congratulations. 
STATEMENT  OF  PAUL  ROTH,  EXECUTIVE  VICE  PRESIDENT, 
EXTERNAL  AFFAIRS  AND  PUBLIC  RELATIONS,  CINGULAR 
WIRELESS 
Mr. ROTH. Thank you, sir. Thank you. Thank you, Chairman Ste-
vens  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity 
to testify today. I am Paul Roth the Executive Vice President of Ex-
ternal  Affairs  and  Public  Relations  for  Cingular  Wireless  and  I’m 
here today on behalf of Stan Sigman, our CEO, who is actively pre-
paring for Hurricane Rita and still working on the restoration from 
Hurricane Katrina. 

Katrina damaged our network like no storm or disaster had ever 
done. As the storm passed Cingular had lost approximately 85 per-
cent  of  our  coverage  in  the  hardest  hit  areas  of  New  Orleans  and 
Biloxi. Of the lost towers, 20 percent were physically damaged and 
approximately  80  percent  were  lost  when  the  infrastructure  sup-
porting them was damaged. We’ve all seen pictures of damage, and 
I’d  like  to  call  your  attention  to  at  least  two  examples  of  what  the 
damage did to our wireless network. 

The  first  one  is  of  a  concrete  structure.  This  is  what  housed  our 
electronics  for  one  of  our  cell  sites.  The  storm  surge  completely 
eradicated everything but the concrete foundation. 

The second poster is of a crushed cell tower. Our towers are built 
on the coast for 200 mile an hour winds but they are not invincible 
to  debris  thrown  at  150,  160  miles  an  hour.  This  is  a  tower  that 
was knocked down, struck by debris. 

But the real loss in the New Orleans area, was to one of our two 
switches.  When  the  levees  broke  the  switch  was  flooded  knocking 
out the majority of the service in that area. 

That’s  what  happened  and  this  is  what  we’ve  done  about  it. 
We’ve  learned  from  past  disasters  and  we  have  a  very  comprehen-
sive  disaster  plan.  It’s  one  that  we  practiced,  rehearsed  with  the 
DHS  just  this  spring  in  anticipation  of  the  hurricane  season.  Our 
disaster  response  team  set  up  staging  areas,  two  of  them,  one  in 
Mississippi,  one  outside  of  New  Orleans.  We  had  800,000  gallons 
of  fuel,  we  had  500  generators,  30  portable  cell  sites,  and  we  had 
over  800  technicians  staged  ready  to  move  in  when  the  storm 
passed. 

Because  of  our  preparation  Cingular  was  the  first  responder  for 
many  in  the  community.  We  loaned  a  generator  to  the  Trent  Lott 
Airport  to  assist  in  refueling  efforts  so  that  disaster  flights  could 
continue. We loaned generators to hotels and churches that had be-
come  temporary  shelters  for  those  escaping  the  storm.  And  we 
loaned  230  satellite  and  3,500  wireless  priority  service-enabled 
phones to first responders. 

We  are  also  very  proud  of  the  fact  that  we  treated  customers  as 
victims  not  as  accounts.  Examples  of  things  we’ve  done.  We  auto-
matically waived up to 50 percent of the customer’s monthly access 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

charge for those in the affected area. We charged no overage, long- 
distance,  or  roaming  charges  for  customers  in  these  areas  as  well, 
and  no  customers  will  be  suspended  in  September,  not  even  those 
who have not paid their bill. 

As  we  move  to  restore  service  quickly  and  continue  the  restora-
tion process, I’d like to give you an update. As of September 19, all 
of the areas were up to 100 percent of their original coverage. New 
Orleans was at 92 percent of its coverage. Biloxi was at 97 percent 
of  its  original  coverage.  With  68  cell  sites  physically  damaged  in 
those  two  areas,  New  Orleans’  capacity  is  at  75  percent  and  im-
proving  daily.  Capacity  in  Biloxi  is  up  to  the  pre-storm  level  of  a 
100 percent. 

As  we  look  back  we  realize  two  things.  One  is  no  two  disasters 
are the same, but we prepare and we learn from each one. And no 
amount of steel or redundancy can guarantee that communications 
will survive a disaster, either manmade or natural. 

We  have  learned  a  couple  of  key  lessons  that  I  think  the  panel 
would  be  most  interested  in.  The  first  is  that  wireless  priority  ac-
cess  which  is  a  technology-prioritizing  calls  and  capacity  for  first 
responders  worked,  and  worked  well  in  this  area.  This  was  a  net-
work solution that was built in to every Cingular wireless network 
following the lessons learned from 9/11. 

The  second,  and  this  is  something  I  think  you’ll  find  very  inter-
esting,  is  a  project  we  call  Pegasus.  Pegasus  is  a  solution  for  a 
worse-case scenario when the local infrastructure is completely de-
stroyed. 

Let  me  start  by  calling  your  attention  to  this  poster  of  a  COLT. 
A  COLT  is  a  cell  site  mounted  on  a  light  truck.  What  makes  this 
one  unique  is  the  satellite  dish  that  you  might  be  able  to  see 
mounted  on  top  that  truck.  The  one  pictured  here  is  one  of  two 
built  and  used  currently  in  the  New  Orleans  area.  It  was  in  the 
works  and  was  expedited  for  Katrina.  The  inspiration  came  from 
our  cruise  ship  experience  where  we  back-haul  traffic  off  of  a  ship 
to  a  switch  on  the  mainland.  It  can  be  driven  into  a  disaster  area 
or possibly engineered so it can be flown in instead of being on top 
of a building or on a beach following a disaster area. It can be oper-
ational  in  hours.  It  requires  no  commercial  power  or  local  telco  fa-
cilities.  It  is  a  fully  independent  solution  to  local  infrastructure.  It 
uses  the  satellite  dish  you  see  on  top  to  connect  to  an  operational 
switch. The one in New Orleans, the one in this picture, is outside 
of Hammond, Louisiana, and is actually connected to our switch in 
Miami,  Florida.  So  we’re  routing  calls  and  probably  as  important 
as anything is the fact that it works with any existing Cingular cel-
lular  phone.  So  whether  you’re  a  victim  in  the  affected  area  or  a 
first  responder,  your  current  Cingular  phone  will  work  with  this 
fully  independent  solution.  One  of  these  trucks  is  right  now  on  its 
way to San Antonio in anticipation it will be needed following Hur-
ricane Rita. 

Pegasus,  which  is  what  we’ve  named  this  project,  should  be  de-
veloped  and  staged  in  key  U.S.  locations  across  the  country  that 
are  vulnerable  to  such  disasters.  The  Pegasus  concept  can  be  ex-
panded,  it  can  be  engineered  better,  it  can  be  deployed  faster,  and 
we  are  willing  to  work  with  government  and  the  rest  of  the  wire-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

less industry to develop this project and evaluate other options and 
lessons learned. 

Thank you for your time today and your interest. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Roth follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PAUL ROTH, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT, 
EXTERNAL AFFAIRS AND PUBLIC RELATIONS, CINGULAR WIRELESS 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  impact 
of  Hurricane  Katrina  and  its  aftermath  on  the  Cingular  Wireless  Network.  I  am 
Paul Roth, Cingular’s Executive Vice President for External Affairs and Public Rela-
tions, and my testimony today will describe what happened after we put our hurri-
cane  crisis  plan  into  effect,  how  we  responded  to  the  ensuing  events,  and  what  ac-
tions we are taking to improve our overall crisis response. 
I. What Happened 

I’d  like  to  begin  with  an  overview  of  the  damage  to  our  network  and  its  causes 
with  an  emphasis  on  the  hardest-hit  areas  in  and  around  New  Orleans  and  Biloxi. 
By  the  time  Katrina  and  the  related  flooding  that  it  caused  reached  its  peak,  we 
had lost about 85 percent of our network in the hardest hit areas. The primary net-
work-affecting events were split between physical damage (20 percent) to our facili-
ties  and  damage  to  the  additional  infrastructure  that  we  depend  on  for  power  and 
connections (80 percent). Of course, simple percentages and familiar words don’t al-
ways  convey  the  magnitude  of  the  destruction  that  our  network  infrastructure  en-
dured. 

I’d  like  to  call  your  attention  to  Attachments  #1  and  #2  below.  The  first  shows 
an  active  cell  site  that  turned  into  nothing  but  a  concrete  platform  after  Katrina. 
The  second  shows  a  crushed  cell  tower.  Though  we  build  our  towers  to  withstand 
winds of 200 miles per hour, that does not make them invincible to the ‘‘debris-mis-
siles’’  launched  by  150  mile  per  hour  winds.  As  bad  as  the  damage  from  wind  and 
debris was, the most significant single hit that our network took came when the lev-
ees broke and one of the two core switches in New Orleans became completely sub-
merged. 
II. How We Responded 

Our first response to Katrina began long before the hurricane ever hit land. Both 
Cingular  and  AT&T  Wireless  had  well-developed  crisis  plans  before  our  merger. 
After our merger, one of the first actions we took was to meld these plans together. 
In  the  late  spring  we  ran  an  exercise  in  crisis  response  and  used  one  of  the  first 
storms of this season as a live, real-time test of our plan. 

First  Response.  Our  initial  response  was  to  set  up  staging  areas  to  support  our 
employees and to restore service. We engineered an initial deployment that included 
500  portable  generators,  800,000  gallons  of  fuel,  1,000  service  personnel,  and  more 
than  30  portable  cell  sites  called  COWS  and  the  first  of  a  new  breed  of  devices 
called  satellite  COLTS.  In  some  instances  we  were  among  the  first  responders  in 
heavily-damaged communities. In those cases we provided support to other first re-
sponders  in  the  area.  These  joint  efforts  included:  setting  up  a  generator  at  Trent 
Lott Airport and restoring power so the airport could support emergency flight oper-
ations; providing fuel to police and other emergency personnel; and making 230 sat-
ellite  phones  and  more  than  3,500  other  wireless  phones  with  Wireless  Priority 
Service to other first responders. 

Employees.  We  moved  immediately  to  take  care  of  our  employees  so  they  could 
take care of our customers. We provided food, water, and basic supplies from trailers 
that we trucked into the affected areas. We also set up tent cities in Ocean Springs 
and  Hammond  that  housed  as  many  as  400  people.  And,  in  less  than  2  weeks,  we 
were  providing  inoculations,  banking  services,  and  even  daycare  from  licensed  pro-
viders at our call center in Ocean Springs. 

Services. We brought in trained personnel from throughout the country to restore 
service  as  expeditiously  as  possible.  Within  3  weeks  of  Katrina’s  landfall  in  Lou-
isiana,  we  had  restored  geographic  coverage  in  New  Orleans  to  92  percent  and  in 
Biloxi to 97 percent. But coverage is not the same as capacity. Even though our re-
stored  network  covers  nearly  all  the  geography  it  did  before  the  storm,  the  overall 
capacity of our network is a bit further behind. The combination of physical damage 
to 68 cell sites and the disruption of the wired networks in New Orleans and Biloxi 
means  that  as  of  9/19  our  network  is  functioning  at  75  percent  of  capacity  in  New 
Orleans  and  100  percent  of  capacity  in  Biloxi.  But  in  Biloxi,  where  wireless  is  the 
sole  means  of  communication  for  many  people,  call  volumes  are  at  140  percent  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

capacity;  and  people  are  still  experiencing  some  blocking  as  we  add  additional  ca-
pacity. 
III. What We Learned 

Katrina  has  demonstrated  that  there  is  no  thickness  of  steel  or  level  of  network 
redundancy  that  can  guarantee  any  communications  network  will  survive  a  worst- 
case natural or man-made disaster. However, with each crisis faced we improve our 
crisis plan and increase the speed and efficiency of our response. 

The  two  most  important  lessons  we  learned  from  Katrina  were  the  effectiveness 
of  Wireless  Priority  Services  (WPS)  and  the  need  to  develop  a  wireless  solution  for 
worst-case scenarios where the local network infrastructure has been destroyed. 

Wireless  Priority  Access.  Because  of  the  unprecedented  volume  of  calls  made  on 
the  wireless  network  following  9/11,  we  built  (per  Federal  direction)  the  capability 
to prioritize wireless calls following a disaster so that the most important calls com-
ing  from  first  responders  were  the  first  calls  completed.  This  functionality  was  put 
to its first real test after Hurricane Katrina and it worked well. 

Solution for Worst Case Scenarios—Project Pegasus. Prior to Katrina, we had been 
working  on  a  project  we  called  Pegasus.  Pegasus  is  our  vision  of  a  way  to  increase 
the  scope  and  deployment  of  portable,  satellite,  cell  sites  (satellite  COLTS)  in  an 
emergency. 

These  COLTS  are  portable  cell  sites  with  satellite  connectivity  mounted  on  light 
trucks.  They  can  be  driven  or  flown  in  to  a  disaster  area.  They  work  with  any 
Cingular  GSM  phone  enabling  victims  and  first  responders  to  use  their  existing 
phones  during  a  crisis.  These  COLTS  provide  a  satellite  connection  to  any  of  our 
operational  switches,  become  operational  in  a  matter  of  hours,  and  require  no  com-
mercial  power  or  wired  network  infrastructure.  The  satellite  COLT  shown  as  At-
tachment  #3  below  is  one  of  our  two  prototypes  that  was  expedited  for  delivery  to 
New  Orleans  and  is  working  there  today  via  its  satellite  connection  to  our  switch 
in Miami. 

Next  Steps.  We  are  moving  as  expeditiously  as  possible  to  expand  our  Pegasus 
Project so satellite COLTS can be built and made available in key locations around 
the  U.S.  for  more-effective  deployment.  We  know  that  Pegasus  is  only  a  start  to  a 
more fully-developed set of tools for worst-case scenarios. 

We  have  resolved  to  open  this  project  through  the  CTIA  for  cooperative  rather 
than  competitive  development  so  that  we  can  truly  bring  together  the  best-of-the- 
best  to  develop  the  full  potential  of  wireless  to  help  people  stay  connected  in  even 
the worst crises. 

I thank you for your time and attention today and in the days ahead. 

ATTACHMENT 1 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
h
o
r

t

49 

ATTACHMENT 2 

ATTACHMENT 3 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

3
h
t
o
r

s
p
e
.
2
h
o
r

t

50 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Roth. Next is Jeffrey 
Citron, the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Vonage. Good 
morning. 

STATEMENT OF JEFFREY A. CITRON, CHAIRMAN/CEO, 

VONAGE HOLDINGS CORPORATION 

Mr.  CITRON.  Well,  good  morning,  Chairman  Stevens,  Chairman 
Inouye, and esteemed Members of the Committee. My name is Jef-
frey  Citron,  and  I  am  the  Chairman  and  CEO  of  Vonage  Holdings 
Corporation.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  be-
half  of  the  entire  Vonage  family  and  our  hundreds  of  thousands  of 
customers.  I  want  to  extend  my  deep  sympathy  for  those  who  lost 
family and friends and for all those who are now homeless as a re-
sult of the Gulf Coast disaster. 

Our  Nation  is  responding  to  this  emergency  with  astonishing 
generosity and I am proud that Vonage employees are no exception. 
They  dug  deep  into  their  pockets,  but  more  importantly  they  have 
given  their  time  and  energy  to  keep  people  communicating 
throughout  the  disaster.  They  have  worked  24  hours  a  day,  seven 
days  a  week  to  donate  several  thousand  working  Internet  phones 
to  relief  workers  and  families  in  the  affected  areas,  keeping  them 
in touch when other networks had failed. 

The  Wall  Street  Journal  reported  that  when  Katrina  hit  the 
Mayor  and  Chief  of  Police  in  New  Orleans  used  several  Vonage 
lines as their only connection to the outside world. President Bush 
while aboard Air Force One was able to call the Mayor on a make-
shift Vonage phone bank, one of the first to establish with local of-
ficials  in  the  affected  areas.  Much  like  September  11th,  the  phone 
networks failed. Wireless networks failed, satellite phones were un-
reliable, but the Internet was still alive in some places and so was 
Internet  phone  service.  For  example,  as  thousands  of  patients  ar-
rived at Baton Rouge General Hospital, Vonage was the only long- 
distance  phone  service  doctors  and  emergency  medical  personnel 
could use to track down medical records and to reunite families. To 
support  aid  workers  from  shelters  to  FEMA,  Vonage  has  been 
working  with  a  nonprofit  Part-15.org  and  other  partners  such  as 
Cisco  and  Intel  to  build  large  wireless  Internet  hotspots  with  free 
Internet phone service in cities like Pass Christian and Biloxi, Mis-
sissippi. 

Mr.  Chairman,  and  members  of  the  Committee,  to  be  clear 
Vonage’s  service  is  successful  in  maintaining  its  operations  during 
these  critical  moments  because  of  the  redundant  and  resilient  na-
ture of the Internet itself. Vonage services relies upon a high-speed 
Internet  connection  which  we  do  not  own  nor  do  we  provide.  Our 
customers  get  broadband  through  many  different  means,  cable 
modem  service,  DSL,  wireless,  broadband  and,  of  course,  even  sat-
ellite.  Vonage  applauds  the  network  operators  that  kept  the  Inter-
net connections working for our users, and without their hard work 
and  dedication  our  service  would  not  be  available  to  so  many  in 
need. 

The  flexibility  that  allows  our  service  to  work  over  any  high- 
speed  network,  any  connection  anywhere,  is  the  reason  our  sub-
scribers were able to communicate in the midst of the Katrina dis-
aster. Still while some of the thousands of Vonage customers in af-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

fected  areas  were  able  to  maintain  communications,  hundreds  of 
our customers were not. Vonage not only relies upon broadband but 
electricity  as  well.  Many  of  our  users  lacked  the  power,  and  to 
make  matters  worse,  our  partners  servicing  the  New  Orleans  area 
was  unable  to  send  calls  from  the  wireline  telephone  network  to 
the Vonage Internet gateways and switches for an entire day. 

If  I  can  offer  the  Committee  any  counsel  in  rebuilding  the  Gulf 
region, it would be not to favor any one technology or provider over 
another.  Instead,  create  a  climate  that  fosters  the  development  of 
many  different  networks.  A  robust  communications  infrastructure 
needs both wired networks, such as cable and DSL, as well as wire-
less networks, such as cell towers, WiFi, WiMax, and satellite. 

As  policymakers  and  as  entrepreneurs  we’ll  never  know  exactly 
which  facilities  will  be  available  in  a  moment  of  a  crisis.  But  a 
range  of  redundant  infrastructure  provides  our  chance  of  having 
something that will work. It is evident that cable and DSL and cel-
lular are just not enough. 

Mr.  Chairman,  not  only  did  Katrina  highlight  the  failure  of  the 
communications network, it should the underscore the urgent need 
to make our 9-1-1 network every bit as flexible and resilient as the 
Internet  itself.  Vonage  is  running  hard  and  fast  to  build  a  nation-
wide E–911 network this year. As a result, Vonage has taken a se-
rious  look  at  our  country’s  9-1-1  systems  and,  frankly,  what  we 
found  is  sobering.  When  the  phone  network  essentially  fails,  so 
does  much  of  our  9-1-1  network  as  well.  In  far  too  many  cases  to-
day’s  9-1-1  system  is  characterized  by  local  technology  decisions 
and  outdated  infrastructure.  Left  to  fend  for  themselves  dedicated 
9-1-1  professionals  are  unable  to  share  resources  or  utilize  today’s 
technology. One of the main reason citizens in New Orleans cannot 
return to their homes is still a lack of functioning 9-1-1 as reported 
by Chairman Martin. A robust 9-1-1 system wouldn’t be eliminated 
by  the  bounds  of  any  single  provider  network  but  instead  utilize 
the  flexibility  and  resilience  of  the  Internet  itself.  As  we  rebuild 
New  Orleans  and  the  affected  regions,  we  would  be  foolish  to  ig-
nore  the  technologies  that  are  already  on  the  table  and  available 
for use. 

Additionally,  Congress  can  play  a  role  in  accelerating  the  up-
grade  of  our  9-1-1  systems  by  granting  the  same  legal  safeguards 
to  all  communication  service  providers  that  offer  9-1-1  emergency 
dialing. 

In  times  of  a  crisis  communications  is  critical.  For  a  successful 
and  speedy  recovery  the  Internet  is  an  incredible  resilient  and  re-
dundant network. This is exactly the kind of performance we need 
in  a  crisis  and  exactly  what  we  need  from  communications  and 
from 9-1-1 networks of tomorrow. 

Our  hearts  go  out  to  the  families  affected  by  this  disaster.  Mr. 
Chairman,  we  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  all  the  Com-
mittee  Members  to  improve  our  nation’s  response  and  capabilities 
in the future. 

Thank you very much for letting me speak here today. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Citron follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JEFFREY A. CITRON, CHAIRMAN/CEO, 

VONAGE HOLDINGS CORPORATION 

Good  morning,  Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye  and  esteemed  members 
of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Jeffrey  Citron,  Chairman  and  CEO  of  Vonage  Hold-
ings  Corporation.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  On  behalf  of  the 
entire Vonage family and our one million users, I want to extend my deep sympathy 
for  those  who  lost  family  and  friends,  and  for  all  those  who  are  now  homeless  as 
a result of the Gulf Coast disaster. 

Our  Nation  is  responding  to  this  emergency  with  astonishing  generosity  and  I’m 
proud that Vonage employees are no exception. They dug deep into their own pock-
ets  to  give  money  to  relief  organizations—but  perhaps  more  importantly  they’ve 
given  time  and  energy  to  keep  people  communicating  throughout  the  disaster. 
Vonage teams have worked 24/7 to ready and ship several thousand donated Inter-
net  phones  that  have  helped  relief  workers  and  affected  families  keep  commu-
nicating when other networks failed. 

The  Wall  Street  Journal  reported  that  immediately  after  Katrina  hit,  the  Mayor 
and Chief of Police of New Orleans used several Vonage lines as their only connec-
tion  to  the  outside  world.  President  Bush,  while  aboard  Air  Force  One,  was  able  to 
call the Mayor’s Vonage number, establishing some of the first communications with 
local officials. 

Much  like  September  11,  phone  networks  failed.  Wireless  networks  failed.  Sat-
ellite  phones  stopped  working.  But  the  Internet  was  still  alive  in  some  places,  and 
so was Internet phone service. 

As  thousands  of  patients  were  coming  into  the  Baton  Rouge  General  Hospital, 
Vonage was the only long-distance voice system available to doctors and emergency 
medical personnel. 

Vonage is also working with a not-for-profit (Part-15.org) and other partners such 
as  Cisco  and  Intel  to  build  large  wireless  Internet  ‘‘hotspots’’  with  free  Internet 
phone  service  in  many  of  the  affected  areas.  In  the  cities  of  Pass  Christian  and  Bi-
loxi MS, police and other emergency responders are now using these wireless Inter-
net  connections  for  voice,  video  and  data  access.  These  networks  are  allowing  local 
and  Federal  officials  like  FEMA  to  communicate  and  share  information  in  areas 
where there is limited connectivity otherwise. 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, to be clear, Vonage’s service is suc-
cessful  in  maintaining  operations  during  these  critical  moments  because  of  the  re-
dundant  and  resilient  nature  of  the  Internet.  Vonage’s  service  relies  upon  a  high- 
speed  Internet  connection.  We  don’t  own  the  last  mile  facilities  that  run  to  our 
users’  homes.  Our  customers  get  broadband  through  many  different  means—cable 
modem  service,  DSL,  wireless  broadband,  even  satellite.  Vonage  applauds  the  net-
work operators that kept Internet connections working for our users. The flexibility 
that  allows  our  service  to  work  over  ANY  high-speed  Internet  connection  ANY-
WHERE  is  the  reason  our  subscribers  are  able  to  communicate  in  the  midst  of  the 
Katrina disaster. 

Still, while many of the thousands of Vonage customers in the affected areas were 
able to maintain communications, some of our customers were not. Several hundred 
were  without  service.  This  is  primarily  because  those  users  lacked  power,  and  be-
cause our partner serving New Orleans was unable to send calls from the telephone 
network to Vonage’s Internet gateways. 

Despite these network failures and lack of power, our customers were able to use 

the Internet to forward their calls to cell phones and other locations. 

If I can offer this Committee any counsel in rebuilding the communications infra-
structure  in  the  Gulf  region,  it  would  be  NOT  to  favor  one  facility  or  provider  over 
another.  Instead,  create  a  climate  that  fosters  deployment  of  all  these  technologies. 
A  robust  communications  infrastructure  needs  wired  networks  such  as  cable  and 
DSL, as well as wireless networks such as cell towers, WiFi and WiMax. 

As  policymakers,  and  as  entrepreneurs,  we’ll  never  know  exactly  which  facilities 
will  be  available  in  a  moment  of  crisis.  But  redundant  infrastructure  improves  our 
chances of having SOMETHING that works. 

Mr.  Chairman,  in  addition  to  highlighting  the  failure  of  communications  net-
works,  Katrina  also  underscored  the  urgent  need  to  make  our  9-1-1  network  every 
bit as flexible and resilient as the Internet. 

Vonage  is  running  hard  and  fast  to  build  a  nationwide  E–911  network  this  year. 
As  a  result,  Vonage  has  taken  a  serious  look  at  our  country’s  9-1-1  system  and 
frankly, what we’ve found is sobering. 

In  far  too  many  cases,  today’s  9-1-1  system  is  characterized  by  local  technology 
decisions  and  outdated  infrastructure.  Left  to  fend  for  themselves,  dedicated  9-1-1 
professionals are unable to share resources or utilize today’s technology. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Did you know that many 9-1-1 centers are unable to transfer calls within a given 
state or region? Had this capability been in place before Katrina, when 9-1-1 centers 
in affected areas went down, calls could have been transferred to working 9-1-1 cen-
ters.  At  the  very  least  state  and  national  law  enforcement  could  have  had  a  better 
picture of where resources were most urgently needed. 

Additionally, Congress can play a role in accelerating 9-1-1 deployment by grant-
ing  the  same  legal  safeguards  to  all  communications  services  that  offer  9-1-1  emer-
gency dialing. Internet phone providers are given no legal protection for completing 
9-1-1 calls, unlike wireless and wireline phone companies. 

One  of  the  main  reasons  citizens  in  New  Orleans  cannot  return  to  their  homes 
is the lack of a functioning 9-1-1 system. A robust 9-1-1 system wouldn’t be limited 
by the bounds of a single provider’s network, but would instead utilize all the flexi-
bility  and  resilience  of  the  Internet.  As  we  rebuild  New  Orleans  and  the  affected 
regions, we would be foolish to ignore technology already on the table. 

In times of crisis, communications is critical for a successful and speedy recovery. 
The  Internet  is  an  incredibly  resilient  and  redundant  network.  This  is  exactly  the 
kind of performance we need in a crisis, and exactly what we need from the commu-
nications and 9-1-1 networks of tomorrow. 

Our hearts go out to families affected by this disaster. Mr. Chairman, we look for-
ward  to  working  with  you  and  the  Committee  to  improve  our  response  capability 
in the future. 
Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Next, pronounce it for me, will you? 
Mr. ESLAMBOLCHI. Eslambolchi. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Eslambolchi,  AT&T  Global  Networking. 

Thank you very much. Appreciate your testimony. 
STATEMENT  OF  HOSSEIN  ESLAMBOLCHI,  PRESIDENT,  AT&T 
GLOBAL  NETWORKING  TECHNOLOGY  SERVICES  AND  AT&T 
LABS;  AT&T  CHIEF  TECHNOLOGY  OFFICER  AND  CHIEF 
INFORMATION OFFICER 
Mr.  ESLAMBOLCHI.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator 
Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Hossein 
Eslambolchi.  I’m  the  President  of  AT&T  Global  Networking  Tech-
nology  Services  at  AT&T  Laboratories.  I  also  serve  as  AT&T’s 
Chief  Technology  Officer  and  AT&T  Chief  Information  Officer.  I 
also  serve  on  AT&T’s  Governing  Executive  Committee.  My  duties 
include  responsibility  for  AT&T’s  global  network,  including  net-
work disaster recovery. 

Let  me  report  to  you  first  on  AT&T’s  encounter  with  Katrina, 
then offer some policy recommendations. AT&T’s network remained 
overwhelmingly  intact  following  the  hurricane  and  flooding.  At  all 
times  we  were  able  to  carry  at  least  95  percent  of  the  calls  in  the 
Gulf Coast area that came through our network. In addition, with-
in  just  a  few  minutes  our  network  automatically  restored  half  of 
the  capacity  that  was  initially  lost.  Another  quarter  was  restored 
within 24 hours through manually rerouting, and the final quarter 
was  restored  within  48  hours  when  AT&T  workers  physically  in-
stalled  two  cables  to  re-route  traffic  on  damaged  regeneration 
equipment.  We  built  our  only  major  switching  station  in  the  New 
Orleans area on high ground. It did not flood and it remained oper-
ational. While this switch and more than 100 other offices lost com-
mercial  power  at  one  time  or  another,  we  had  sufficient  backup 
generators, fuel, and batteries to meet that challenge. 

Our  greatest  concern  was  security.  Security  concerns  forced  our 
employees  to  evacuate  the  switching  facilities  on  August  31,  as 
local  law  enforcement  was  unable  to  ensure  the  safety  of  the  site. 
Fortunately, the building was subsequently secured, our employees 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

returned  the  following  day  with  necessary  supplies  and  food.  Dur-
ing the period our employees were out of the building, the network 
infrastructure  was  put  on  automatic  controls  and  monitored  re-
motely by AT&T Global Network Operation Center. 

On  a  nationwide  basis  following  Katrina,  we  carried  traffic  at 
levels  that  exceeded  the  prior  week’s  demand  by  about  10  percent. 
Nonetheless,  we  could  not  complete  calls  to  other  networks  that 
suffered  more  severe  disruptions.  As  a  result,  we  were  forced  to 
block  millions  of  calls  a  day  into  the  affected  area  due  to  the  out-
ages in terminating local and cellular networks. 

During the crisis the National Coordination Center, NCC, an in-
dustry forum with government participation and the National Com-
munication System of the Department of Homeland Security played 
very  positive  roles  in  matching  available  resources  to  pending 
needs,  the  FCC  stepped  up  in  leadership  and  authority  as  a  clear-
ing house for telecommunication recovery needs. 

AT&T  worked  with  these  entities  and  also  put  its  resources  to 
work  to  help  others.  We  helped  first  responders,  for  example,  by 
dispatching  five  emergency  communication  vehicles,  ECVs  with 
satellite  capabilities  to  assist  the  Louisiana  State  Police,  the  Lou-
isiana National Guard, Stennis International Airport, NASA Space 
Center, which became an evacuee center, and other civil emergency 
authorities in Mississippi and Louisiana. We also helped other car-
riers  by  providing  generators  and  fuel  and  carrying  a  significant 
amount  of  traffic  for  other  carriers  that  could  not  do  so  for  them-
selves.  We  worked  to  help  evacuees  as  well,  working  with  other 
companies  we  helped  establish  voice  and  data  communications 
services  at  the  Houston  Astrodome.  We  also  issued  35,000  prepaid 
calling  cards  for  survivors  and  evacuees,  donated  more  than  $1.5 
million,  including  matching  funds  for  our  employees’  donations, 
and gave 148 laptops to the Red Cross for relief efforts. In addition, 
we provided toll-free calling and 10 call centers to help with the na-
tional fundraiser, Shelter From The Storm. 

For  residential  customers  in  southern  Mississippi  and  the  great-
er  New  Orleans  area,  we  are  waiving  monthly  fees  and  not  billing 
for  local  and  long-distance  service  from  homes  in  the  affected  area 
until  those  customers  once  again  originate  service  from  home.  We 
have  temporarily  stopped  billing  collection  efforts  in  Louisiana, 
Mississippi, and Alabama. 

For  government  and  business  customers,  we  are  restoring  serv-
ices  at  damaged  sites  and  augmenting  the  capabilities  at  other  lo-
cations  as  needed.  To  do  so,  we  operate  a  war  room  to  meet  and 
prioritize  their  needs.  We  are  also  waiving  recurring  and  non-re-
curring charges that affect the sites until they can re-establish op-
erations. 

I’ve  discussed  in  my  written  submission  the  importance  of  the 
preparation,  execution,  and  ongoing  improvement  to  provide  vital 
communication  infrastructure.  Here  though,  I  would  like  to  offer  a 
few  specific  policy  recommendations  based  on  our  Katrina  experi-
ence. 

Make  additional  spectrum  available  for  public  safety  purposes 
and  ensure  that  all  first  responders  can  access  it  in  a  coordinated 
and interconnected fashion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

Furnish,  standardize,  and  approve  emergency  credentials  to  in-
frastructure providers in advance, so that AT&T and others can get 
into affected areas to restore vital capability without delay or inter-
ference. 

Pre-determine  security  needs  for  law  enforcement  deployment  to 
protect critical infrastructure facilities immediately following a dis-
aster. 

Establish  and  routinely  exercise  mechanisms  for  public/private 

coordination across all essential disciplines. 

Drill for emergencies under various scenarios frequently, and in-
clude  the  public  and  private  sector.  Do  not  be  satisfied  just  with 
a written plan. 

Consider  incenting  emergency  preparations  for  infrastructure 

companies. 

We  can  never  anticipate  every  contingency,  nor  can  we  assure  a 
foolproof  communications  network  under  all  circumstances.  None-
theless,  at  AT&T  we  have  done  much  to  maintain  reliability  and 
restorability of networks, and together as an industry and as a na-
tion we can do more. 

I  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  to  advance  this  important 

discussion, Mr. Chairman. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Eslambolchi follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HOSSEIN ESLAMBOLCHI,  PRESIDENT,  AT&T  GLOBAL 
NETWORKING TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND AT&T LABS; AT&T CHIEF TECHNOLOGY 
OFFICER AND CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 
Thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye,  and  members  of  the  Committee. 
My  name  is  Hossein  Eslambolchi,  and  I  am  the  President  of  AT&T’s  Global  Net-
working  Technology  Services  and  AT&T  Labs.  I  also  serve  as  AT&T’s  Chief  Tech-
nology Officer and Chief Information Officer. I advise AT&T’s Chairman and senior 
leaders  on  technology  issues,  and  serve  on  AT&T’s  Executive  Committee,  the  com-
pany’s governing panel. 

In particular, I am responsible for AT&T’s strategic technology direction, network 
operations,  research  and  development,  and  information  technology  systems  and 
processes. My network operations duties include responsibility for the design, devel-
opment,  engineering,  operations,  reliability,  and  restorability  of  AT&T’s  global  net-
work,  and  the  development  and  creation  of  new  services,  tools,  and  capabilities  for 
next-generation  Internet  Protocol  (IP)  networks.  I  joined  AT&T’s  Bell  Laboratories 
in 1986 and have more than 17 years of expertise in designing and developing pack-
et  networks.  I  also  have  spent  significant  time  working  on  the  reliability  and 
restorability  of  telecommunications  networks.  In  this  regard,  I  headed  the  develop-
ment team for AT&T’s Fast Automated Restoration System (FASTAR), which AT&T 
successfully  deployed  in  1992,  making  it  possible  to  quickly  restore  service  when 
high-capacity  fiber  optic  cables  are  damaged.  As  head  of  AT&T’s  global  network,  I 
am  also  responsible  for  AT&T’s  network  disaster  recovery  capabilities  and  oper-
ations. 

I  want  to  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  calling  this  important  hearing  and  for 
allowing  me  the  opportunity  to  share  with  you  what  we  have  done  and  are  doing 
generally  to  ensure  the  reliability  and  restorability  of  AT&T  network  services,  and 
what  we  at  AT&T  have  been  doing  specifically  in  response  to  Hurricane  Katrina. 
After discussing our efforts generally to protect our network and our customers from 
disruption,  there  are  four  areas  on  which  I  would  like  to  focus  my  remarks  today: 
the  impact  of  Katrina  on  AT&T’s  network;  AT&T’s  assistance  to  first  responders, 
other  carriers,  and  those  people  directly  affected  by  the  storm;  the  lessons  we  have 
learned; and our policy recommendations. You also will see why we at AT&T speak 
of  a  spirit  of  service  and  a  spirit  of  compassion  in  connection  with  our  disaster-re-
lated activities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

I. Protecting Critical Communications Infrastructure 
A. Preparation 

56 

As  a  preliminary  matter,  there  are  three  overarching  steps  that  AT&T  has 
taken—and  that  are  essential  to  protecting  vital  communications  infrastructures. 
The first begins long before any disaster occurs. It entails preparation to ensure that 
the  network  and  its  components  are  as  reliable  as  possible  through  proper  design, 
hardening, redundancy, and performance at levels that far exceed routine needs. At 
AT&T,  for  example,  we  engineer  our  network  to  ‘‘five  nines’’  of  reliability—99.999 
percent  reliability—that  requires  a  diversity  of  communications  links  and  equip-
ment.  When  links  and  associated  systems  fail,  there  must  be  instantaneous  and 
seamless  rollover  to  backup  facilities.  This  capability  must  be  periodically  tested, 
and  given  the  frequency  of  cable  dig-ups  throughout  the  country,  let  alone  emer-
gencies  of  unprecedented  scale  such  as  Katrina,  this  testing  must  occur  frequently. 
Proper preparation, however, also contemplates that even the best facilities could 
fail. Proper preparation therefore requires rigorous planning for service restoration, 
including  advance  placement  and  availability  of  service  restoration  equipment 
where it can quickly meet identified needs, and ongoing training to ensure the avail-
ability  of  the  skilled  work  force  needed  to  restore  service.  We  make  restoration  our 
first priority and then move on to make repairs. 

Such  a  commitment  to  preparation,  excellent  service  in  the  face  of  disaster,  and 
responsiveness to threats to our networks and customers, does not come cheaply. At 
AT&T,  we  have  invested  approximately  $350  million  since  1991  in  our  mobile  net-
work disaster recovery (NDR) infrastructure. We can quickly bring emergency com-
munications vehicles (ECVs) wherever needed to provide communications services in 
an  emergency,  and  we  have  more  than  150  tractor  trailers  of  various  kinds  stored 
in  locations  around  the  country  and  loaded  with  generators,  fiber  and  other  sup-
plies, repair and restoration facilities, circuit and packet switching, HVAC capabili-
ties, lights, batteries, chillers, pumps, food, first-aid, and whatever else may be nec-
essary to make our response effective. We have extensively drilled our teams in var-
ious scenarios on a quarterly basis to ensure that readiness remains at peak levels. 
Our  NDR  disaster  planning  and  Continuity  of  Operations  Plan  (COOP)  gives  us 
the  ability  to  duplicate  necessary  capabilities  quickly  to  meet  or  exceed  our  cus-
tomers’  business  needs  and  continuity  requirements,  including  those  of  our  govern-
ment  customers.  This  has  many  components,  including  unparalleled  security  capa-
bilities,  logical  systems,  and  physical  capabilities.  Network  security  is  of  particular 
importance given the prevalence of attacks through worms and viruses and the pos-
sibility of related threats. AT&T works diligently to provide network security for our 
infrastructure and to our customers, and although that was not an issue in this dis-
aster,  it  is  a  critical  issue  and  threat  almost  every  day.  Network  security  requires 
great  focus  and  attention,  and  will  certainly  remain  a  critical  challenge  that  may 
someday be the subject of another ‘‘lessons learned’’ hearing. 

AT&T also established a system-level certification and assurance governance proc-
ess whereby we measure our estimated likelihood of recovery in the event of an inci-
dent.  We  then  drill  down  to  the  component  level  and  assess  the  consequences  of  a 
potential  failure  and  the  impact  to  our  business.  We  work  to  mitigate  the  risk  of 
failure  by  either  eliminating  the  threat  and  the  vulnerability,  or  by  mitigating  the 
exposure.  This  process  informs  our  rigorous  business  case  analysis  and  brings  clar-
ity to investment decisions. We regularly assess these components both for ourselves 
and on behalf of our customers. 
B. Execution 

The second vital step to protect communications infrastructure requires execution 
during and immediately following a disaster. In many respects, execution is a func-
tion  of  proper  preparation,  particularly  having  a  robust  infrastructure,  a  well- 
trained and frequently-drilled work force, and facilities and capabilities available for 
service  restoration.  Effective  execution  also  requires  a  sophisticated  command  and 
control  structure  in  emergencies  to  make  every  minute  count,  every  deployment  as 
effective  and  efficient  as  possible,  and  to  enable  our  dedicated  employees  to  work 
as  safely  and  effectively  as  possible.  We  follow  an  ‘‘incident  command  structure,’’ 
which  is  led  at  every  moment  by  an  experienced  Executive  Duty  Officer.  A  similar 
system is frequently used by first responders. 

In  addition,  execution  requires  close  coordination  with  third  parties,  including 
Federal, State, and local government authorities and first responders, others in the 
telecommunications  industry,  and  others  in  the  private  sector  trying  to  restore  es-
sential  services  and  facilities,  such  as  power,  water,  roadways,  and  the  like.  This 
communication  and  coordination  effort  is  often  the  most  difficult  part  of  execution 
during  and  immediately  after  a  disaster.  In  the  communications  field,  the  tele-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

communications  industry  response  to  disasters,  other  than  that  of  a  company  re-
sponding  to  damage  to  its  own  facilities,  is  typically  coordinated  through  the  Na-
tional  Coordination  Center  (NCC).  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  partici-
pates  in  the  NCC  through  the  National  Communications  System  (NCS),  as  did  the 
Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC)  during  the  response  to  Hurricane 
Katrina. This important entity matches telecommunications companies to those gov-
ernmental entities with unmet emergency telecommunications needs. 

Finally,  execution  requires  ingenuity  and  resourcefulness  when  the  unforeseen 
happens. Each emergency situation presents its own unique set of challenges. Even 
the most thorough planning and training cannot take the place of highly skilled and 
resourceful  emergency  responders  who  can  recognize  and  adapt  to  unplanned  cir-
cumstances. 
C. Evaluation and Improvement 

Finally,  the  protection  of  the  communications  infrastructure  requires  a  thorough 
and  frank  after-the-fact  evaluation  of  performance,  distillation  of  lessons  learned, 
and  implementation  of  improvements.  In  this  regard,  one  outcome  of  Hurricane 
Katrina should be a critical reassessment of our performance as individual commu-
nications companies, as an industry, and as a nation, and implementation of the pol-
icy recommendations needed to improve performance in the future. 

I hope to address each of these steps in my testimony today, both in general and 
in  light  of  our  recent  experience  with  Hurricane  Katrina.  At  the  end  of  this  testi-
mony,  I  also  offer  some  policy  recommendations  to  advance  this  necessary  national 
discussion. 
II. Impact of Katrina on the Network and its Restoration 

Overall, AT&T’s network remained overwhelmingly intact following the hurricane 
and  flooding.  At  all  times,  we  were  able  to  carry  at  least  95  percent  of  the  calls  in 
the  Gulf  Coast  area  that  came  to  our  network.  Of  the  5  percent  of  our  capacity  in 
the  area  that  was  initially  lost,  FASTAR,  our  software  system  that  redirects  and 
reroutes  traffic,  restored  half  of  that  capacity  within  a  couple  of  hours.  Within  24 
hours  of  the  storm  making  landfall,  another  quarter  of  that  capacity  was  restored 
via  manual  rerouting,  and  the  final  quarter  was  restored  within  48  hours  of  the 
storm  making  landfall  when  AT&T  workers  physically  installed  two  cables  in  the 
ground  and  rerouted  certain  traffic.  This  latter  effort  successfully  worked  around 
the  loss  of  certain  regenerators  that  send  digital  bits  long  distances  over  fiber.  On 
a  nationwide  basis,  on  the  day  of  Katrina  and  over  the  next  few  days,  we  success-
fully  carried  intercity  traffic  at  levels  that  exceeded  demand  the  week  prior  to 
Katrina by approximately 10 percent. 

Nonetheless,  because  we  interconnect  with  other  carriers,  including  local  ex-
change carriers and wireless carriers, we could not complete calls to other networks 
that  suffered  more  severe  disruptions.  As  a  result,  following  Hurricane  Katrina’s 
landfall  on  the  Gulf  Coast,  we  needed  to  block  millions  of  calls  a  day  into  the  af-
fected area due to outages in other networks. 

We  built  our  only  major  switching  station  in  the  New  Orleans  area  on  high 
ground  and,  therefore,  it  was  not  flooded.  One  of  our  most  immediate  concerns  in 
the aftermath of Katrina regarding that facility, however, was looting and security. 
Security  concerns  forced  employees  to  evacuate  our  switching  center  late  in  the 
afternoon  on  August  31,  as  local  law  enforcement  was  unable  to  ensure  the  safety 
and  security  of  the  site.  Fortunately,  the  building  was  secured  late  that  night,  and 
our  employees  returned  to  the  building  the  following  day,  together  with  BellSouth 
employees  who  worked  in  the  same  building.  At  that  time,  our  people  delivered  to 
the building fuel for the generators, water for the air conditioning chillers, food, and 
other  supplies.  Law  enforcement  authorities  also  set  up  operations  in  the  lobby  of 
the  building  in  order  to  utilize  the  telephone  connectivity  available  there.  During 
the  period  that  our  employees  were  out  of  the  building,  the  network  infrastructure 
was put on automatic controls and monitored remotely by the AT&T Network Oper-
ations Center. 

We had more than 100 offices lose commercial power, usually briefly, at one time 
or  another.  Fortunately,  we  had  sufficient  backup  generators  and  enough  fuel  for 
them.  We  were  able  to  restore  power  by  putting  many  of  these  sites  on  generators, 
and  by  making  use  of  batteries  or  fuel  cells  in  connection  with  a  few.  We  replen-
ished  fuel  supplies  as  necessary  to  avoid  disruption,  but  our  preparations  included 
staged  supplies  of  thousands  of  gallons  of  gas  in  portable  containers,  thousands  of 
gallons of diesel fuel in portable cells, and thousands of gallons of water in portable 
tankers  for  cooling  towers.  We  continue  to  have  fueling  plans  in  place  for  each  of 
our  sites  in  the  area,  all  of  which  have  at  least  2  to  3  days  of  fuel  supply  which 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

we  are  topping  off  regularly.  Importantly,  very  good  progress  has  been  made  now 
in the region to restore commercial power. 

At this time, the AT&T network has been fully restored and repaired. We will re-
main  engaged,  however,  during  broader  recovery  efforts  to  ensure  continued  oper-
ation of our facilities, and to lend support to others where we can. 
III. AT&T’s Katrina Response and Outreach 

AT&T  began  moving  equipment  and  teams  from  around  the  country  toward  the 
Gulf  States  in  the  days  before  the  storm  made  landfall.  As  the  path  of  the  storm 
became  clearer,  AT&T  moved  its  assets  closer  to  where  they  would  be  needed,  but 
not so close as to be put in danger by Katrina. We followed our prescribed approach. 
The  first  team  restored  AT&T’s  service  to  its  prior  levels,  the  next  maintained  and 
monitored AT&T’s facilities so as to prevent new issues from arising, and the third 
came in to help others. AT&T worked around the clock to respond to this crisis and 
safeguard  its  network,  support  efforts  to  respond  to  the  disaster,  and  address  the 
needs of evacuees. 

Because  we  fully  restored  and  secured  all  of  our  network  capabilities  within  the 
first  48  hours  of  the  crisis,  in  a  spirit  of  service  and  compassion,  AT&T  was  able 
to  direct  its  efforts  to  benefit  its  customers,  other  telecommunications  competitors 
and  their  customers,  first  responders,  and  evacuees  as  needed.  In  this  instance,  we 
were  largely  able  to  use  our  in-place  capabilities  to  meet  not  only  our  own  needs, 
but also those of others. We put a variety of our facilities to work for other carriers 
and  their  customers,  and  continue  to  carry  significant  amounts  of  additional  traffic 
for  other  carriers  that  cannot  currently  do  so  themselves.  AT&T  is  also  helping  to 
provide relief to those directly affected by the hurricane and flooding, and assistance 
to charitable relief activities. 

• One  ECV  and  other  equipment  were  provided  to  NASA’s  Stennis  Space  Center 
in Mississippi, in a complex that hosts several Federal agencies, and which also 
became  an  evacuee  center.  By  September  1,  we  were  providing  NASA  with 
Internet  connectivity  and  a  phone  bank,  which  has  been  used  by  shelter  man-
agers to make outgoing calls on behalf of area shelter residents. 
• We provided diesel-powered generators to Louisiana State Police Troop L head-
quarters  in  Mandeville,  LA  on  Saturday  morning,  September  3.  They  had  lost 
their  back-up  power  generator  that  morning.  We  offered  an  AT&T  generator 
until its own could be repaired or commercial power restored. 
• We  deployed  satellite  communications  capabilities  through  an  ECV  at  a  Na-
tional  Guard  staging  and  billeting  center  at  the  Alario  Sports  Center  in 
Westwego,  LA,  a  few  miles  southwest  of  downtown  New  Orleans.  We  provided 
phone  lines  and  Internet  connectivity  for  the  command  staff,  which  it  did  not 
otherwise  have  available.  Separately,  we  also  enabled  troops  there  to  commu-
nicate with their families and others. 
• We deployed communications facilities, including an ECV with satellite commu-
nications,  near  the  Loyola  Bus  Station  in  downtown  New  Orleans—the  station 

Back at our offices, we continue to operate a war room, which is focused on help-
ing  our  customers  get  back  on  their  feet  and  on  providing  and  prioritizing  services 
to  business  customers  with  special  needs.  For  example,  a  business  that  has  relo-
cated out-of-state due to the hurricane and flooding requires rapid and professional 
deployment  of  numerous  phone  lines  and  data  capability.  This  effort  is  part  of  our 
command and control structure. 

Of  course,  the  same  is  particularly  true  of  our  work  with  government  customers 
like  FEMA.  In  addition  to  immediately  increasing  FEMA  call  capacity  and  toll-free 
number availability, over the weekend of September 10th, AT&T was able to install 
an  additional  140  T1  circuits  to  boost  call  center  capacity  to  support  FEMA.  AT&T 
worked  directly  with  the  IRS  to  execute  in  less  than  24  hours  an  agreement  to  di-
rect  calls  using  IRS  trunks  which  IRS  provided  to  give  FEMA  necessary  increased 
call capacity. 

At  the  same  time,  we  coordinated  with  the  NCC  regarding  the  considerable  re-
sources  that  we  could  make  available.  First,  we  focused  on  the  broader  tele-
communications network and the critical needs of first responders and ongoing res-
cue  operations.  In  coordination  with  the  NCC,  we  dispatched  five  emergency  com-
munications  vehicles  (ECVs)  with  satellite  capabilities,  and  other  forms  of  assist-
ance, to assist in the relief efforts. Never before had we deployed so many to a single 
area.  During  the  first  13  days  of  the  crisis,  over  104,000  calls  were  made  through 
AT&T ECVs. We assisted the Louisiana State Police, the Louisiana National Guard, 
Stennis  International  Airport,  NASA  and  others,  including  civil  emergency  commu-
nications authorities in Mississippi and Louisiana. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

had  been  converted  into  a  holding  location  for  prisoners.  The  service  was  pro-
vided for public and administrative use. 

• On  September  3rd,  our  restoration,  repair,  maintenance  and  clean-up  efforts 
added  an  air  wing  as  one  of  our  helicopters  and  that  of  a  vendor  were  put  to 
use,  partly  to  provide  support  and  also  to  patrol  seven  of  our  own  fiber  routes 
in the area to ensure that the routes remained safely in place and unobstructed. 
• Network  operations  provided  several  phones  for  use  by  a  temporary  air  coordi-
nation tower at Stennis International Airport. This was crucial because this air-
port became a focal point of relief flights and related efforts. 

• Network  operations  gave  generators  and  fuel  to  BellSouth  to  enable  some  of 
their  facilities  to  remain  in  operation.  BellSouth  continues  to  use  some  of  our 
generators. 

The second part of our response was to provide relief to individuals, telecommuni-
cations services in support of charitable work, and to make our own charitable con-
tributions. 

• Working  with  Avaya,  Cisco,  and  SBC,  we  helped  establish  a  communications 
network  for  evacuees  at  the  Astrodome,  including  more  than  1,000  phone  lines 
as well as data infrastructure. 

• We  established  a  phone  bank  to  assist  displaced  college  students  to  find  alter-

‘‘Shelter from the Storm: A Concert for the Gulf Coast.’’ 

• We  are  not  billing  any  local  or  long-distance  residential  customers  in  southern 
Mississippi  and  the  greater  New  Orleans  area  unless  the  customer  originated 
home  long-distance  usage  after  September  1.  This  includes  waiver  of  fixed 
monthly  fees.  We  have  also  stopped  all  outbound  bill  collection  efforts  in  Lou-
isiana, Mississippi and Alabama. 

• We  are  also  helping  our  business  customers  get  back  in  business  by  restoring 
services  at  damaged  sites  and  augmenting  their  capabilities  at  new  locations. 
We are waiving recurring and non-recurring charges at affected sites until busi-
nesses can re-establish operations. 

• The AT&T Foundation also pitched in to address the needs created by this dis-
aster.  It  donated  $1.5  million 1 and  148  laptops  to  the  Red  Cross  for  relief  ef-
forts.  It  issued  35,000  pre-paid  calling  cards  for  distribution  to  survivors  and 
evacuees. 

native educational opportunities. 

• We  provided  toll-free  calling  and  10  call  centers  for  a  successful  fundraiser: 

IV. Lessons Learned 

Each emergency situation presents its own unique set of challenges, and even the 
most  thorough  planning  cannot  take  the  place  of  ingenuity  and  resourcefulness 
when  the  unforeseen  happens.  That  said,  much  can  be  anticipated,  and  we  must 
plan  and  drill  to  address  a  variety  of  events  on  any  scale.  I  am  sure  I  join  all  of 
you  in  saluting  our  first  responders  and  relief  workers  in  their  tireless  efforts  on 
the  ground.  But  the  importance  of  resourcefulness  does  not  in  any  way  obviate  the 
need  for  very  carefully  thought  out  emergency  planning  led  by  seasoned  profes-
sionals. In this respect, we believe that Katrina has taught us several lessons which 
we all must incorporate into future planning: 

• Establish  and  Practice  Disaster  Recovery  Processes  in  Anticipation  of  Emer-
gencies:  Communications,  Command  and  Control.  Communications  resources 
can be brought where needed very quickly, but it is essential that there be clear 
lines  of  command  and  control  at  all  times  in  order  to  direct  those  resources  ef-
fectively  and  to  the  area  of  greatest  need.  Moreover,  if  because  of  the  scale  or 
nature of the disaster, some aspect of the plan affecting the command structure 
is not workable, an alternative must also be part of the plan and ready for im-
plementation. Finally, without practice and drilling, no team will be ready, and 
no plan will be ready to implement. 

• Internalize  the  3P  Paradigm:  Preventative  Action,  Proactive  Focus,  Predictive 
Models. It is crucial to invest in facilities and plan and drill regularly and thor-
oughly  for  a  wide  variety  of  contingencies.  Investment  cannot  be  deferred  and 
possible scenarios ignored. We cannot wait for a disaster to occur before we are 
prepared to move aggressively. 

1 This figure includes $500,000 in matching funds for donations from AT&T employees. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

• Pre-Position  Physical  Resources  at  Optimal  Locations  for  Fast  Response—Shel-
tered and Above Sea Level. This lesson certainly seems obvious now, but the fact 
remains that it was not always easy to do or done in New Orleans in a variety 
of  different  industries—telecommunications  included.  One  strength  of  our  re-
sponse  to  Katrina  was  moving  resources  into  the  area  quickly.  Because  we  are 
a  national  corporation  that  created  mobile  resources  to  be  deployed  wherever 
needed,  we  are  able  to  move  our  emergency  resources  far  enough  from  at-risk 
areas  to  be  out  of  harm’s  way,  but  close  enough  to  be  deployed  quickly  into  af-
fected areas. 

• Make Risk Analysis Routine: Harden Critical Infrastructure Where Indicated. It 
is  imperative  to  know  what  part  of  your  infrastructure  is  critical  to  continued 
operation  of  the  network  in  times  of  crisis  and  how  to  harden  it  as  much  as 
possible and to replace or restore it to the extent it may be damaged. Such anal-
ysis must be part of any risk assessment, and the assessment must be followed 
promptly by action. 

• Design  Wireless  Hubs  for  Worst-Case  Scenario.  Wireless  services  in  the  Gulf 
Coast  area  suffered  in  Katrina’s  wake  because  of  several  perils.  Some  towers 
were  simply  blown  over  in  the  storm;  others  were  knocked  out  due  to  flooding 
of the electronics at the base. Remaining towers were overloaded with rerouted 
traffic. Better planning for disastrous events is necessary and hardening and re-
dundancy are crucial. 

• Establish Crisis Management Plan. Every emergency situation is different, and 
even  the  best  planning  may  not  prevent  things  from  going  wrong.  Thus,  we 
need  to  prepare  ourselves  for  that  eventuality.  Crisis  management  plans  must 
recognize and allow for improvisation to adapt to the given circumstances. 

• Coordinate  Restoration  and  Recovery  Effort.  There  should  be  no  wasted  effort 
in  recovery  operations.  Everyone  available  should  be  participating,  and  there 
needs  to  be  coordination  so  that  efforts  are  not  duplicated  or  in  conflict  with 
one  another.  The  NCC  and  NCS  played  very  positive  roles  in  matching  avail-
able  resources  to  pending  needs,  and  the  FCC  stepped  in  with  leadership  and 
authority as a clearinghouse for telecommunications recovery needs. It is essen-
tial that logistical information such as what roads are closed and what medical 
precautions need to be taken be readily available. Moreover, a recommendation 
we made after 9/11 still has not been implemented—companies who are crucial 
to  the  response  to  disasters  such  as  AT&T  should  have  special  credentials  de-
signed  for  employees  and  accredited  in  advance  in  order  to  access  disaster 
areas—AT&T  employees  only  were  able  to  respond  and  move  mobile  resources 
into the Gulf Coast area by virtue of their resourcefulness in talking their way 
into affected areas. 

• Design  Five  9’s  of  Reliability.  This  storm  again  confirmed  that  telecommuni-
cations  companies  that  design  their  networks  to  this  standard—99.999  percent 
reliability—have  excellent  disaster  recovery  and  response  capabilities,  as  well 
as reasonably hardened networks. That is the only way to maintain this stand-
ard. In times of crisis, this capability becomes a vital national asset. 

• Interoperability  and  Spectrum  Availability.  A  crisis  on  the  scale  we  saw  in  the 
Gulf Coast, and smaller challenges as well, demand a well coordinated informa-
tion and communications delivery system. We must resolve the spectrum needs 
highlighted  by  the  9/11  Commission,  among  others,  to  provide  first  responders 
and  others  with  a  better  and  more  effective  means  of  communicating  quickly 
and easily in an emergency. 
IV. Policy Recommendations 

These  lessons  learned  lead  to  several  specific  policy  recommendations.  These  in-

clude: 

• Make additional spectrum available for public safety purposes, and ensure that 
all  first  responders  can  access  it  in  a  coordinated  and  interconnected  fashion. 
• Furnish  standardized  and  approved  emergency  credentials  to  vital  communica-
tions  and  other  infrastructure  providers  in  advance,  so  that  AT&T  and  other 
specialized  disaster  staff  can  get  into  affected  areas  to  restore  vital  capabilities 
without delay or interference. While our teams were given letters from state of-
ficials authorizing them to enter impacted areas, those were not necessarily rec-
ognized by security and other personnel in the field. 

• Predetermine  security  needs  for  law  enforcement  deployment  to  protect  critical 

infrastructure facilities immediately following a disaster. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

• Establish and routinely exercise mechanisms for improved public/private coordi-
nation,  communication,  and  leadership  across  all  essential  disciplines.  In  this 
emergency,  many  of  the  challenges  were  operational,  not  technical.  For  exam-
ple,  we  needed  testing  of  the  air  and  water  to  assess  the  risks  to  our  teams, 
advice on medical precautions that should be taken given the flooding and fires, 
crucial  logistical  information  such  as  notice  of  road  closings,  flyover  authority, 
and overnight accommodations for our technicians (who slept in trucks because 
military  bases  were  closed  to  them).  Better  communication  and  coordination 
across the range of public and private responders would improve operations. 

• Drill  for  emergencies  under  various  different  scenarios  frequently,  and  include 
the  public  and  private  sector.  Do  not  be  satisfied  with  a  written  plan.  Resolve 
all command and control issues. 

• Consider  subsidizing  some  emergency  preparation  by  infrastructure  companies 
since  the  government  is  likely  to  call  such  capabilities  into  use  or  would  other-
wise need to duplicate resources inefficiently. 

We  can  never  anticipate  every  contingency  in  an  emergency,  nor  can  we  assure 
a  foolproof  communications  network  all  the  time  under  all  circumstances.  Nonethe-
less, at AT&T, we have done much to ensure reliability and restorability of commu-
nications networks and together—as an industry and as a nation—we can do more. 
I thank you for holding this hearing to advance this important discussion. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you all very much. That’s a marvelous se-
ries of statements. I’ve just gotten word this morning that 70 of the 
400  TSA  screeners  at  Houston’s  airport  showed  up.  The  problem 
really is of getting people to report for work as their families have 
to  be  evacuated.  Did  you  experience  that  in  general  in  terms  of 
your  operations  during  the  disaster,  the  Katrina  disaster?  Mr. 
Smith. 

Mr.  SMITH.  Mr.  Chairman,  we  really  had  not  experienced  a  sig-
nificant  amount  of  that.  Our  people  I  think  come  from  a  service 
ethic  and,  in  fact,  many  even  after  losing  their  homes  showed  up 
at  some  of  our  facilities,  our  work  centers,  and  said  ‘‘I’m  ready  to 
go  to  work.’’  And  that’s  one  of  the  things  that  we  learned  through 
the long history of hurricane experience we have, is that we’ve got 
to  help  our  people  be  able  to  know  their  family’s  cared  for,  know 
they’ve  got  shelter,  and  that’s  why  we  started  building  these  tent 
cities,  so  we  have  gained  the  experience  to  be  able  to  come  in,  set 
it up, let our employees know that their families are well cared for 
so  they  can  go  to  work  and  start  helping  us  restore,  so  it’s  been 
a very limited problem for us. 

The CHAIRMAN. And have you had any problems that way? 
Mr.  ESLAMBOLCHI.  We  did  not  have,  Mr.  Chairman,  any  prob-
lems  in  that  construct  at  all.  Most  of  the  problem  that  we  faced 
was  more  on  the  logistical  side,  how  do  you  get  the  people  to  the 
right  location  with  fuel,  batteries,  and  generators.  That  was  more 
of  a  logistical  problem  for  us,  and  technically  and  operationally  I 
think that was a little bit more challenging for us in this case than 
it was in the case for 9/11 incident. But we did not have that prob-
lem.  We  were  able  to  get  the  right  people  with  a  spirit  of  service 
and  compassion  that  AT&T  has,  we  know  our  people  are  putting 
a lot of focus on restoring service and helping employees and other 
people. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Roth. 
Mr. ROTH. No, Mr. Chairman, we did not have that problem, but 
I  will  tell  you  that  one  of  the  key  learnings  is  that  as  we  prepare 
for  Hurricane  Rita  we  have  asked  our  employees  to  take  care  of 
their  families.  We  have  employee  volunteers  from  unaffected  parts 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

of the country who are coming in to do their jobs so the technicians 
that  will  be  manning  and  staying  at  our  switching  centers  during 
the  storm  are  actually  volunteers  coming  from  other  parts  of  the 
country  so  employees  in  that  area  are  able  to  take  care  of  their 
families. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Citron. 
Mr. CITRON. No, none affected. 
Mr. ESLAMBOLCHI. Mr. Chairman, if I may just add that we have 
such  a  dedicated  set  of  employees  that  one  of  our  technicians  with 
a  Gulfport,  Mississippi,  location,  one  of  our  central  offices,  with  75 
and  80  mile-an-hour  wind,  the  roof  actually  lifted  off  and  came 
back  on,  and  they  had  water  actually  into  the  building,  and  that 
employee was so dedicated almost for about 12 hours were mopping 
the  floor  to  ensure  that  the  electronic  equipment  stays  out  of  the 
water.  So  it  was  very,  a  heroic  event  that  happened  in  terms  of  to 
protect the service. 

The CHAIRMAN. Let me ask you just a general question. This may 
sound  sort  of  stupid,  but  have  any  of  you  been  advised  by  your 
legal sections that you don’t have authority to do things you would 
like to do during an emergency like this? 

Mr. ROTH. No, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Smith,  has  anybody  told  you  you  can’t  do 

that, you don’t have authority to do it? 

Mr.  SMITH.  No,  sir,  we  haven’t  seen  that.  We’ve  had  challenges 
on getting things that we need like priority security escorts and so 
forth,  so  one  of  the  things  that  we  hope  will  come  out  of  this  as 
I mentioned in my testimony is that we be treated as a critical re-
sponder. So it hasn’t been something from inside the company, but 
I think from the local, State, and Federal Government issues have 
come up around letting our people into those areas. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  we’re  going  to  examine  that.  We  think  the 
FCC  should  have  that  authority  to  issue,  in  advance,  the  creden-
tials  for  the  responders  and  for  those  people  that  you  need.  We 
haven’t  solved  the  problem  of  security  yet,  and  that  I  think  has  to 
be part of a disaster plan. Mr. Roth. 

Mr. ROTH. No, sir. I would agree with Mr. Smith’s comments. 
The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Citron. 
Mr. CITRON. In addition to the comments raised here there is one 
issue that affects us directly. We do not have the statutory author-
ity from the FCC to get direct interconnection to necessary critical 
facilities or to have the ability to manage our own numbering pools, 
and  thus  during  natural  disasters  we  did  lose,  or  one  of  our  part-
ners  lost,  critical  infrastructure.  And  because  we  did  not  have  di-
rect access to those facilities, we were unable to re-route those calls 
as  my  other  partners  here  would  have  been  able  to  do.  We  would 
recommend  in  any  legislative  activity  that  the  VoIP  providers  be 
provided  direct  interconnection  to  network  tandems  and  to  be  al-
lowed the assignment of numbers directly to us so that we can bet-
ter manage in a natural disaster. 

The CHAIRMAN. All right. Mr. Eslambolchi. 
Mr. ESLAMBOLCHI. We did not have any legal constraints in exe-
cuting  our  strategy  around  the  disaster  recovery  supporting  those 
services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The  CHAIRMAN.  Are  there  any  constraints  in  the  anti-trust  laws 

63 

that prevent you from working together in a disaster scenario? 

Mr.  SMITH.  No,  sir,  Mr.  Chairman.  In  fact,  one  thing  I  should 
have  pointed  out  that  helped  a  great  deal  is  the  quick  action  from 
the FCC. There were some things we did to start porting numbers 
that normally would not be allowed or to start using facilities that 
otherwise would not have been allowed. The FCC acted very quick-
ly  in  that  regard,  so  I  commend  them  for  their  help.  In  terms  of 
collaborative  activity,  in  fact,  Mr.  Eslambolchi  and  I  talked  on  the 
day  of  the  hurricane.  We  had  people  in  the  same  building.  We  co-
ordinated  armed  caravans  to  get  into  the  building  and  make  sure 
we  had  material  and  supplies.  We  actually  coordinated  calls  with 
wireless  providers  and  other  carriers,  so  I  think  in  the  time  of  a 
service emergency we do what needs to be done. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  as  you  go  back  to  your  offices  if  you  find 
that  you  have  any  such  advice  from  your  people,  we’d  appreciate 
knowing  it.  We  expect  to  handle  a  comprehensive  disaster  pre-
paredness  bill.  We’re  seeing  it  now.  The  Texas  plan  is  being  exer-
cised  two  days  in  advance  and  they  are  moving  now  and  probably 
will  have  less  real  human  loss  because  of  the  fact  their  plan  is 
being initiated right away. Senator Inouye. 

Senator  INOUYE.  It  has  become  evident  that  network  providers 
such  as  traditional  telephones  whether  they  be  computers, 
modems,  wireless  phones,  or  cordless  phones,  are  very  dependant 
upon commercial electricity and commercial power; whether it’s for 
recharging  or  even  batteries,  and  as  a  result  these  network  pro-
viders have become very vulnerable to disasters of this nature. And 
my  question  is,  what  steps  can  we  take  to  minimize  this  vulner-
ability  or  this  dependancy?  Because  you  may  have  the  best  equip-
ment,  but  if  you  don’t  have  the  electricity  you’re  out  of  business. 
And this has happened in Katrina, it will happen in Rita, and steps 
have  to  be  taken.  Is  there  a  role  for  the  government?  And  the  sec-
ond question is, are you satisfied that we’re ready for Rita? 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Smith. 
Mr.  SMITH.  The  case  of  the  first  point  on  commercial  power, 
you’re  absolutely  right.  We  are  more  and  more  dependent,  and  as 
we  move  to  fiberoptic-based  systems  and  even  cordless  phones  in 
homes  we  find  many  consumers  don’t  realize  that  their  cordless 
phone  now  requires  commercial  power.  So  we  have  people  who  re-
port their phone out of service when the phone is actually working, 
it’s  just  lost  commercial  power.  It  is  an  issue.  We  deal  with  that 
quite often. We had four hurricanes in six weeks last year in Flor-
ida.  We  have  over  a  thousand  generators  that  we  move  into  areas 
to  supply  key  power.  The  thing  that  was  unique  to  us  in  Katrina 
was  the  flooding  and  security  issues  inside  the  core  part  of  New 
Orleans.  We’ve  never  had  a  situation  before  where  we  couldn’t  get 
fuel  trucks  into  those  locations  either  because  of  security  or  flood-
ing.  We’ve  started  looking  at  how  we  might  change  that.  We  had 
already  provisioned  our  equipment  on  upper  floors  to  get  it  out  of 
the water risk, but if you go for several days in that situation and 
you can’t get tanker trucks into a flooded area, or you have security 
issues, that’s a problem. So we’re working on the possibility of nat-
ural  gas  and  other  things  as  backup,  but  sometimes  in  the  event 
of a natural disaster natural gas systems shut off for safety reasons 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

as well. So we haven’t determined a foolproof system yet, although 
we are exploring other options. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Roth. 
Mr. ROTH. Senator, in answer to your first question, the wireless 
network that Cingular uses has redundancy. We do depend on com-
mercial power. We also have battery power as backup and we have 
generator  as  backup.  What  did  make  this  storm  unique  from  any 
other  storm  or  disaster  we’ve  faced  was  the  flooding,  also  flooded 
our  generators,  put  them  under  water,  and  those  that  were  not 
under water were inaccessible. We tried to float fuel into them, but 
it  was  not  easy.  That  was  the  thing  that  was  most  difficult  about 
it. I think that situation’s quite unique. As your second question re-
lates  to  Hurricane  Rita,  we  have  staging  centers  currently  set  up 
like  the  ones  we  had  for  Hurricane  Katrina.  We  have  staging  cen-
ters in both San Antonio, Texas, and just outside of Dallas to move 
into  the  Houston/Galveston  areas.  We  are  prepared,  I  think,  even 
better  prepared  for  this  one,  because  it’s  our  anticipation  of  the 
water as it rises and surges will also retreat back to the ocean and 
will  allow  us  quicker  access  back  in  whether  it’s  for  power  or  the 
restoration  of  the  towers  or  anything  else  that  is  damaged  in  the 
storm, sir. 

Mr.  CITRON.  While  we  also  employ  battery  backup  mechanisms 
as  well  as  generators  powered  by  diesel  fuel,  I  think  we  miss  the 
fact that the underscored importance of the electrical transmission 
system that exists in the United States. We have seen major black-
outs  in  the  Northeast  not  too  long  ago  that  crippled  a  lot  of  our 
telecommunications  infrastructure.  I  think  the  underscoring  mes-
sage  is  while  there’s  a  lot  that  we  can  do  with  generators  and 
power and fuel, there’s a lot to be done with the electrical network 
itself  that  could  add  resiliency  and  redundancy  to  it  in  delivering 
that  power  down  to  critical  communications  infrastructure  and 
even  down  to  people’s  homes.  As  we  now  prepare  for  Rita  as  well, 
I  think  that  we  as  a  nation  have  learned  a  lot  of  lessons,  and  as 
a company I know that we are fully prepared for the impact of that 
storm. 

Mr. ESLAMBOLCHI. We do have a significant amount of generator 
backup which uses normal fuel. We also have battery backup. Some 
of them go as much as days, some of them as much as 12, 14 days, 
couple of weeks of support, but clearly we need alternative sources 
of  energy.  I  believe  fuel  cell  technology  is  coming  up  very  quickly 
to the research and the development. I think we need to think very 
hard about some investment in that area. I think it’s going to real-
ly pay off big dividends. We could ask equipment providers to think 
about fuel cell technology as they develop new technologies that re-
quire power in that space. I also think we need to really fundamen-
tally  think  about  different  ways  to  protect  the  reliability  that  is 
very close to what I call five nines of reliability. If you think about 
the  public-switched  network,  it  was  designed  for  many,  many  dec-
ades.  The  mentality  has  always  been  around  five  nines  of  reli-
ability,  which  means  it’s  not  just  having  a  backup  generator  or 
backup  power,  you  also  have  to  protect  yourself  against  flooding. 
So, you know, when you look at the New Orleans office, you know, 
we  built  the  New  Orleans  office  with  BellSouth  with  40  foot  sub-
marine  walls.  So  we  don’t  want  to  have  the  water  get  into  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

building.  So  you  have  to  think  about  something  called  the  process 
101 engineering you have to do in designing big telecommunication 
infrastructure,  whether  it  is  a  public-switched  network,  whether 
it’s  PSAPs  systems,  or  whether  it  is  VoIP  9-1-1  or  VoIP  services, 
these  are  all  fundamental  structures  that  have  to  be  in  place,  and 
everybody  does  it  differently.  There  is  no  unique  method,  method-
ology  that  exists,  and  if  you  do  the  best  practices  and  given  the 
knowledge  and  experience  that  we  have  in  this  industry,  if  you 
apply  that  knowledge  at  the  best  in  class  to  the  other  industries 
we  could  literally  provide  significantly  more  resiliency  and  reli-
ability, not only for VoIP infrastructure but also for a cellular infra-
structure  which  literally  doesn’t  exist  at  a  high  level  today  across 
the country. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. Senator Burns. 
Senator BURNS. As I go over your testimony here, most of it was 
loss  of  power.  Most  of  you  had  redundant  systems,  systems  that 
you  could  switch,  but  I  agree  with  you  that  getting  power—when 
the  electricity  goes  off,  everything  goes  off.  I  was  interested,  Mr. 
Smith,  in  your  testimony  on  policy  recommendations,  you  think 
your losses down there will be around $400 to $600 million. That’s 
quite  a  bit.  Do  you  carry  any  protection  in  your  company  for  busi-
ness disruption or anything like that, that you’re reimbursed for if 
you hit a catastrophe like this? 

Mr.  SMITH.  We  have  some  coverage  that  primarily  takes  care  of 
our  building  structure,  but  after  Hurricane  Andrew  in  South  Flor-
ida,  we  were  insured  up  until  that  point.  After  Hurricane  Andrew 
we  could  no  longer  get  insurance  for  outside  plant  facilities  so  the 
bulk  of  that  damage  of  $400  to  $600  million  will  not  be  insured. 
Senator  BURNS.  In  other  words,  you’re  recommending  some  sort 

of a tax situation so that you can recover that? 

Mr.  SMITH.  We  think  that  would  be  one  mechanism,  yes,  sir,  for 
helping  us  recover  what  will  be  at  least  two  to  three  times  larger 
than  the  largest  storms  we’ve  ever  faced.  And  as  we  pointed  out 
earlier, many other people rely on our infrastructure as well, so we 
think one of the things that could help would be tax incentives. 

Senator BURNS. I want to ask the panel, now, being as you were 
wiped  out  in  certain  areas,  does  this  give  you  an  opportunity  for 
the deployment of new technologies and do some things differently 
than you’ve done before? And give me an idea of what those would 
be. 

Mr. SMITH. I’ll give you one example to start with. We do intend 
to  build  back  anything  that  needs  to  be  replaced  with  state-of-the- 
art  infrastructure.  That  will  include  packet-based  including  voice- 
over IP systems, fiberoptic systems. So what we’re doing right now 
is we’re in the phase of trying to provide immediate restoration for 
emergency services. In Pass Christian, for example, we had a 5,600 
line  office.  There’s  very  little  left  other  than  police  and  fire  and 
emergency  services.  So  we’re  trying  to  get  their  service  back  and 
have  established  that.  Then  we’ll  come  back  and  put  state  of  the 
art  facilities  in  that  will  be  packet-based  and  fiber-based,  and  we 
think it does provide new opportunity. 

Senator BURNS. Interoperability? 
Mr. SMITH. Absolutely. 
Senator BURNS. Mr. Roth. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

Mr. ROTH. Senator Burns, we intend to rebuild the area, and we 
will  build  it  with  the  technology  that  we  were  currently  using 
which is state of the art in the wireless network. 

Senator BURNS. Mr. Citron. 
Mr.  CITRON.  Sure.  I  think  there’s  an  interesting  opportunity  for 
an industry as a whole to look at how you might go about rebuild-
ing  New  Orleans  and  other  affected  areas,  giving  the  opportunity 
for new players and new technology into the markets to build addi-
tional redundant systems so that we don’t have one network owned 
by one operator, even several networks owned by a limited number 
of  operators.  Some  of  the  infrastructure  might  include  the  ability 
to  deploy  new  and  competing  fiberoptic  network,  new  and  com-
peting  WiFi  networks,  new  and  competing  WiMax  networks,  and 
new  networks  to  take  advantage  of  additional  frequencies  that 
might be opened up. 

Senator BURNS. We’ve got the complaints about your E–911, your 
9-1-1  calls  do  not  go  through  on  voice-over  IP.  What’s  the  barrier 
there? 

Mr. CITRON. The primary issue with voice-over IP, E–911 and its 
deployment  largely  rests  with  our  ability  to  access  that  infrastruc-
ture.  As  I  had  mentioned  earlier  and  have  testified  to  as  such, 
there’s  no  statutory  obligation  for  infrastructure  owners  to  provide 
us  access  to  all  the  necessary  elements  in  order  to  complete  voice- 
over  IP  E–911  calls.  This  has  been  the  largest  barrier  to  Vonage’s 
deployment.  Only  recently  under  the  help  of  the  FCC  and  its  en-
couragement  have  other  operators  been  able  to  open  up  their  net-
works and start allowing entry into commercial arrangements. For 
example,  we  do  have  a  commercial  arrangement  with  BellSouth. 
Mr.  Smith  and  I  have  worked  very  hard  on  making  that  commer-
cial  relationship  a  reality,  but  there  are  over  6,000-plus  different 
individual  local  first  responder  locations  known  as  PSAPs  that  we 
still  need  to  contract  with  and  work  through  in  order  to  get  this 
entire nation online and we are making great progress in that area. 

Senator BURNS. Is the barrier at the PSAPs? 
Mr.  CITRON.  The  barrier  is  everywhere.  It  starts  with  access  to 
the  selective  routers  that  switch  the  calls,  the  trunking  facilities 
necessary to access those facilities, the requirements of meeting dif-
ferent,  very  different  and  very  local  standards  for  PSAP  activity, 
the  testing  of  all  6,000  PSAPs  in  this  country  to  provide  reliable 
service, and the lack of liability protection. 

Senator BURNS. Mr. Eslambolchi. 
Mr.  ESLAMBOLCHI.  We  have  been  transforming  our  AT&T  net-
work  for  many  years.  We  have  been  moving  to  an  IP  and  MPLS 
infrastructure. So it’s primarily we carry more IP traffic today than 
we  carry  voice  traffic  across  the  network,  but  clearly  New  Orleans 
offers  a  green  field  approach  as  we  try  to  rebuild  that  infrastruc-
ture  itself  and  there  are  many  dimensions.  You  can  take  a  look  at 
that  infrastructure  itself.  At  the  network  layer,  you  can  look  at 
fiberoptic  cables,  you  can  think  about  new  technology  such  as  pas-
sive optical network and this is used in terms of fiber to the home, 
for  example,  environment  itself.  I  also  have  a  strong  belief  system 
around  the  wireless  technology,  not  only  in  this  country  but  also 
globally, because I think the wireless technology will dominate the 
telecommunications  for  many  decades  to  come.  There  are  ad  hoc 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

mesh wireless networks, so if one link fails there’s a resilience and 
redundancy  built  into  the  wireless  infrastructure.  There  are  new 
technologies  such  as  cognitive  radios.  Chairman  Martin  talked 
about  smart  antennas.  I  think  these  cognitive  radios  primarily 
eliminate  the  need  for  any  licensed  spectrum,  so  you  really  don’t 
necessarily  have  to  rely  on  FCC.  The  technology  is  very  sophisti-
cated, enough that it will detect the best signal as you’re trying to 
relay  the  traffic.  You  can  do  it  very,  very  quickly.  On  the  power 
line also I think the question came up earlier on the power line in-
frastructure, clearly, the power is the most dominant factor for any 
telecommunications,  and  most  of  our  power  lines  were  actually 
built  almost  a  hundred  years  ago.  We  have  built  our  cities  for 
horses and buggies, and we’re trying to put the 21st Century tech-
nology and application into a 20th Century infrastructure. Directly 
burying  the  fiberoptic  cable  and  directly  burying  the  power  lines  I 
think becomes very important with the very sophisticated dock sys-
tem  that  will  protect  you  against  the  flooding  and  all  kind  of  at-
tributes becomes a very important technological aspect. 

There’s one other technology if I may just kind of add on is what 
I  call  the  sensor  networks,  wireless  sensor  networks.  For  example, 
in  the  event  of  the  logistical  problem  for  us  to  get  fuel  to  specific 
locations  was  a  big  problem  because  we  didn’t  know  which  roads 
are  closed,  which  roads  are  open,  which  roads  there  are  trees  on 
that  we  can’t  get  the  trucks  into  and  get  fuel  into  a  location.  If 
there  are  sensor  networks  available  and  including  ultra-wideband 
imaging  type  technologies,  we  can  correlate  all  that  information 
and  make  that  available  to  the  carriers  so  we  can  get  the  fuel,  we 
can  get  support  directly  out  to  the  right  people,  the  right  infra-
structure,  and  that  was  kind  of  a  lessons  learned  from  this  infra-
structure  that  hopefully  we  can  apply  for  all  the  disasters.  Hope-
fully,  nothing  will  happen,  but  clearly  we  have  to  be  prepared  for 
any kind of disaster as we go forward. 

Senator  BURNS.  I  want  to  reiterate  what  I  thought  before  be-
cause  you  made  a  remarkable  recovery  down  there  in  a  very  short 
time  after  that  storm,  more  than  we  could  ever  do  as  a  Federal 
Government,  and  what  I  have  always  said,  you  know,  we  should 
step  back  and  get  out  of  the  way  and  let  you  all  do  it  and  then  if 
you need some help, well, let us know and we’ll help you. I’ve said 
that  and  I  think  local  governments  and  state  governments  work 
much  more  efficiently  than  the  Federal  Government  and  there 
again  the  same  statement  would  be  true,  whatever  your  short-
comings are, whatever replacements you have to be made or what-
ever,  we  can  handle  that  from  up  here.  But  as  an  initial  person 
going  back  into  restoring  some  sort  of  way  to  make  our  commu-
nities  work,  you  all  do  it  quicker  than  anybody.  And  your  people 
are  to  be  congratulated.  I  know  of  people  that  work  for  telephone 
companies  and  power  companies,  they  do  have  that  mentality. 
They  just  seem  like  they  forget  everything  when  they  hit  the  pole, 
so  to  speak.  They’re  just—that’s  that  mind-set.  We  have  to  get  it 
up,  we  got  to  get  it  going.  And  I  congratulate  you  for  that  and  I 
think  we’ll  be  in  dialogue  as  we  move  along  on  legislation  regard-
ing how voice-over IP is going to affect and how it works with, your 
system  and  your  system,  and  your  system  and  how  we  can  make 
this  work  in  an  area  where  communications  is  our  life  blood  al-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

most.  So  I  congratulate  you  on  this,  but  I  think  it  offers  us  some 
opportunities, some real opportunities, that when we build back we 
will  be  better  and  we  will—our  technologies,  but  if  we  need  some 
policy  changes  to  make  some  things  happen  that’s  what  we’re 
about up here. Give us an idea of how these systems, how they do 
interoperate  and  some  of  the  barriers  that  have  to  be  taken  down 
and redone in order to make all your systems work and talk to one 
another.  The  smart  radio  I’ve  always  said  we’ve  always  had  the 
ability  to  build  a  smart  radio  to  change  frequencies  and  to  talk  to 
one  another.  I’ve  always  said  the  State  police  could  always  talk  to 
the  sheriff’s  department  if  they  just  could  flip  a  switch  and  get  on 
their  frequency.  My  gosh,  we  do  that  in  an  airplane  every  day.  If 
you’re sitting up there flying an airplane, we change frequencies for 
every  control  center,  every  ATC,  every  departure,  and  every  land-
ing.  We  know  the  technology’s  available.  Now,  the  next  thing  is 
getting  I  suppose  enough  money  into  those  centers—I  hear  you 
pecking  over  there,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  make  a  point  here— 
that the reason we passed E–911 was to let those PSAPs and these 
people  who  depend  on  interoperability  to  buy  the  equipment.  It’s 
not that we don’t have it. It is just putting it in a little box. I mean, 
you  don’t  need  a  big  console  like  you’ve  got  on  your  board  on  an 
airplane. But, in other words, you can change frequencies and talk 
to  one  another.  We  have  that  capability  now,  and  now  it’s  getting 
the  money  to  them  to  make  sure  that  it  works.  We’ve  even  had— 
we  had  one  company  down  there  that  was  integrated,  telephone, 
wireless, and wireless and radios, they were set up in an hour and 
a  half  down  there  and  were  clearing  for  the  emergency  situations. 
Those—they’re available and what we have to do is make sure the 
policy  is  right  so  it’s  deployed.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chair-
man.  I  just  wanted  to  make  that  point.  There,  now  you  can  peck 
all you want to over there. Thank you for your testimony today. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much  for  joining  us.  Again,  I 
would  urge  that  if  you  do,  as  you  return  to  your  offices,  discover 
there are things that we should know that we might be able to as-
sist  you  with  future  actions,  let  us  know.  And  I  think  Senator 
Burns  speaks  for  all  of  us,  your  people  handle  the  life-line  to  not 
only those who are in danger, but those who want to know if their 
family,  their  people  have  survived,  and  it’s  a  fantastic  capability 
that  you’ve  developed.  So  we  thank  you  for  what  you’ve  done  in 
this emergency. We hope that you’re prepared for the next one, but 
in any event we’re here to try and make changes in the law to en-
sure  that,  as  we  go  forward  we’ve  learned  from  these  disasters. 
We’re  going  to  have  a  hearing  on  interoperability.  As  I  said  it’s 
scheduled for next Thursday morning. If you have any suggestions 
concerning that hearing, we’d be pleased to have them. 

Senator Inouye and others have asked if they could submit some 
technical  questions  to  you  for  your  assistance.  I  would  appreciate 
it  if  we  do  that  if  you’d  respond  to  them  so  we  can  try  to  include 
your  remarks  in  the  record.  The  record  will  remain  open  for  seven 
days  to  make  sure  that  we’ve  got  a  chance  to  put  those  responses 
in the record and we will use them as we mark up these bills. 

Again, we thank you very much for your cooperation and for your 

service to the country. 

[Whereupon, at 12:25 p.m., the Committee adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 
Thank you. Mr. Chairman, for holding this important hearing to examine the Na-
tion’s  critical  communications  infrastructure  and  how  it  can  be  protected  before, 
during, and after a disaster. 

I  would  like  to  welcome  Chairman  Kevin  J.  Martin  of  the  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission (FCC) our esteemed witnesses from BellSouth, Cingular Wireless. 
Vonage, and AT&T. Thank you all for your dedication to the difficult task of rebuild-
ing  the  various  communications  networks  damaged  by  Hurricane  Katrina  in  the 
Gulf region. 

As  we  begin  this  review  of  our  Nation’s  communications  capability  in  the  event 
of  a  disaster,  I  would  like  to  highlight  the  importance  of  ensuring  that  the  unique 
needs of the elderly are incorporated into all emergency communications plans. 

Many  elderly  citizens  live  alone  and  suffer  from  physical  ailments  or  mental  dis-
eases. As a result, widely used forms of communications are not always an effective 
means of informing the elderly of a disaster and the need to quickly take action and 
reach safety. 

For  example,  some  elderly  individuals  have  hearing  impairments  that  prevent 
them  from  clearly  hearing  a  siren  or  other  urgent  communication  messages,  while 
others suffer from mental conditions like Alzheimer’s and are unable to comprehend 
the message being communicated and the need to take immediate action. 

It  is  imperative  that  we  effectively  reach  out  to  the  elderly  citizens  who  live  by 
themselves  and  address  the  specific  needs  of  the  elderly  as  we  move  forward  in 
crafting emergency communication plans for our citizens. 

I  would  also  like  to  draw  attention  to  the  important  role  the  Universal  Service 
Fund plays in supporting our critical communications infrastructure, particularly in 
times of disaster. 

Recently,  the  FCC  announced  its  intention  to  use  universal  service  funds  to  re-
build  communications  networks  in  Louisiana,  Mississippi,  and  other  areas  affected 
by  Hurricane  Katrina.  The  FCC’s  proposal  would  make  approximately  $211  million 
available  to  consumers,  schools,  libraries,  healthcare  providers,  and  telecommuni-
cations carriers affected by the hurricane. 

I  join  Chairman  Stevens  in  commending  the  FCC,  under  Chairman  Martin,  for 
its  leadership  in  directing  the  Universal  Service  program  to  play  a  significant  role 
in  the  reconstruction  effort.  The  FCC’s  rapid  response  to  the  hurricane  crisis  is  in-
deed  laudable,  and  an  important  first  step  in  rebuilding  the  communications  infra-
structure. 

Unfortunately, the heightened demands on the fund are likely to further threaten 
its  long-term  solvency.  For  some  time,  the  pool  of  money  from  which  the  fund 
draws—interstate  revenues—has  been  shrinking,  while  demand  for  support  from 
consumers,  schools,  libraries,  healthcare  facilities,  and  telecommunications  carriers 
has increased. 

Now more than ever, the Committee must take up reform of the Universal Service 
system  to  ensure  that  it  is  robust  and  sustainable  in  the  long  term.  A  bill  I  intro-
duced in July with Senators Dorgan and Pryor addresses this critical need. 

The ‘‘Universal Service for the 21st Century Act’’ does two important things. First. 
it  directs  the  FCC  to  revise  the  Universal  Service  Fund  contribution  mechanism  to 
ensure  the  sustainability  of  the  fund.  Second,  it  creates  a  new  account  within  the 
Universal  Service  Fund  that  will  be  used  to  build  broadband  networks  in  unserved 
areas of the country. 

(69) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

By  reforming  universal  service  and  spurring  the  deployment  of  broadband,  our 
legislation will ensure that our nation’s communications infrastructure will continue 
to grow, and to be the robust and connected network that Americans expect and de-
serve. These considerations are particularly important in light of the damage visited 
on communications networks in the Gulf region by Hurricane Katrina. 

Again,  I  would  like  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  their  efforts  in  this  difficult  time, 

and I look forward to their testimony. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:20 Feb 03, 2011 Jkt 064137 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\64137.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

